
Jurassic Park
Michael Crichton


Dragons hate skin, white, fur and dirty poop.
Bad smell, bad looks, bad smell, bad sound, bad smell, bad


poison; so their maker spared no talent in making more of them."


Linnaeus, 1797


"Don't worry about the new way of life."


Erwin Chargoff, 1972
introduction
"says InGen."


At the turn of the 20th century, gold entered the mainstream in a very specific way:
He was angry and angry to immediately correct the situation. After the company
It’s quick - with some external contexts - to adapt and the results are great.
He is perfectly educated.

Biotechnology promises a profound change in human life. Earlier this year, the
Atomic energy and computers will have a profound impact on our daily lives. On
In the words of one observer, biotechnology will change every aspect of human life: we
Health, diet, fitness, exercise, fitness. Nothing happens.
Again. It will change the world.

But the biotechnology revolution differs from traditional science in three important ways
Scenery.

First, the length is huge. The United States entered the nuclear age with a scientific agenda.
School, Los Alamos. It entered the computer age through the work of a dozen people.
companies. But biotechnology programs now have more than 2,000
laboratories in the United States alone. Fifty companies spend $5 billion a year on this
clean.

Second, there aren’t many positive or negative studies. Employed to make pearl truffles
Advantages over coconut water can include hair transplantation and hair cell injections to
The scent you’ve always loved will feel like a joke, but it’s not. Of course, the fact that
Biotechnology is used in a variety of game-changing applications.
such as cosmetics and cleaning products;
New technology is powerful.

Third, the work is unsupervised. No one is paying attention to him. No federal law prohibits it. There's nothing there.
Government policies, in the United States or anywhere else in the world. And because things
From biotechnology to pharmaceuticals to agriculture to artificial ice, smart policy is hard.

But what is shocking is that there is no observer among the scientists. fluent
Fortunately, any scientist involved in the study of the human body is also employed
Biotechnology. There are no spectators. Everyone has a role.


Molecular biology marketing is the most controversial thing in history.
Science, and it ended with great success. four hundred years from Galilee;
Science is progressing as an open and honest inquiry into religion. scientists
They are constantly on the move, subjecting themselves to various threats
Politics and war. Scientists are always monitoring the research process and keep
They were excited about the idea of ​​trying their hands and seeing themselves in action
That’s for the good of everyone. And in many cases, the scientific
Special Interest.

In 1953, two researchers in England, James Watson and Francis Crook,
They explained the structure of DNA and its role as a key to the human soul.
Hundreds of years of experience to understand the world in education. He waits patiently.
that their gift goes to the good of mankind.

However, this did not happen. Thirty years later, almost all Watson and Crick
My neighbors were in a different company. Molecular Genetics Research
It was once a multi-million dollar project and we can finally find out
1953. Then from April 1976 onwards.

A meeting with Robert Swanson, Robert Swanson, legend.
Enter Herber Boyer, a biochemist at the University of California, Berkeley. The two men decided to .
He found a commercial company using Boyer’s gene-splicing technology. Their new company,
Genentech quickly became one of the largest and most successful genetic engineering companies.


It seemed like everyone wanted to be rich. Recommended for new companies
Almost every week, scientists are also called upon to conduct genetic research. In 1986, there were 362 professionals.
Of those, 64 are members of the National Academies and sit on advisory boards for biotechnology companies. The number
The number for those in government or consulting firms is often higher.

It is important to emphasize that this mindset shift is significant. In the past, it was complete
Experts have put forward a theory about the process. They were looking for money as a tool.
Not necessary, just good for customers. And do job interviews, even at well-known places.
Bell or IBM labs were among the few to have their own. Thus, the person
Pure scientists refer to the work of applied scientists and the
In everything. Their long-term guidelines protect the university scientists from contamination.
industrial relations and when there is a debate on technological issues, scientists do not agree on
they were there to talk about people's problems.

But that is no longer true. There are too few molecular biologists and too little research
Entities with which there is no business relationship. The old days are gone. Genealogical research is ongoing;
He was angrier than anything. But it’s done secretly, quickly, and for free.


At this stage of the industry, it’s probably not worth hiring a company as big as Universal
A Palo Alto Genetic Technologies Inc. it will be worth it. It’s also not surprising that genetic
The problem is not going to be solved. After that, Inghan’s trial was conducted in secret; that
The first event occurred in Central America, with not 20
People were there to see it. Of these, only a few survived.

Even in the early stages, when Gene Technologies International filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy on
The order of the San Francisco Superior Court on Oct. 5, 1989, did not appeal to the public. fluent
It proved to be for nothing: InGen is the third small U.S. biotech company to fail
year, and the seventh since 1986.
Japanese financial institutions, such as Hamaguri and Dansaka, are companies that
In this case, you cannot give information. To avoid redundant information, Daniel Ross, Cowan, Swan, and
Ross, Ingen’s assistant, also represents the Japanese employees. and the least
The Costa Rican vice-ambassador’s plea was heard from the front of the room. So it’s not a surprise.
that in a month, Ingen’s problems are solved with enthusiasm and cooperation.

The parties to this treaty, in addition to the relevant education authorities, signed
It’s an unfair contract, and no one is talking about what happened, but many
"InGen incident" The people in the "InGen incident" didn't sign, and probably talked about this beauty
The events took place on two days in August 1989 on a mountain in the northwest.
Costa Rica.


Jurassic Park
initial:
The raptor report


The rain fell on the sheets and pelted the roof of the hospital.
He screams into the car, rolling on the hard ground. Roberta Carter gasped, and
He looked out the window. In the hospital we cannot see the sea or the sea beyond.
It’s close to the right side. This is not what he was expecting when he arrived at the fishing village
Bahja Anasco, in western Costa Rica, spent two months training as a doctor.
Bobby Carter looks forward to sunshine and laughter after two tumultuous years at home
Emergency treatment at Michael Reese’s in Chicago.

He had been in Bahja Anasco for three weeks. And it rained every day.

Everything else was fine. Bahja Anasko enjoyed being alone and having friends.
subject. Costa Rica has a top 20 medical system in the world, and they are the best.
On the west side, the hospital is well equipped and well maintained. Her husband, Manuel
Arag6n, he was wise and virtuous. Bob was able to use a number of different medications.
Which he did in Chicago.

But the rain! The rain never stops!


Manuel shakes his head in the classroom. "Listen," he said.

"Honey, | listen," Bob said.

"No. Listen."

And then he heard it, another sound mixed in with the rain, a deep, sharp and
Until it started: helicopter music. They’re not good,” he said.
It comes back to moments like this.

But the sound gets louder, and the helicopter slides into the sand.
He screamed, panicked and came back. He saw a helicopter hovering over the water.
near the fishing boats, then go to the other side of the treehouse, and back
Beach.

He was looking for a place to land.

An oversized Sikorsky bird with a blue stripe on the wings and the words “InGen
repair." This is the name of the repair process that creates a new location
Mountains by the sea. The resort is said to be very luxurious and very luxurious; quite
The locals were engaged in construction, which took two
birthday. Bob can imagine American holidays with pools and
A tennis court where guests can play and drink their drinks
The real life of the city.

Bobby wonders what goes so far on this island for a helicopter to be here.
weather. In the skyline, he saw the pilot breathing a sigh of relief as the helicopter took off.
The sand of the sea. The men in uniform ran out and opened the door. fluent
He heard shouts in Spanish and Manuel nodded.

They call a doctor.


Two black sailors are holding a skull nearby and a white man is screaming. clean
The man is wearing a blue robe. The red stripe appears on the back of the Mets baseball jersey. "Is there a
Doctor here?” he said, stepping to his feet.

"I'm Dr. Carter," he said. Huge amounts of rain fell and covered his head and neck. that
The black man was shocked. He was wearing shorts and a t-shirt. There was
He has a stethoscope, and the man avoids the salt air.

"Ed Regis. We have a sick child here, Doctor."

"Then you better take him to San Jose," she said. San Jose was gone in just twenty minutes.
With the wind.

"We can, but we can't cross the mountains right now. You need to heal here."

Bobby stood by the injured man as he was taken to the hospital. As a child, no.
who are older than eighteen years. She lifted her black dress and saw a big dick
And another by his feet.

"What happened?"

"Bloody accident," Ed yelled. "He fell. A piece of furniture hit him."

The black boy, blushing, looked sad.

Manuel stood by the hospital doors, holding his hand. The people brought the night.
and he set it on the table in the midst of the room. Manuel started off on a journey through the woods, and
Bobby turned on the little boy and looked at his body. Suddenly, he was able to see
If not. The child will surely die.

A huge blow shot through his shoulder and shot through his body. at the gate of pain;
The meat was dirty. In the middle, the spine was broken and the bones were shattered. The second
The flap is incised along the thigh bones and superiorly to expose the femoral pulse.
inferior artery. His first thought was that his leg was broken.

"Tell me about this problem again," he said.

"|I don't see it," Eddie said. "They said Coke killed her."

"Maybe he got shot," Bobby Carter said, looking around the room. like
Most emergency physicians can vividly recall the patients they saw
year after year. He saw two men. One of them was a two-year-old boy who collapsed.
by a Rottweiler. Other people studied the circus and copied
Bengal tiger. Both injuries have their causes. It has a long history of Bengal.


"Molyde?" Ed said. "No, no. A kiss on the cheek, trust me." Eddie sighed and said. fluent
He blushed, acting like he didn’t do anything wrong. Bobby asked why. If they work
The civil servants, who have no experience in the construction of housing estates, must be at a disadvantage all the time.

Do you need collagen? Manuel said.

"Yes," she said. "After you thought."

He bent down and traced the wound with his thumb. When the earth is dry.
There was garbage in Jagan’s body. But it’s not dirty, just a few hints.
The flower is represented by the needle, a kind of needle, the flower of death and life. Heart
I've never smelled that.

How long has it been?

"An hour."

Again, he noticed Ed Regis' expression. He was one of those people who was scared and worried. and
He’s not like a construction manager. He is like a leader. Obviously, he was in his
background.

Bobby Carter came back from a tragedy. Somehow he didn't think he
It’s a mechanical problem. It just doesn’t make sense. The peritoneal cavity is not contaminated and there is no obstruction.
component of pain. Any car failure is a factory failure - almost always
He got involved in some losses. But there is no one here. However, the man was skinny.
He was cut -shot- in the shoulder and again in the chest.

She was like the real Molly. On the other hand, most of their bodies are intact, which means
the cruelty to animals. He looked at his head again, his hands -

sleeve.

He felt starstruck when he saw the child's picture. They both have a way
Their hands and their hands and their hands. He’s worked in Chicago long enough to hea
What does this mean.

"Okay," he said. "Wait outside."

"why?" Eddie said he was afraid. He didn't like it.

"Do you want me to help him or not?" he said, pushing the door open and closing it.
forward. He didn't know what was going on, but he didn't like it. Manuel was shocked. "|Translated
To wash?

"Yes," she said. He waved his hand at little Olympus. It took a long time
Changes the brightness of each pain image to improve contrast. It’s like a real event,” he said.
The boy shouted as he put down his camera and smiled at him. His mouth twitched.
The mouth is out.

“Raptor,” he said. "It's Raptor . . ."

With that, Manuel obviously recoiled in horror.

"What does that mean?" Bobby said.

Manuel shook his head. "I don't know Dr. 'Lo Sa Rapto'-no Espax."

"I don't?" It sounds like Spanish. "Then go with it."

"Yes Doctor." He pursed his lips. "It smells bad." And he cut himself.

Bobby looked at the black hole on his lap again. He touched it and touched it.
between the thighs. It was like a tail. .. .

The doors to the injured child swung open. "Raptor," he said.

Manuel said in a frightened voice, "It's over."

"What's wrong?"

"Raptor."

"What's a raptor?" "fluent

It means hippie.

Bobby rubbed his eyes. Costa Ricans are not very religious, but he heard some words
hupia spoken in the West anciently. The angels of old are said to have been
The kids get it. According to their beliefs, the Hippias lived in the mountains of
Costa Rica, but they live on islands off the coast.

Manuel turns around, talks and breaks down. "It's not a good thing that smells bad," she said.
said. "That's hippie."

Bobby was about to tell him to go back to work when the injured boy opened his eyes and sat down
On the table. Manuel screamed in fear. The injured boy sighed and shook his head.


He looked left and right with big, bloodshot eyes. What
Suddenly, her body started shaking and she grabbed Bobby, but he was still shaking.
From the table to the floor. He threw it again. There was blood everywhere. Ed opened his mouth.
door, “What’s going on?” And when Joel saw it, he turned back.
hand to mouth. Bobby reaches for the barrel to grab the boy’s mouth, but
He did, knowing he didn't, and he was shocked and disappointed.

She rushed to the door, but Manuel grabbed her by the waist and pulled her back.
back. "No," she said. "The hoopia is passing."

"Manuel, for God's sake-"

"I don't." He looked at her angrily. "No, you don't understand that."

Bobby looked at his body and knew it was bad; there is no
He can be resurrected. Manuel called the men, who went back into the house and
The body is removed. Eddie pulled out and wiped his mouth with the back of his hand and whispered, "I trust you
Do what you do best.
He turned and went into the house.

"Better," Manuel said.

Bobby stares at the boy's hands. He covered himself with his clothes, in
Patterns of defensive wounds. He was convinced that she was not dead.
Construction accidents; She was under attack, baring her tentacles at his attack.
"Where did you come from on this island?" he asked.

"At sea. Probably a hundred and twenty miles offshore," "Far from home."
she said.

Manuel looked at the helicopter. "I hope it doesn't come back."

Well, you guessed it, there are even pictures. But when he returned to the table, he
that his camera was there.


It finally rained that night. Alone in his room outside the hospital, Bobby laid down.
Through his Spanish dictionary. The boy said "raptor," and although
Manuel’s threats were, I think, Spanish. Yes, he found it in
dictionary. It means "prey" or "evil".

It gave him happiness. The definition of the word is not well defined by the word hippie.
Of course, he didn't open the door. And no demon had ever broken the branches of that tree. is
Was the boy trying to warn him?

Near the house he heard a noise. A southern female was added in the first quarter of 2018.
service, and Elena Morales, the community midwife, is in charge. Bobby was hospitalized.
And he motioned for Elena to climb up immediately.

"Elena…."

"SJ Doctor?"

"Do you know what a raptor looks like?"

Elena was dark-haired and in her mid-thirties, a strong, ruthless woman. On
At night, under the stars, he looked up at the sky  and said, "Rapper?"

"Yeah, do you know that word?"

"Sj." Elena shook her head. "That's basically ... someone comes in at night and hits a child."

The kidnapper?

"Yes."

"A hippie?"

His whole body changed. "No, doctor."

"why not?"

"Don't talk about Hoopia right now," Elena said sternly, shaking her head in disappointment.
A working woman. "We can't say that now."

"But the retort he sends and brings to his men?"

"Come and leaves?" Elena said, shocked. "No, doctor. It's nothing like that. He's a normal person."
It’s a new baby.”
I went to the hospital. "I'll call you when I do, Doctor. | Expect another hour, preferably two."


Bobby looked up at the stars and could hear the waves crashing against the shore. On
In the darkness he saw the shadows of fishing boats on the shore. Everything else is
He’s short-tempered, quiet, likes to talk about vampires and babies.

Bobby returned to his apartment and realized that Manuel confirmed that he did not
words in Spanish. Out of curiosity, he turned to the Little English Dictionary and commented:
Check out the news there:


raptor \ n [Dr. of L. Report Ponder, Fr. Raptus]: bird feather.


First line


On the first row of the binary graph, there is little evidence of
The first mathematical concept will be obvious.


Hi Malcolm
almost
paradise


Mike Bowman smiles with his thumb while driving a Land Rover in Cabo Blanc
Biological Reserve, western Costa Rica. It was a beautiful July morning, and
The trail was beautiful: kissing a rock, looking out over the forest and blue
The Pacific. According to the tour guide, Cabo Blanco is an unspoilt wilderness, just like a paradise.
Looking back now, Boman was reminded that the holidays were back on the road.

Bowman, a 36-year-old Dallas native, came to Costa Rica with
His wife and daughter are going on vacation in two weeks. The road is truly his wife’s; Every week.
Ellen keeps her ear to the ground about Costa Rica’s beautiful national parks and how beautiful they are.
Tina could see them. And when they arrived, she told Ellen that she had something to see
He paints outside in San Jose. It was the first Mike Bohmer did something great and
Surgery Surgery is the cheapest in Costa Rica, and we buy all the private hospitals


In fact, they had a huge fight and Mike felt betrayed by her and vice versa. and he set his feet upon the earth.
Even the PlayStation service. Anyway, luckily, Ellen is thirteen and
She was a very beautiful woman. Hell, she was a princess in her old age in Russia and
It hasn't happened in ten years. But Ellen was shocked and upset. And that’s how
As in previous years, he was worried about keeping his scent.

That, and everything.

The Land Rover crashed into a ditch and was covered in dirt. Sitting next to her, Elena said, "Mike
Are you sure that’s right? We didn't see anyone else for hours.”

"There was another car 15 minutes away," he recalled. Remember the blue car?

"I'm going the other way.. ."


"Honey, all you want is a vacation," she said, "and that's what you're going to get."

Elena nodded in agreement. "| I hope you're right."

"Yes, sir | I hope you're clean" Christina said from the back seat. He was eight years old.

"Trust me, I'm fine." He drove in silence for a while. "Is that good? See how you look. That's
beautiful."

"Okay," Tony said.

Ellen got out of the room and looked at herself in the mirror and rolled her eyes. fluent
He took a deep breath and stepped out of the room.

The track started to go downhill and Mike Baumer stayed in control of the car. A little nervous.
A flash of red light flashed down the street and Tina yelled, "Look out! Look out!" And he went out, and departed.
issue.

"What does it mean?" Ellen asked. A brain?

“It can be a joke,” Bowman said.

"Can you ask?" Tina said, taking out her pencil, marking a number of animals.
In fact, he treated his trip as the work of the school.

"|I don't know," Mike said with a sigh.

Tina looked at the pictures in the presentation book. "|Don't think of it as a joke," he said.
"| I thought it was another voice." They had seen many animals barking on their way.

"Hey," she said cheerfully. “As the book says, ‘Seas of Cloud Blanc
Several species of wildlife roam here, including bald eagles and white-tailed, three-legged squirrels.
and Covatamid.' "Do you think we'll see a three-legged teacher, sir?"

"|We will."

"really?"

"Just look in the mirror."

"It's very scary."

The trail leads from the forest to the sea.


Mike Bowman felt like a star when they hit the beach: White Two Kilometers
arena, running. You parked the Land Rover in the hemlock grove.
water, and canned food. Ellen changed into her underwear and said, "Yes | no
You know how I feel.

"You're welcome, my love." Sure, he thought she was a little young, but he had learned not to say it.
that.

Tina was already walking to the beach.

“Don’t forget you have to wear your sunglasses,” Ellen said.

"Later," Tina said over her shoulder. "I'll go see if there's a fight."

Ellen Bowman looks out over the water, at the trees. "Do you think it's okay?"

"Damn there's no one here for miles," Mike said.

"What about snakes?"

"Oh for God's sake," Mike Bowman said. "There are no snakes on the water."

"Okay, okay…."

"Amiel," she said thoughtfully. "Snakes are bloodthirsty. They are creatures. They cannot be trusted
Hot body. Ninety degrees outside. When the snake comes out, it bites. believe
I. There are no snakes on the beach." He saw his daughter running towards the shore
A black stripe on a white background. "Let him go." Let her go.

He put his hand on his wife's pussy.


Tina kept going until she was exhausted, then threw herself on the sand in excitement.
He walked to the water. The sea was rough and there was no water. He sat down.
For a moment, she held her breath, then looked back at her parents and the car to see
where he had lived.

The mother looked at her hand and called her back. Tina gladly waved her hand, making sure she didn't.
understand. Tina didn't want to wear the sun. And he would not return, nor hearken unto her voice.
My mom is talking about losing weight. She wanted to stay here and maybe see a black man.

Tina had seen Lazy two days earlier at the San Jose Animal. It’s like the Muppet
type, and it seems like no big deal. However, he couldn't move; He could easily run away with it.


Now, with her mother calling, Tina decided to go for the day and come back.
water, in the shade of palm trees. On one side of the pond, mango trees bloom
the presence of mangrove roots prevents access to the land. Tina sat in the dust.
and remove dried mangrove leaves. He saw some bird tracks in the dirt. In Costa Rica.
His sheep knew him. Documents say there are three times more birds in Costa Rica than there were in the 1990s.
Throughout the United States and Canada.

Of course, there are some rare birds that are too small to be
seen. Other roads were steep and through the mud. Tina looks at them.
Just then he heard a crash, and then another crash through the trees.

Did the unemployed take out a crust? Tina didn't think so, but she didn't believe it. Kurt came
Maybe a sea urchin. He waited in silence, without smiling, to hear the voice again, at last.
He looked past the sounds a few yards away and a dead body emerged from the depths of the mangrove.
And he tried.

Tina held her breath. New pet on your list! The dog got up on his hind legs and read.
She shook her head, looking at him. It stood like that, a long, black and
Red bands on the back. The small eyeballs are formed in the small nostrils that move in the air.
The butterfly raised its head and looked.

Tina thought it was cute. It looks like a big salmon. He raised his hand and shook it.
under their hands.

His smile was fearless. He walked towards her with bare feet. It was difficult.
It was bigger than a chicken, and it shook its head like a chicken when it walked. Tina thought it was.
You know right.

He saw that the reptile had left three scratches that looked like bird droppings. infant
He approached Tiny. He hugged his body, not wanting to scare the little animal. Heart
He was surprised that he could get so close, but then he remembered that this was a national park. All this
The animals in the park are known to be dangerous. These three probably got it. Very good
She hoped to give him some food. Unfortunately, he didn’t get it. Slowly, Tina pulled away.
His hand, folded, to show that he had no food.

The butterfly twitched, raised its head, and flew away.

"I'm sorry," Tiny said. "I don't have anything."

And, unexpectedly, the squirrel pounced on his outstretched arm. Tina can think.
His little fingers touched the flesh of his hands, and he felt a weird pressure on the animal’s body.
Put it down.

The clown waved his hand.


"|I just want to see you," said Ellen Bowman, squinting in the sunlight. "That's it. Just look at it."
your."

"It's really good," Mike said as he picked out hotel food. I was
The fried chicken is bad and the pans are full of meat. Not if Ellen has a pussy.
fluent.

"Do you think he doesn't leave the tub?" Ellen said.

"No, ma'am. | No."

"| I'm doing it here," Elena said.

"|I think that's what you want," Mike Bomer said.

"| He did."

"Well, what's wrong?"

"| I just want to see, that's all," Ellen said.

Then, on the other side of the sea, howled by the wind, they heard their daughter’s screams. Heart
To cry.


Puntarenas
"I think he's okay now," Dr. Cross, reducing the oxygen atoms


She snuggled against Tina and fell asleep. Mike Bowman was sitting on the edge of the bed next to his daughter. Mike thought.
Fortunately Drs. Cross; He spoke fluent English, having studied medical


Clubs in London and Baltimore. Dr. Cruz promotes the church and church of Santa Marja
The new hospital in Puntarenas is not simple or easy.

But still, Mike Bohmer hesitates. There is nothing like that.
Her daughter became seriously ill and was far from home.

When Mike first met Tina, she squealed with excitement. Entire right hand
There was blood, covered in tiny splotches, each the size of a palm. And there was
In his hands, like tears.

He drove his car into the ditch. Suddenly, his hands began to turn red and itchy.
Mike never forgets the car that drove around town for a while, a four-door Land Rover.
She walked and walked along the dirt road in the mountains, and her daughter screamed in terror and
Pain, and his arm had turned red and swollen. Before they reached the park boundary.
The tumor had spread to her lungs, and Tina began to lose consciousness. . . .

"Will you be okay now?" Ellen said, looking into the oxygen tank.

"| Believe it," said Dr. Cross. "| He gave her another medicine, and her spirit was healed.
It's very straightforward. And you can see that the thumb on his hand drops a lot.

“As for the parts…” Mike Bowman said.

"We don't have an official name," the doctor said. "| I don't know anything like that myself."
But you see them disappearing. It’s already hard to get rid of them. happy |
They took pictures to look at. and | He washed his hands to pick up some
Sticky milk – one for testing here, a second sent to the lab in San Jose, and a third we
He will rest if necessary. Do you have the picture he made of you?”

“Yeah,” Mike Bowman said. The picture Tina drew of answering the doctor.
in questions involving parents.

Is this the animal that ate him? said Dr. Cruz when he saw the wire.

“Yeah,” Mike Bowman said. "He said the turtle was brown, almost like a dog or a crocodile."

"|I don't know what that is," said the doctor. "He wrote it on the back of his hand . . ."

"That's a problem," Mike Baumer said. "He said he was walking on his hind legs."

Dr. Cruz snorted. He looked at the picture for a moment. "| I'm not an expert. I asked the doctor.
Gittier joins us here. He is a member of the Reserve Biol¢Juco de Carrara, the
from the sea. "You can train the dog for us."

No one in Cape Blanc? Bowman asked. "That's where you forgot."

"Unfortunately, no," says Dr. Cross. “Cabo Blanco does not have permanent staff or teachers.
He worked there for a while. You may have been one of the first people to visit this beach in the 1990s.
Many months. but | I am sure you will see Dr. Gutierrez is very knowledgeable.

Dr. Gutierrez described himself as a well-built man with a beard and khaki pants. The fear was
if you are an American. He appeared before the Bowmans, and said in a whisper, “Mr.
And Mrs. Bowman, as you say, we'd love to hear from you. He then explained that it was a dragon claw.
biologist who has worked in Costa Rica for the past five years. Marty Gutierrez
He studied Tina, raising his hand slowly, looking at each line.
penlight, then focus on them with a small brush. Some time later, Gutierrez appeared,
He shakes his head as if he understands. Then he looked at polar bears and
He asked more questions about the animal, and Cruz told him it was being tested in a lab.

He finally turns to Mike Bowman and his wife, who are concerned. "I think Tina will be fine."
| “I just want to clarify a few things,” she said, taking notes in a group. "They
The daughter said she was bitten by a one-legged animal that was walking
Are you eating on the beach instead of mangrove water?

"So, yeah."

"And the squirrel made a plan?"

"Tina said she was yelling and screaming."

"Like a dog, you say?"

"Yes."

"It looks good," Dr. said. Gutierrez, "| Take a look at this situation." He explained that one of six thousand
There are many species of turtles in the world, and many species of migratory insects. Among these species,
There are only four in Latin America. And judging by their features, the dragon could be one.
On four. "| I'm pretty sure this bat is Basiliscus amoratus, a species of dry bats found here


Costa Rica and Honduras as well. When they stand on their hind legs, they can sometimes look like
foot."

Are they poisonous?

"No, Miss Bowman, no." Gutierrez explained that the punch to the right hand
Allergic reactions. “According to the literature, fourteen percent of the healthy
Dragons, he said, and apparently your wife was one of them.

"She was crying, she said she was so sorry."

“That’s it,” Gutierrez said. "The adrenal glands contain serotonin, which controls aggression
pain." He whispered to Crusoe. "Did his body go down with histamine poisoning?"

"Yeah," Cruz said. "rush."

“Serotonin,” Gutierrez said. "It's not a question."

However, Ellen Bowman was undaunted. "But why did he bite the dragon in the first place?"

“The dirt is too hard to clean,” Gutierrez said. “The shepherds are screaming in the wild.
schedule. and sometimes | He heard that a fox had caught a baby in his house in Amaloy .
50 miles from where you live. That’s how the problem happens. I don’t know why your daughter is so big
Bite. What were you doing then?”

"It's nothing. He said he was sitting down because he didn't want to disturb you."

"I'm fine," Gutierrez said, looking surprised. He shook his head. "Okay. | I don't think we should say
What really happened. Wild animals are not smart.

"And what about the tail?" Ellen said. "| Always think about the bottom line. . . ."

"No, no," Dr. said. Gutierrez. "Heaven  forbid the press, Ms. Bowman. Your daughter is
She had an allergic reaction to a watermelon. There is nothing worse than this.”

Mike Boman showed Gutierrez the photo he had taken of Tina. Gutierrez shook his head. "AM
He takes it like a bass drum," he said. "A few times it’s awkward, for sure.
His tail was very long, and he was able to hold his tail with only three fins on his back.
It's very long and very deep. But if not, this is a shifter that might work
That’s what we’re talking about.

“But Tina said language means a lot,” Ellen Boman said. "And that's
He had three feet."

“Tina is a great observer,” Mike Bowman said.

"I'm sure it's true," Gutierrez said, laughing. "But | remember your daughter was sent
amoratus basilisk common, and was considered a highly specialized hertological species. It’s a great opportunity to learn from
The treatment was twelve hours. It should be fine in the morning.


In the modern laboratory, just outside the Santa Maria Hospital, he said Drs.
Gutierrez sees the animal that bit the American boy as a monster
lizard. Serum analysis was immediately normal, although an initial history of
It has characterized many high-molecular-weight proteins with unknown structural activities. but
The night technician was on duty and placed samples of soup in trays.
fridge.

The next morning, the day crew searched the store for signs of the missing.
patients. He saw that BOWMAN, CHRISTINA L. had to go this morning, the .
The author collects the saliva samples. At the end of the day, he noticed that a sample containing
it appears that it was obtained from the laboratory at the University of San Jose,. She received the diagnosis
from the ground and put it on its way.


"Go. Say thank you to Dr. Cruz," Ellen Bowman said, pulling Tina forward.

"Thank you, Dr. Cruz," Tina said. "I'm fine now." He reached out and touched the place.
His doctor family. Then he said, "You have another drake."

At one time Drs. Cruz was shocked; Then he laughed. "That's it, Tina. When | all services
Hospital night, morning | Change my clothes.

"But not your tie?" "I don't.

A n-shirt.

Ellen Bowman said, "Mike told you he was watching."

"That's true." Dr. Cruz smiled and slapped the girl's ass harder. "You can rejoice in everything
Welcome to Costa Rica, Tina.


"I will."

Bowman’s family had begun to leave when Dr. Cross: "Obe, Tina, remember
The kid who spit on you?

"Okay."

"Remember?"

"Okay."

Do you have any legs?

"Yes."

How many hands does he have?

"Three," he said.

"How do you know?"

"Yes | look," he said. "Anyway, all the shorebirds are signaling in the sand with
He held out his hand, three fingers half squeezing. "And good
He also made these marks in the sand.

"Did the shark make a mark like a bird?"

"Uh-huh," Tiny said. "He also walks like a bird. He moves his head up and down."
He took a few sips and shook his head.

After the Bomans left, Drs. Cruz decided to give Gutierrez the information,
Biology Station.

"|He must have been willing to accept the girl's message," Gutierrez said. "|We did some research
myself. | I can’t believe the basil smoked. It doesn't matter."

"What can be done?"

"No," Gutierrez said, "let's not talk away. Anyway, have you ever heard of a
Was anyone else hurt in the hospital?

"No, why?"

"Tell me, my friend, if you do."


Beach;


Marty Gutierrez sat on the beach and watched the afternoon sun in the sky  until it was too late.
It shone on the water of the bay, its light reaching beneath the palm trees;
He sat among the mangroves off the coast of Cape Blanca. He could decide how to be
He was sitting where the American woman had been two days earlier.

Although it’s true, as he told the Bowmans, that spiders do more damage.
Gutierrez had never heard of a basilisk biting a human. And he had never heard of it.
Anyone admitted to the hospital with a sore throat. Moreover, the radius of inheritance from the right
Older than Uncle Basil, when he arrived at Carrara Gate and saw Fit
There is an official library, but it is not to be found on any website about the history of the Basilica. Then he looked
International Bioscience Server, a database in the United States, but without a specific
Taking too many drugs, or being hospitalized for a kidney infection.

She then called the nurse, Amalo, who saw a 9-day-old boy.
He was lying on his back, his leg bitten by a dog, his own.
It’s safe to say it’s a joke. Then her leg swelled and so did the baby.
He was about to die. The boy said the bird was black with blue eyes. That’s the meaning
Child many times before the woman.

"All right," Gutierrez said.

"No, just like everyone else," the paramedic said, adding that he heard another scream.
Incident: A child in V squez, a coastal village, screamed in his sleep. and
another is at the Sotrero Gate. This has all happened in the last couple of months. Everyone
She was surrounded by sleeping babies and children.

This new animal made Gutierrez wonder if there was an old
Living animals don’t know. This was done in Costa Rica. Only seventy-five.
Millions of miles smaller, the country is smaller than the state of Maine. However, in the
Because of its small land mass, Costa Rica has some of the most unique wildlife habitats: estuaries
Atlantic and Pacific, four ranges of mountains, summits twelve thousand feet;
And the fire works; rainforest, cloud forest, humid, humid, and desert


dry land. This complex ecosystem has sustained a rich diversity of plant and animal life.
Costa Rica has three times more horse farms than the rest of North America. must
A large species of orchid. There are five species of animals.

New species are being discovered all the time at an increasing rate in recent years.
For a bad reason. Costa Rica is deforesting because wild animals lose their habitat;
They moved to other places and sometimes changed their attitude.

So new species were able to form. But with the joy of the new.
New disease of depression. Animals carry bacterial diseases, mostly
It can be passed from person to person. The problem is central cerebral edema, or CSE, which is
This led to a form of disease in humans and horses. Gutierrez felt it was important to
To see this new bug, if possible, look for diseases.

He sat on the beach, watching the sunset and soaking it up. Maybe Tina is great.
Look at a new animal and it may not be there. Now, Gutierrez did not. This morning it was
He took the windmill, flipped the paint, and proudly headed for the beach.
But time is running out. Soon he had to drive up the mountain from the desert;
He didn’t want to go into the dark.

Gutierrez got up and started walking to the beach. In the distance, something black.
yelled the creature that walked through the door of the Red Princess. Gutierrez changed
He's going into the water. If there is a sound, it is likely that there is another
Up in the trees, red foxes howled at people.

But this monkey was screaming the same way alone, moving slowly and stopping.
He sits on his back a lot. There is something at the door of the tomb. As Gutierrez
He approached her, eating cheese. The neck and spine are separated from the bones.
Even in the distance, Gutteridge could see streaks of dust on the ground.

Gutierrez fell to the ground and the gun was fired. Screaming Monkey, I know.
Those who live in vulnerable areas are at a disadvantage. He couldn’t even run when the first train
he shouted as he left. As the second train pulled through the tunnel, the
Angry and surprised, he left all his food behind and ran into the woods.

Gutierrez got back up and walked forward. He didn't care about his friend; that
The dose of tranquilizer was too small to give him anything for only a few minutes of stomach relief. It was almost over.
She wonders what to do with her newfound money. Gutierrez himself wrote the first draft of the book, but
Others need to return to the United States for a better recovery
course. To whom should he send it? The most famous teacher was Edward H. Simpson.
New York, professor of veterinary medicine at Columbia University, New York. good old man and
colored white, Simpson was the world’s leader in the color scheme. bridge,
Marty decided to send his clothes to Dr. Samson.


New York


Dr. Richard Stone, Director, Columbia University Medical Laboratory
The Centre, however, admitted that yesterday it had a larger area than expected. On
In the late 20th century, the laboratory occupied the entire fourth floor of the biomedical building
In the laboratory, the research team worked to eradicate the yellow fever virus.
Malaria and tuberculosis. But medical and research labs are good in Nairobi and rural
Polo-Con has put TDL on a less important footing than it once was. Now it's part of the equation
Because of this, there are only two full-time employees, and these guys enjoy the
Survey of diseases of New Yorkers who have emigrated. Laboratory work included
He wasn't prepared for what he saw in the morning.

"Oh, it's so simple," the rabies lab technician said  and continued.
Dunne’s signal. "It's a remote and unexplored part of Costa Rica." It’s beautiful.
Reception. "That's all for you, Dr. Stone."

Richard Stone walked around the lab and watched the newcomers. "That's one thing Eddie
The Simpson Trial?

"Yes," she said. "But | I don't know why you sent us a butterfly."


"His secretary called," Stone said. Simpson spends the winter in Borneo, and
Because the patient had an issue with the procedure, she contacted our laboratory to
He took it. Let's see what we've got, chij.

The white plastic cylinder was about a half-gallon in capacity and had a metal lid.
latches and top screw. It’s called “International Biological Specimen” and
The stickers and messages are available in four languages ​​and the messages are designed to
cylinder to open for the unscrupulous world leaders.

The reporters did, and when Richard Stone turned on the big torch, he could see the flames.
Gases were still present. The rock is put on air compressors and put on gloves and
Face mask. Subsequently, the laboratory analyzed contaminated samples from Venezuela
Miniature horse, Japanese hepatitis B, Kayasanur thu virus, Langat virus, Mayaro. then
Make heaven.

There was the sound of escaping gas and white smoke. The cylinder has turned black.
cold. Inside, he found a box of sandwiches from the lock with something shiny inside. Rocks are scattered.
Returns the size of the page. A piece of grilled red meat.
table with a loud noise.

“Huh,” you said. "Like eating."

"Yeah," Stone said. "What do they want?"

The technician reviews the printed form. "My son is bullying the neighborhood kids."
Investigation of animal welfare and infectious diseases
He posted a picture of a child on the street, with the words TINA written on the back. "A child .
Baby picture."

Stone looked at the picture. "Obviously, we shouldn't be testing on animals," Stone said. "But we know
Diseases can be easily diagnosed by taking a blood sample for this drug. What do they say?
This dog?

"'Basilicus amoratus with three breath-holds,'" she said, read.

"Okay," Stone said. "Let's go. While you wait for him to show up, take an X-ray and take
Polaroid printed. Once the blood is drawn, we start making antibodies until we get some
Friend. Tell me if there is a problem.


Just before lunch, the labs got the answer: dialysis didn’t make a difference.
Bacterial or bacterial infection. They also ran venom profiles and found only one.
Dear Friend: Blood was a little too sensitive to the Kabra King’s venom. but yea
Cross-reactivity is a difference between individual animals and Drs. Stone doesn’t think it’s a coincidence
The assistant faxed it to Drs. Martin Gutteridge the same night.

There was never any question about the quality of football; Waiting for the doctor to come back.
Simpson. He didn’t come back for a few weeks and his secretary asked if TDL would
Make sure to keep the diagonal at this point. Dr. Stone put him in a box and
And he put it in the temple.


Martin Gutierrez read a statement from the Columbia Medical Center/Trump Diseases Laboratory. fluent
It should be: -


Source: Basilica Amortis and the Mathematical Education System
(taken from Dr. Simpson’s office)


Properties: _ background, ? Some animals eat.


Actions are done. X-ray, microscopy, immunohistochemistry for RTX;
Bacteria, parasites, bacterial infections.


Results: There was no histological or immunological evidence of previous infection in this case.
Specimens of Basiliscus amoratus .


(Sign)
Richard A. Stone, MD. , Director


Gittier made two comments on the plan. First, it means
Like the basilisk, it was discovered by scientists at Columbia University. And second, if
The fact that there is no bacterial infection means that the worms aren’t likely to come out, sometimes that means they don’t
Costa Rica’s health problems are great. But let’s assume that the first premise is true:
If a species of fox has been released from the forest to a new area, and it comes
Friendship with the villagers. Gutierrez is confident that in a few weeks, the changes will be
Remember and the results are below.


In 1990, heavy rains washed away the roof of the hospital.
Lower Anasco. It was almost midnight; Losing power in the storm, Elena from the island.
Morales was using a flashlight when he heard a noise. I think a
She was so scared, she immediately left her mother and went to another house.
To see the baby. As his hand reached for the door, he heard a command.
And he was shocked. Obviously the bird flew out the window to escape the rain. Coast
The Rukans said that if a bird came, the baby would bring good luck.

Elena opened the door. The baby lay in a crib, wrapped in a blanket, alone.
His face is white. Near the door, three dragons roared like gargoyles.
When they saw Elena, they raised their heads and looked at her curiously, but they didn't run away. On
The light of Elena's flashlight drew blood from their lips. He sighs, a laugh.
He bent down, quickly turned his head, and tore off a piece of the boy's flesh.

Elena paces forward, screaming, and the needles move into the darkness. But before the
When he reached his chest, he saw what was happening in the baby’s eyes and realized
The child must die. Children scattered through the rainy night, screaming and shouting, from
They have three hind legs, like birds.


Information Source


Later, when Elena Morales refused to say the dragon thing. Although
She was afraid she might get caught for abandoning the baby
No one waits. So she told her mother that the boy had been taken out and pronounced him dead.
Among the books she sent to San Jose was SIDS: Preventing Infant Deaths . This is a syndrome
unknown causes of mortality among children; It wasn’t that big and it was very sweet.
was not accepted.

San Jose lab analyzes Tiny Bowman’s embryo
His education is very good. There were as many syringes as there were. but between
Proteins are a problem: The molecule was one of the most popular proteins of the 1980s
acquaintance. Biological activity has not been studied, but is considered a neurotoxic toxin.
Cobras are venomous, no matter what they are.

The lab also checks levels of gamma-amine methibionine hydrolase. because
This enzyme is an example of genetic engineering and has not been transferred to wild animals, the technologists
He thought it was just a lab and didn’t say anything when Drs. Cross who plays
Dr. Pointers.

The tissue sits in a freezer at Columbia University, waiting for Drs. to return.
Simpson, who is not expected for a month. So things could have been had he
A Tropical Disease Laboratory technician named Alice Levine comes in and examines Tina.
Bowman is drawing, and says "Oh whose son drew the dinosaur?"

"than?" said Richard Stone, slowly getting frustrated with her.

"Dinosaurs. Right? My son models them all the time."

"It's a joke," Stone said. "From Costa Rica. A girl drew underneath."

"No," Alice Levy shook her head. "Look. It's so big. That big fat head is huge
The back of the neck. you dinosaur.

"It shouldn't be him. He's only a foot away."

"So? There were baby dinosaurs back then," Alice said. "Trust me, | he knows. | He has two children.
I am an expert. The smaller dinosaurs were under one foot. Tennisaurus or something like that, | I don't
expert. These names are invalid. "You can't learn these skills when you're ten."


"You don't understand," Richard Stone said. "This is a picture of a modern animal. They
He sent us a dog. He’s on the couch now.” Stone sighed and nodded.
Share.

Alice Levine looked at her legs and back. He didn't touch it. "|No
I know," he said. "But that sounds like a dinosaur to me.”

Stone shook his head. "impossible."

"why?" said Alice Levine. "They're good turtles or tortoises or whatever they call themselves."

Stone shakes his head. Alice didn't know; The technology that
She works in the bacteriology lab. And he had a clear purpose. stone
She remembers the time when she thought a project manager was following her. . ..

"You know," said Alice Levine, "if this were a dinosaur, Richard, it could be a big problem."

"It's not a dinosaur."

"Has anyone seen it. "No,"

who Stone.

"Well, take it to a museum or something," Alice Levy said. "You don't think so
should."

"I'm embarrassed."

Do you want me to do it for you? she said.

“No,” Richard Stone said. "|No."

"Can't you do anything?"

"It's nothing." She put the bag back in the freezer and slammed the door. "No
Dinosaurs, a song. Anyway, please wait until the Dr. comes back. Simpson to Borneo to
Hear. That’s the end, Alice. This garbage isn’t going anywhere.”


2nd iteration.


With any Frattle Law diagram, changes can be made quickly.


Ian Malcolm
Inner Harbor


Alan Grant hung his head, his mouth an inch off the ground. It gets very hot.
A hundred degrees. His legs hurt, even though he was wearing shoes. His lungs collapse.
Solid alkaline powder. He rubbed his chin on his chest. But Grant had forgotten
aggressive. His gaze focused on the six cardinals of the world in front of him.
Working patiently with a toothpick and an artist’s brush, he produced a small L-shape
A piece of tail. Only one leg is long and no longer than the knee. The thighs


a string of small hooks, and gave him the opportunity to learn] angling. The bone fragments are inserted as
dig. Grant took a moment to paint the bone with cement paste before the
be shown. It didn’t make sense that the eggs were a young carnivorous dinosaur.
Its owner died 39 million years ago when it was two months old. With all grace.
Granite can also change the look of the entire space. If it does, this is the perfect first scene.
Children eat meat -

"Oh God!"

Alan Grant blinked and looked into the sunlight. He took off his sunglasses and wiped them off.
neck and hands.

That’s on a shipwreck in the wrong town of Snakewater, Montana.
Beneath the  fire  blue sky, were mountains of broken rock.
It runs for miles in all directions. There were no trees or bushes. It’s nothing but a bad marriage.
The sun is hot and the wind howls.

Explorers viewed the landscape as unsafe, but when Grant visited the property,
He noticed something else. This infinite world is the other and different world.
which had been lost for eighteen million years. In his mind, Grant found himself
The warm, red ocean that became the mouth of a vast ocean. Mediterranean Sea
Thousands of miles, stretching all the way from the New Rock Mountains to
Dogs are native to Appalachia. All of South America was under water.

Meanwhile, small clouds were in the sky and had been obscured by smoke nearby.
Tractors. The air was thick with carbon dioxide. The plants are growing well.
The beach. There were no fish in these waters, but there were boats and sleds. Pterosaurs
He jumped to knock you to the ground. Some carnivorous dinosaurs roamed around.
On the banks of the river they walk among the palm trees. There was a small island offshore.
It’s about two acres. Covered in dense forest, the island is a perfect sanctuary.
where cannabis herbivores lay eggs in ponds and grow
Allow your children to cry.

Over millions of years ago, the green alkaline lake cooled and its
had disappeared. The solid earth cracks and breaks under the fire. And the island in the sea with its
Dinosaur eggs formed in an eroding volcano in northern Montana that is now Alan Grant
Gosling.

"Oh God!"

He stood with fourteen men with heavy coats and hats. He heard the laptop click.
Right, and the sound of a distant ball bouncing off a rock high on a famous mountain.
He watched the children working around the bag, removing the large black rocks
They looked at them with their eyes closed. At the top of the mountain, he sees six Tipis in his camp, feeling
a tent, and a trailer used as their agricultural laboratory. And he sees E ́li throw up his hand, and go
field laboratory flooring.

"And!" he said, smirking in the east.

Grant was a black and white Ford truck that drove on the dirt road
they. He looked at his watch: right on time. On another hill, the children stood up and waved.
The Snake Coast isn’t very visited, and there’s a lot of talk about it
The head of the Environmental Protection Agency wants Alan Grant to see about it.

But Grant knew that paleontology, the study of extinct life, had in recent decades
Not what one expects nowadays. The modern world is changing rapidly and with the
Questions include deforestation, global warming, and ozone depletion
Answer, at least, with historical information. Available information from innovation experts
give. He has twice been called as an expert witness in recent years.

Grant started down the hill behind the car.


The participant was rewarded with a white powder while knocking on the car door. “Bob Morris, EPA,” he said,
He waves his hand. "I'm in the San Francisco office."

Grant introduced himself and said, "Hey, do you want a beer?"

"Jesus like that." Maurice looked in his early 20s, wearing a tie and business suit.
He threw a stick. Their shoes clicked on the rocks as they walked towards
Thank you.


"When | I first came to the island, | I thought it was an Indian town," Morris said, pointing.
of Tipps.

"No," Grant said. "It's a great way to live here." Grant explained that in 1978, the first
During the Gonzalez’s years, they came from the west on a series of trips
available. But the flames were still in the air. They tried other types of tents.
Same answer. Eventually they started to have tipis, the roof was bigger, better and
It grows in the air. “It was Blackfoot Tipis, built around four corners,” Grant said. "Sue Tipps
It’s made around three. But this is Black County and we care. . ."

"Uh-huh," Maurice said. "It's good." He looked down at his body and held out his hand
head. "How long have you been here?"

“About 60 generations,” Grant said. When Maurice refused, he explained: “We count
time in beer. We started in June with a hundred people. We’ve gone through about sixty so far.

"Thirty-three, to be exact," said Ellie Sattler, as they reached the car. Grant sings.
Look at Morris’s face. Ellie is wearing a white dress and a long necklace in the middle. fluent
He was 24 and black. His black hair was pulled back.

"Ellie's getting us going," Grant said. "He knows what he's doing."

What am I doing? Morris asked.

"It smells old," Ellie said." "And | To do something about the show." He opened the door and
And they went in.

Headlights don’t lower the temperature down to eighty-five degrees, but
It was hot in the afternoon. There were long metal tables and small tables.
Healthy bone samples were weighed and weighed. contains the remote and
education. It has a vinegary smell.

Mor ris looked at Bones. "I think dinosaurs are cool," he said.

“They are,” Ellis said. "But everything you see here is for children. Snake water
It’s important because there are so many dinosaur fossils here. Until this starts
In practice, the little dinosaurs are unpredictable. Only a breath leaves him.
The Gobi Desert. We saw a dozen specimens with limbs and bones.
For the children.”

After Grant went under the knife, he discovered the acid-collagen powders from Mauritius that use
to remove carbons from their tissues.

"They're like pig bones," Morris said, admiring the back of his neck.

"Yes," she said. "They look like birds."

"And what about them?" Morris said, pointing to the pavement at the edge of a large pile of bones.
On top, dressed in heavy metal.

"It was a shot," Ellis said. "The bones were crunching when we took them down, old man
We were able to remove it a few days later, but now we are sending it to the courts for further investigation.

"Math exam?" Morris said.

"Take it with you," Grant said, putting a beer in his pocket. She gave another one to Elijah. fluent
He took a deep breath. Maurice looked at him.

"We didn't hear it here," Grant said. Do you want to come into my office?

"Yes," Maurice said. He led Grant to the sidewalk, where a volunteer was sitting
A well-kept desk, a well-maintained table. Grant fell to the floor and screamed.
Then he released a cloud of dust. He leaned back and dropped his shoe on the back table.
He motioned for Morris to sit on the couch. "Relax."

Grant is a professor of genetics at the University of Denver and one of its leading authorities.
his teachers, but he didn’t remember with the big guys. He looked at himself.
as an outsider, and he knew there were important responsibilities ahead.
and their relationships. Grant has no fear of scientists, museum curators, why
He summoned the Teak Dinosaurs. And he tried to get rid of the cloth and
A twist permeates Teacup Dinosaur Hunters , even in their conversations in gin and fun.

Grant watched Maurice fidget with his chair before taking a bite. Maurice
She opened her bag and looked through it before turning back to Ellie, who was operating the elevator.
With the bones and length behind the tap paper, they shouldn’t;
"You may know why I'm here."

Grant shook his head. "It's a long way, Mr. Morris."


“Well,” Morris said, “to be sure, the EPA considers these projects
Hammond Foundation. You get some money from them.

"Fifty thousand dollars a year," Grant agreed. "For the last five years."

What do you know about music? Morris said.

Grant raised his hand. "The Hammond Foundation is a wonderful source of support for education. They are."
Education funding worldwide, there are many educational jobs. | They just knew they were helping Bob.
Kerry sent Tyrell to Alberta and John Weller to Alaska. Maybe more."

"You know how the Hammond Foundation funds a lot of dinosaur research?" Maurice
asked.

"Yeah. Probably because John Hammond has the tail of a dinosaur."

"Are you Hammond?"

Grant raised his hand. "Once or twice. He comes here to hang out a bit. He's older, you know."
And eccentric, as rich people sometimes are. But it was always a lot of fun. why?"

“Well,” Morris said, “the Hammond Foundation is a secret society.” fluent
He pulled out a map of the world marked with red dots and handed it to Grant. "These
digs was funded last year. Do you notice anything different about them? Montana Alaska
Canada, Sweden .. . They are all in the east. Nothing under forty-five hours.
Morris took out a sheet of paper. "It's the same every year. There are dinosaur projects in the West, in
In Utah or Colorado or Mexico, you don’t make any money. The Hammond Foundation only helps during the summer.
Time Management. We want to know why.

Grant quickly checked them out. If it is true that the source only refers to the star
chronology, however, is a mistake, because some of the best dinosauri
Use it in hot weather, and -

“And I have another friend,” Morris said. "For example, the relationship between dinosaurs
To Amber?

"Amber?"

"Yes. a slice of bread-."

"|You know what it's like," Grant said. "But why do you ask?"

"Yes," Morris said, "in the last five years, Hammond has bought a lot."
Various amounts of amber are found in the United States, Europe, and Asia, and many museums are dedicated to it
jewelry. The foundation spent seventeen million dollars on Amber. Now they have it.
"He's in a weird place in the world in terms of his appearance."

"|Not your father," Grant said.

“Except nobody else,” Morris said. "As we said, it doesn't make sense
all. Amber is easy to work with. It doesn’t matter how safe or secure it is. There is no reason to
Remember. But that’s what Hammond did in later years.

"Amber," Grant said, shaking his head.

"And what about your island in Costa Rica?" Morris continued. “Ten years ago, Hammond.
The country became the capital of Costa Rica. You need to create a
Conservation biology."

"|I don't know about that," Grant admitted.

"|I couldn't ask for much," Morris said. The island is about a hundred kilometers to the west.
coast. It's very difficult, and it's in a part of the ocean where wind and water meet
Do it forever. They called it the Mountain Design. Island Clouds.
Costa Ricans appreciate it when someone cares." Morris said.
bomb. He said, “When | Let’s say that, according to the letter, you were paid.
The king's reward for this island."

"| Is it?" Grant said.

Morris handed Grant a letter. a Slack was released in March 1984.
Retrieved from InGen Inc. All Rights Reserved. on Farallon Avenue, Palo Alto, California. Written by Alan Grant in Haiti.
Twelve thousand dollars. On the downside, the check marks Advisory.
Employment/Costa Rica/Youth Home.

"Obi, now," Grant said. "| Remember that. It sounds different, but | Remember that. And don't
Everything happens as a team.


Alan Grant found the first group of dinosaurs in Montana in 1979 and several more in 1979.
over the next two years, but it was not until 1983 that he published his book.
His research suggests thousands of dinosaurs lived along the coasts of the world.
in the ocean, build nests in the sand and breed in a dinosaur colony
Feed an adult every night. Tips for Dinosaur Cats and Them
Beautiful babies sticking their tongues out of their breasts are loved by everyone. The Great
It revolves around interviews, readings, and books. So, he replaced them all.
He wants to keep surfing. But that was in the middle of those dark days.
In the 1980s, the Ingen Company decided to expand.

Have you heard of InGen? Morris asked. "I don't."

How did they come to you?

"A phone call. A guy named Gennaro or Genino, something like that."

Morris shook his head. “Donald Gennaro,” he said. "He's InGen's assistant."

"Anyway, he wanted to know about the dinosaurs' diet. And he gave me a bribe
“Write him a book.”
He loves little dinosaurs. Children and youth. What they ate. | he thought
Rates | I know.

"You know what?"

“No, really, no.
nutritional information. But Genora says she knows we don’t know everything and she wants whatever she wants.
Us. And he gave a lot of money. 50 thousand dollars.

Morris took a sip and put it on the table. "You think?"

"No, go."

"So Gennard called you in 1984. What happened then?"

"No," Grant said. "You see what we do here. Fifty thousand people volunteer over two summers."
on Gosling. | tell him what I'm doing | could."

"So, let me make you a book for him."

"Yes."

"What about baby dinosaurs eating?"

"Yes."

Are you Genory’s friend?

"No. Just on the phone."

Did Jenny say why she needed this information?

"Yeah," Grant said. "He wanted to create a children's museum and he wanted to expose children to
Dinosaurs. He said he was looking for and nominating experts in the field of education. there
They were archaeologists like myself, a Texas mathematician named Lane Malcolm, and a couple
Ecologists. Systems Analyst. Good team.

Morris shook his head, flipping through the paper. "How do you take the advice?"

"Yes.
We found hadrosaurs."

What message did you send? Morris asked.

"Everything: weight loss, weight loss, diet, weight loss. Everything."

"And how did Genora find out?"

"It gets loud. Sometimes in the middle of the night. Do dinosaurs eat
this? Will they eat this? Should this be on the show? | He didn't know why.
So you worked. | value, | I thought dinosaurs were important, but they’re not. They
Dead for thirty-five million years. He thought his questions could wait until later in the day.

"|Look," Morris said. "And $50,000?"

Grant shook his head. "I miss Genora and I gave it everything. We did it.
twelve thousand. Probably in the middle of '85."

Morris made a book. "And InGen? Are there other connections?"

"Since 1985."

"And when did the Hammond Foundation start funding your research?"

"I have to see it," Grant said. "But that was the time. The mid-'80s."

"And Hammond is known as a dinosaur lover."

"Yes."


Morris made another announcement.

"Look," Grant said. “If the EPA cares about John Hammond and what he’s doing -
North of dinosaur sites , metal shopping , Costa Rica Island - Why Don't You Ask
Is it about that?

“At this point, we don’t know,” Mohr said. "why not?" Grant said.

“Because there was no evidence of foul play,” Monroe said. "But I | think that
John Hammond is on the run from the law.”


"|We first got hooked," Morris explained, "because of the advertising industry. OTT
It oversees the development of U.S. technology. They called out.
argue that InGen has two sites for improper technology transfer. First, Inj sent three.
Create XMPs in Costa Rica. InGen called it a change in business and said
They don’t sell. But OTT couldn’t figure out why anyone would need that power
In Costa Rica.

"Three steps," Grant said. Is it some kind of computer?

Morris shook his head. "That's a lot of computer power. To be precise, three crays use
It has more spending power than any other private company in the United States. and InGen
machine in Costa Rica. You have to ask yourself why.

"| Wait. Why?" Grant said.

"Nobody knows. And Hood is worried," Morris said. "The courts
Automated genome sequencing – machines that automatically sequence the genetic code. These are
New products are not included in the price list. But any genetic engineering lab can
You have one if it could be worth half a million dollars." He looked at his bills. "Well, a
that is, InGen has installed 24 Honda smisores trains on their island of Costa Rica.

“They also called it an interregional transport, not an export,” Morris said. "there
OTT didn’t do much. They don’t like the use at all. But Angel
Obviously running one of the most powerful corporations in the world
It’s from Central America. A country without government. Same goes for
This has happened before.

Some US bioengineering companies are moving elsewhere.
the city so that they are not bothered by the law. Most importantly, Maurice
You know, from the Biosyn neck.

In 1986, the Cupertino Foundation developed a vaccine Conta
Rural Chile. They did not tell the Chilean government or the farmers who worked there. they
He just threw out the vaccine.

The vaccine is made from a live virus that has genetically modified to become a virus. but
The disease was not diagnosed; Bios doesn't know if the virus is repairable or not.
Worse, the virus mutates. You can’t get herpes without
The one bit the animal. But Biocin modifies the virus so that it fits in the airways of the lungs. You are
He can get sick just by sneezing. Biosyn employees brought the live crocodile virus to Chile in the 1990s.
On a commercial airliner, the passenger plane. Maurice often wondered what would have happened
If the capsule is ruptured during the egress process. Everyone on the plane could have
People are sexual.

That’s good. It’s not good. It’s a bad act. But nothing happened
for biosimilars. Chilean workers who didn’t know they were risking their lives;
The Chilean government complained about the economic crisis, and the U.S. officials
There is no charge. Well, Lewis Dodgson, the geneticist in charge of the study, is still workin
Bios. Biosyn is a smart guy. And other U.S. companies quickly followed suit
those practicing in other countries who have no connection with medical education. Countries are
Yes, the company as a tech giant ran
in their land;

“That’s why we started researching InGen,” Morris said. "It's been three weeks."

"And how do you see it?" Grant said.

"Not much," Morris admitted. "If | comes back to San Francisco, we should shut him down
In the examination. and | I think I'll finish up here." He started pulling on his pants- "To
But what is 'Genius Hyperspace'?


“That’s a good part of my report,” Grant said. " 'Hyperspoo' is the word
The body is as big as a three-dimensional tic-tac-toe. | You have to do all the work.
A dog needs to eat and move and sleep, maybe make a dog in
Many places. Some paleontologists argue that the most evolved animals
Ecological hyperplasia. 'Youth hyperspace' refers to children's
dinosaurs—if you want to be one, you can be."

After the call ended, the phone hung up. Eli answered. "It's a lot of work, sir," she said.
contemporary. Can you call me back?”

Morris closed his wallet and left. “Thanks for the support and the beer,” he said.

"No problem," Grant said.

Grant and Morris walked down the hallway to the front door. Morris said, “I
Did Hammond ask for anything on your behalf? Bones, bones, or something similar
that?"

"No," Grant said.

"Dr. Satter says you're doing magic here . . ."

"Well, not really," Grant said. “When we take the blinds off or something.
There is no reason to keep it in the museum, we send the bones to the lab for dissection.
And it’s trying to deliver proteins to us, and those proteins recognize and send the signal.
Us."

Which lab is that? Morris asked.

"Medical Biology Services Salt Lake."

How did you choose them?

"Shout of war."

"Doesn't that lab have anything to do with InGen?" Morris asked. "I don't

are | Find it,” Grant said.

They came to the gate of the village. Grant opened the door and felt a rush of hot air coming from outside.
Morris stopped and put on his glasses.

“Eventually,” Morris said. "Let's assume Ingen isn't doing a museum exhibit. Is he?"
What else did you do with the information you gave them?”

Grant laughed. "Yeah. They could be feeding a baby Hadrosaurus."

Morris laughed too. "A small Hadrosaurus. That's something we'll have to see. How big are they?"

"Yeah," Grant said, holding his hand six inches back. "Part of the way."

"And how long before they become adults?"

"Three years," Grant said. "Give or take."

Morris pulled out his gun. "Well, thanks again for your help."

“Go back,” Grant said. He watched for a while as Maurice returned.
to his car, and closed the car door.

What do you think? Grant said.

Eli raised his hand. "Na0)


The DNA provides a FROG loop

Mysore 2.1-2.9
Procomygotinide 3.0-3.7
Othniel 3.1-3.3
Accelerator 1.0-3.0
Hypsilopbodontid 2.4–2.7


The bottom line: all living dinosaurs have frog or boar, DNA. Some of the
The animals do. Wu still couldn’t figure out why it took them so long. But he couldn't
The longer they say Grant is right. The dinosaurs were adults.

He rushed to the courthouse.


Lex


He jumped into a hole about a meter wide and walked along the side of the road. There was
Baseball glove in his mouth and walking back and forth blowing his head
at the end of the tube. Dark, but he could see through his glasses.
He was safe and comfortable.

"I'm Lex. Tim."

He didn't answer. He kept hitting the pipe. "Come."

She shook her head no. He could see how terrified she was.

"Lexi," she said, "when you leave, I'll let you wear the seven nightgowns."

He just shook his head.

"Look what | there," she said as she grabbed her bag. He looked away, not recognizing her. I was
Maybe it was too dark to see. "Here's your clothes, Lexa. | Take off your clothes."

"So what."


He tried to do something else. "There must be trouble there. There's still stars. Don't you want to
And?"

He jerked his head back to the pipe.

"why not?"

"There are some aminos here."

This dragged on for a while. He hasn't said "amen" in years.

"The ammonia is gone," he said.

"There's a river. Tyransaurus Rex."

"End."

"Where did he go?"

"| I don't know, but he's not here right now," Tim said, hoping it was true.

Lex didn't move. He threw it again. Tim sits in the grass by the tube.
Where he can see it. The chair shook. He clenched his fist and paused.
He couldn't think of anything else to do. "I'll just sit here," she said. "And rest."

"Is my father outside?"

"No," she said, startled. "He's coming home, Lex."

"Did my mother do it?"

"No, Lexi."

Are there giants here? Lex said.

"No. But I know they'll be here soon. They might as well go now."

Then, he walked into the room, and left. I screamed for the stars and the
Dried blood is bad, but it’s good.

He looked around frantically and said, "Where's Dr. Grant?"

"|I don't know."

"Well, he was here first."

"How? When?"

"First," Lex said. "| When he saw | he was in the tube."

"Where did he go?"

“How do I know?” Lex said, shrugging. “Good morning,” he began.
Hell-oh! Dr. Great? Dr. Great!"

Tim doesn’t like the sound it makes - which is typical of Tyransaurus - but
After a while, he heard another voice. He was going right towards the ground.
It was a short story that Tim had been missing for a few minutes. Through his glasses, Tim saw his soul mate, the Doctor.
Grant walked up to them, a big smile on his face next to his chest, but he
It was good.

"Thank God," she said. "I'm looking for you."


Sighing, Eddie Regis stood up and wiped the sweat from his face and hands. It took a while
it lasted great half an hour, and was among the great mountains on a hill beyond the road. He knew.
There wasn't much room to hide, but he was scared and wasn't thinking straight. There was the door.
This land, trying to protect itself, but then it saw this dinosaur.
His mind. This dinosaur comes from him. Back to the car.

Ed Reggie doesn’t remember what happened next. I think Lake
he said, but the woman couldn't help it, she just kept going and going.
Along the way, he lost his footing, fell off the cliff, and had to rest for a while.
It looked like it could walk between the rocks and land there
There was space, so that's what he did. He gasps and panicks, thinking nothing of it.
He needs to get away from the throne. And finally, when he suddenly
Among the rocks, his mind was troubled, he was afraid, and
Shamed for abandoning the kids and running away, now she’s safe. fluent
He knew he had to get back on track, he had to try to save them because he always knew
He thought he was meek and gentle, but whenever he tried to
For himself, to put himself out there - anyway he didn't. He began to panic.
And he had trouble breathing and was unable to walk.

He told himself he wasn't good enough. If there were children on the street, they could
It didn’t work, and now Eddie Regis doesn’t know what they’re doing, and it’s good


He stayed where he was. No one knows what happened except him. And there was
He can't do anything. He can't do anything. And so the regiment remained.
the couple in half an hour, struggling with fear, wondering if the children were dead,
And what Hammond says when he’s ready.

What shocked him was what he saw in her mouth. near
His mouth filled with laughter, and he smiled, and he wondered if he had seen her in the summer.
Regis touched his face, feeling the skin of her pussy near his mouth. He was surprised, but he wasn’t
We were very angry. Then he realized that the thigh meat was a deer trying to swallow when he opened his mouth. I was
In the mouth. Startled and confused, Regis was worried and thought he was going crazy.
The skin of his neck, feeling the blood rush to his mouth, shrink and twitch in shock.
In the woods. He felt another finger and withdrew it, leaving a slick
following. Jesus, perhaps, was full of them. This falls to the bottom of the mountain. these
The forest hills are full of wildlife. These included black stones. What did the workers say?
Butterflies on your clothes. They like warm places. They love their gas.
Your-

"Thank you!"

He stopped. There was a buzz in the air.

Thank you! Dr. Great!

Jesus, she was a girl.

Ed Regis heard the sound. He was not afraid or angry. cotton
It is named in the system. And he suddenly realized that something else needed to be done .
It happened, that Tyransaurus had to surrender - or not fall - and that
Other people may survive. Grant and Malcolm. Everyone can live. and the data
Let him rest for a while like you did when the police arrived
He threw it at you, rehearsing, because he knew what he was going to do, and he kept pushing.
In the mountains you have already decided on the next route.
He says, how things are getting better this time.

Reggie wiped the tears off his face and hands, evidence he was trying to hide. fluent
She wasn't ashamed of hiding, but now she had to take the blame. He pulled again.
He drove down the road, but when he emerged from the bushes he hesitated for a moment. fluent
I haven’t seen the car yet. Like the top of the mountain. The Land Cruiser should be
above.

He started walking up the hill back to the Land Cruiser. It’s very scary. The legs.
They walk the ground. He couldn't stop thinking about the girl. Why did he leave?
A greeting? As he walked, he felt something off. therefore
If you don’t have to walk again. Tyrannosaurus is probably bigger. Here it is
He had already reached the top of the mountain. This is especially difficult at home.

And he was shocked. It’s not good, it’s bad.

Ed Regis freaked out and started walking towards camp.


Alan Grant rubbed his hands over her legs, squeezing her hands and feet. He doesn't see
There is pain. It’s a miracle: if you miss a splinter, you’re fine. "I told you | sorry," he said
said.

"Well | I need to see it."

The boy was unlucky. Tim's cock twitched and squeezed; Grant was shocked.
he broke it. Her right breast was painful and swollen. But the legs are everything
good. Both children were able to walk. That’s the most important thing.

Grant himself was fine except for where he hurt his right shoulder.
The Tyrannosaurus took off. It burns with all its might, but that doesn’t mean it’s dangerous and
He didn’t believe in his actions.

He thought he had been shot on purpose, since he could not remember anything.
The events unfolded before he jumped, screaming, into the woods ten yards away
Land Cruiser. First the blood comes out of the umbilical cord and then it puts the saliva in the blood and
After a while it dries up. Then, she starts walking to find Malcolm and the children.
Grant can’t believe he’s alive and the tortured images start coming back
Try to understand them. Tyrannosaurus should kill them all. Why wasn't there?


"I'm awake," Leake said.

"Me too," Grant said. "We need to get back to the community. And we need to say
These are for the day.

Are we the only ones who know? said Tim. "Yes.

We have to go back and tell them.

"Then let's make your way to the hotel," Tim said, pointing towards the island. "Thus
We will meet them if we receive them.

He looked at Grant. And he kept thinking about one thing: his broken leg.
Even the Land Crusaders hadn't launched the attack yet. What animal is that? He could
Just think of one thing - the baby Tyrannosaurus.

"| Don't worry about it, Tim. There are plenty of ways to go on both sides," Grant said. "If a
the tyrannosaurus moves, and we catch it.

"Do we have to be patient here?" said Tim.

"Yeah," Grant said. "Let's wait here until someone arrives." "Am

Hungry,” Leake said.

"|I hope it doesn't take too long," Grant said. "AM

I’m not staying here,” Lex said.

Then, from the top of the hill, they heard screaming.

"Stay here," Grant said. He went up into the mountain. "Stay here," Tim

With that, he ran off.

Lex followed his brother. "Don't leave me,  don't leave me here, guys-"

Grant was grateful. He tried to think. He shook his head and
He pointed to the mountain to see.


At the top of the hill, Grant saw Eddie Regis, standing there, motionless. He walked towards them through the forest.
They did not speak. The fear of skaters and wild boars is gone
It's amazing. The only sounds were the rustling of leaves and the sound of the wind.

Lexi started to speak, but Grant sat down on a nearby bench and put his
There is no crack in the foundation. Tim came up behind them. Grant raised his hand.
His mouth told them to stay, and he looked briefly at the tree.

The street was dark, and the tree branches were waving in the wind.
The pattern of moonlight became dynamic and changing. Ed Regis is gone. Grant took
Time to find out. The FM cuts the bark of a large tree and pulls it off.
Reggie wasn’t surprised.

The forest was shocked.

Lex tugged at Grant's shirt reluctantly, wanting to know what was going on. Then, he
Somewhere closer, they felt a gust stronger than the wind. Lex
He heard it too, because he left the show.

The sound pulled them back to the ground, breath heavy. Grant thought it was the same
The horse breathes.

Grant looked at Regis and saw shadows glistening in the moonlight on the mast.
amusing. But Grant recognizes that there is another shadow looming over others, which is not the case.
Rides well: Small, strong neck and flat top.

Breath came again.

Tim frowned and looked at her. Lex did the same.

They heard a sound like cracking wood, and a Tyransaurus stepped into the street. is
Young Man: About eight feet tall, he walked with the gait of a puppy, apparently.
a small dog. Baby Tyrannosaurus walking down the street, standing on all fours, gasping for air
Before you go any further. He walked over to the tree where Regis was hiding, not mentioning that he had
He saw it. Grant watched Regie's body tense for a moment. Regis turned his head to look at her.
At the top of the Tyransaurus tree.

There are no tyrannosaurs roaming the streets today. Regis started breathing heavily and pulled out his device.
On the tree. But the forest wasn’t finished. Regis stayed by the fence for another half hour.
One minute. Then the sounds returned: the first sound of dwarf tree, grass
On one page, then the whole page. Regis turned away from the tree and shrugged.


Look at the problem. He walked across the street and looked across the street.
From Tyrannosaurus .

The attack was in hand.

The boy screamed and swung his head forward, knocking Regis to the ground. She cried.
He stomped, but Tyranxhor dodged and he had to catch him from behind.
Sitting, because Regis wasn’t moving, he sat in the street crying.
dinosaur and waves his hand at him as if he’s shocked. The little dinosaur looks so
She misses the sounds and movements coming out of her small bowel. The young man shakes his head.
behind her, she nudged with her studies, and Regina shrugged.

"Get out! Come back! Go, come back!" Regis screamed in the background and
the dinosaur begged, pulling Regina to her feet. Regis sighed, "Okay! You heard."
AM! Back! Separate yourself from us! After running away from the dinosaur. The boy continued to stare at him.
He wanted to know the gentle pup in front of him, but when Regis took a few steps, he jumped.
and he set it down again.

Going with it, Grant thought.

"Hey!" Reggie screamed as he fell, but the boy ignored him and approached him.
feet. He got up and followed her. "You bastard! You! Have you heard-
Come back!” he roared like a lion cub.

The boy screamed, but didn't argue, and Regis pulled him to the side of the tree and blinked.
Step to the right. After a few steps, it disappears. "Come back! You! Come back!" Regis shouted,
And then, at the last moment, the bull lunged and hit Reggie on the back. "Shut up
Down," Regina hissed, and the little boy lowered his head. Regina began to cry, no words, just
It’s very loud.

His voice strained, and when the young man shook his head, Grant saw the shriveled flesh.
The mouth.

"Oh yeah," Lex said softly. Next to him, Tim tensed and suddenly felt regretful. The night-
His tears fell from his shoulders and fell to the ground with a thud.

The young man's head shot up as he looked up at the mountain.

As Tim dropped his glasses, Grant grabbed both boys by the arms and started running.


ride


At night, the committees patrolled the streets. Harding's Jeep followed a short distance away.
The far back. Eli showed him the long way. Is this a light?

"Okay," Harold said. "Like an eyeball."

Suddenly the radio crackled. They listened to John Arnold,

"-You there?"

"Ahh, there it is," Harold said. "last." He pressed the button. "Yes John, we're here. We're
Close to the river, very quiet.”

Too many pages. Then: "-eed your car-"

"What did he say?" said January.

"Something about the car," Ellis said. At Grant’s feet in Montana, Ellie performed the surgery.
radio. With years of practice, he became proficient at breaking joints.
Charms. "I think he said he needed his car."

Harding pressed the button. "John? Where are you? We can't see each other. John?"

There was a bright light, followed by a radio station, and then Arnold.
His voice, "-where are you-"

"We're a kilometer south of Hips Paddock. Near the river, we're behind some committees."

"No, no, come here ow!"

"Looks like there's something wrong with him," Ellie said, rubbing her eyes. There was no pressure problem.
wait. "We should go back again."

Harding shrugged. "John's in trouble. He knows how the market is. They want
All for the record." He pressed the radio button. "John? Say it again, please. . . ."

Too many pages.

Very powerful. The sound of fireflies. Then: "-Milo-need your car-"

Genaro frowned. "Are you saying Muddy needs our car?"


"That's it," Ellis said.

"So, it doesn't make sense," Harding said.

"-One-Another-Muldin-Out-of-the-Car-"

"|You understand," El said. "The other cars are stuck in the rain, and Mildred wants to
Go get them."

Harding shrugged. "Why doesn't Milo take another car?" He pressed the radio button.
"John? Tell Muldoon to get another car. It's in the garage."

The radio crackled. "-listen-to-the-exercise-"

Harding pressed the radio button. "I said it's in the garage, John. The car's in the garage."

Very powerful. "-Edra has-a-brother-"

“I'm afraid this isn't going to get us anywhere,” Harold said. "Okay John, let's go inside."
He turned off the radio and started the car. "I just want to know what the fuss is about."

Harding put the Jeep in the car and drove down the road into the darkness. Here's another one.
Ten minutes before they see the Safari lights, and Harding looks
They stopped in front of the inn and saw Muldoon walking towards them. She screams and
He waves his hand.


"God damn it, Arnold, you son of a bitch! God damn you, you're running the parrot out of the way! Now! I
The last generation is back here! Now!" John Hammond stands in the courtroom, shouting and pointing
The little legs. He had been walking this way for two minutes straight before Harry Hu stopped him.
On the page, his eyes widened.

"Yes, Mr. Hammond," said Arnold, "Muldoon is going now to do that."
Arnold sighed and lit another cigarette. Hammond is like any other leader
Arnold hadn't seen it. Whether it’s Disney or the Navy, the crew is always improving.
It’s the same. They don’t know what it is; And they thought it was a voice
The way to do things. And I’m probably yelling at their secretaries to get it
a lychee for you.

But the tone couldn’t help with the problems facing Arnold now. that
The computer doesn’t notice that the power grid is clicking it doesn’t notice that it’s on.
Technological systems do not take into account all user preferences. If anything
His voice took on added meaning, because Arnold was now facing him with the possibility that Nedry
It didn't come back, which meant Arnold had to log on to the computer and try
He needed to know what was wrong. This is going to be a tough job, he needs to get used to it.
And be wise.

"Why don't you go to the dining room," Arnold said, "and grab a cup of coffee? We'll call
You and I will get more information.

"|I don't want Malcolm Effort here," Hammond said.

“Don’t worry about Malcolm’s status,” Arnold said. Will you let me go to work?

"God forbid," Hammond said.

"I'll ask you, sir, if | you have any news from Moore," said Arnold.

He pressed the buttons on his console and watched the colors change.


*/Jurassic Park Main Modules/
|
*/ return lbs
At: Biostat.sis
From: sysrom.vest
Available at: net.sys Available at:
power.mdl
*/
*Lowercase
Website [42]2002/9A{total circle %4 [vig. 7*tp]}
If the value is positive (mh) (**mh). Back to Schumanlanvis
Time Call 909 c.lev {void Metrowish $303} Random (3#*Maxfield)
Instead of system(!Dn) replace shp_val.obi with lim(val{ d}samval


If meter(mh)(**m).voltameter(Vdd) gives
onSetSystem(!telecom) return mxcpl.obj to lam(val{pdl}nSatVal


Arnold doesn’t use the computer. He was going to the end of the road now to see
line-of-code Line commands that describe the behavior of a computer. Arnold was not happy.
Note that the entire Jurassic Park program required half a million pages of paper,
Most are undocumented and unexplained.

Wu came forward. What are you doing John?

"Looking for the code."

By his teachings? It goes on forever.

"Tell me," Arnold said. "tell me."


way


Muldoon immediately complies, and the Jeep hits the ground. Genaro is sitting next to her.
He took her hand. They were running along the mountain road, over the river, and now they're hiding under
they are in darkness. Mildred leaned forward. He was shocked.

"How much is it?" said January. "Two, well three miles."

Ellie and Harding return to the visitors’ room. Gennaro decided to go with Muldoon.
The car rolled over. "It's been an hour," Muldoon said. "For an hour, there was no word from other prisoners."

“But they have radios,” Genaro said.

"We couldn't increase it," Muldoon said.

Genaro frowned. "If | were sitting in the car for hours, I would use the radio
Tell someone.

"That's what I do, too," Muldoon said.

Genaro shook his head. Do you really think anything could have happened to them?

"Well," said Muldoon, "they are good, but I shall be glad if |
they. It should be going any minute now.

The road drops down a mountain. Genaro saw a white on the hillside.
It was among the trees by the road. "Shut up," Jannard said and Meade said.
Genaro jumped up and ran to the light of the Jeep to see what it was. so
Like a blanket, but there was

Gennaro thought.

Even six feet away, he could see. He walks a little.

Muldoon jumps in the car and says, “What? "That's

once,” Gennaro said.

The skin on the feet is dark blue and ends with a pool of blood in the feet.
End. He wore a pair of white shirts, a black tie, and black shoes. This is the meaning of sboe
Ed Regis pulled out.

At this point, Muldoon got out of the car and was rear-ended and on his feet. "Jesus." Get up.
His foot emerges from the branches and is lifted by the torchlight, and blood gushes from the rope.
He jumped on his team. Gennaro is three feet tall. He immediately nodded and put it on.
With her hands on her knees, she closed her eyes and took a deep breath, trying not to get sick.

"Gender." Mild's voice rang out.

"than?"

"Go. You're hiding the point."

Genaro took a deep breath and sighed. When he opened his eyes, he saw Maud staring at him.
critically in mind. "It was cut in the side of the body," Muldon said, "it wasn't cut—it was cut and bruised."
he just lost his footing." Mildred stood up and stretched her left leg over her head to steady her body
Blood splattered on the plants. His hand turned red as he held her breast.
Genaro was sick again.

"It's not a question of what happened," Mildred said. "T-Rex found you." Mildred looked up.
up the mountain, and back into the fire. "Are you okay? Can you go?"

“Yeah,” Gennard said. "|You're welcome."


Muldoon walked around the Jeep, shoeless. "|I think we should take this
the same," he said. "It can't be here. Jesus, this will break the car.
Notice that there is something behind it, can you see it? Trip or write. . ."

Genaro opened the back door and looked down the stairs. fluent
She was grateful that he quickly thought of something else. The problem with the method
When he reached out to fill his mind, he found a servant’s hat.
Mold, router, map, ex-

"Two tars," he said. They did well.

“Give me one,” Muldoon said, still in front of the car. Muldoon closed his legs and
He gave control of the group to Genaro. Holding it in his hands, Genaro gasped.
It’s very fast. “Just put it in the back,” Mid said. "If there's a way to stop it, you'll know."
Then it doesn’t move. . ."

"ok." Genaro led the team back and Muldoon got in the back of the net. fluent
It moves fast, the branches sink into the ground, and it buries.
At one point the lighthouse  was in the sky, and it was moving
Ginny, and Jenny looked at the road ahead.

"Jesus," Mildred said.

Gennaro saw a lone Land Cruiser parked in the middle of the road. He couldn't see
This is the second Land Cruiser. “Where’s the other car?”

Muldoon was shocked and dodged to the left. "there." The second Land Cruise is.
twenty feet, and nailed to the root of a tree;

What am I doing there?

"T-Rex didn't."

"Did you drop it?" said January.

Mildred’s face went wide. "Let's finish," he said, climbing into the jeep. they
He climbed into the second Land Cruiser. Their lamps were extinguished and went out into the night.

As they got closer, Gennaro could see how he had stopped the car. He was careful to leave Muldoon alone.
Look outside first.

"|I don't mind," Mildred said. "We can't find anyone."

"I don't?"

"No," she said. He explained that, during his years in Africa, he traveled through the interior of the continent,
Twelve beasts of the field have attacked the people. A tiger attacks: the tiger
table at night and brought a three-year-old. But a dog attacked Amboseli, two oxen.
attacks; A raccoon flew overhead in the west, near Meru. In general, there are some
The evidence was given.

His ignorance of a bad example of an abandoned animal
The tent, the trail of blood leading to the dog, the dirty clothes, not far away.
Camp. But the truth is, there was nothing, especially when the defendant was young.
A baby or child. It was as if the man had disappeared as if he had been cut off from
jungle and there is no turning back. A turtle can kill a child if it stings and bites its tail.
Maybe there was no blood.

And often you won’t find anyone else. button.
over a shirt or rubber boots. But it’s often wrong.

Pirates take children—they love children—and leave nothing behind. So Mildred
He hopes they don’t pick on any of the other children.

But suddenly, he was shocked. "I'm hurting," she said.


Muldoon tries to secure the ring. The front end of the Land Cruiser was broken.
But he didn't have many other relatives. He sees shards of glass on the street. therefore
It was where he was supposed to break the windshield before lifting the car and pushing it.
here. But the car had a big impact. Mildred let the light in her soul.

"empty?" Genaro said suspiciously.

"It's not," Muldoon said. The light shines through a radio transmitter and onto the ground.
Car He saw something else, something black and blue. The doors are hidden and
It was locked, but he went through the back door and onto the couch.
Black stuff.


"That's a clock," he said, peering through the light of his lamp. Unlimited number of clocks
Pulverized black rubber band. The LCD screen is large, I think you might be
He wore it, though he didn't believe it. But that’s the kind of watch a kid gets.

"What do you mean, Clock?" said January.

"Yes. And there's a radio, but that's it."

Does that really matter?

"Yes. And there's something else. . . ."" Mead sighed. There was a smell in the car.
He flicked on the light until there was a crack in the door. He touched:
It’s always good. "Some kids can do it," Muldon said.

Gennaro looked up. What makes you think that?

"Monster," Mildred said. "The clock is ticking." He handed Genord a watch which
He held his hand out to the light.

"The crystal shattered," Genaro said.

"Yes," Mildred said. "And the team wasn't hurt."

"What do you mean?"

"The child was shot,"

“It can happen at any time,” Genaro said. "Anytime before an attack."

“No,” Muldoon said. "These LCD crystals are fragile. It takes a lot of pressure to break them."
The clock face was broken during the attack."

"So the kid took off his watch."

"Think about it," Mildred said. "If Tyransaurus attacked you, would you try to
Take off your watch?

"You can smell it."

"You can't take a watch off someone's wrist if you can't take the frame."
However, not all teams are happy. No, Mildred said. "The boy stopped. He looked at his
Make sure it's done and remove it. He had time to do that.

"when?"

“It could only have happened after the attack,”  Mildred said. "That kid should be in that car."
After the selection. And the radio broke, so that stopped too. He’s a smart kid, you know
It's not good.

"If it's light," Gennard said, "where does it go? Because I stay here and wait
He took it.

“Yeah,” Muldoon said. "But you can stay here. Let the Tyrannosaurus come back. Otherwise
Another animal. Anyway, something had to go.

"Where did he go?" said January.

"Let's see if we can find out," Mildred said, and walked towards the sidewalk.


Genaro looked at Muldoon on the ground. His face is just holy.
On the ground, he followed his plan. Mildred truly believed she was onto something.
One of the children was alive. Gennaro didn’t like it. The key to finding the right person
Sean had allowed himself to become so overwhelmed that he closed and destroyed the park. Whatever.
Muldoon said Genaro attacked him with warmth and respect and

Have you seen these? Muldoon asked as he looked down. What number? January
said.

“People are barefoot, you see them coming up to them on the street, especially older people.
sboe - sole a kind of sboe. Look at the shape of the line.

Gennaro just looks at dirt. The panels catch the light of the lamps.

“You can see,” Muldoon said, “the adult editions that come here, they’re given
Another book. Small and medium. . . It goes in circles. . so
They stand together and talk. . .. but now they are, and so they are leaving. He showed
for. "There. At the park."

Genaro shook his head. "You can see anything in this world."

Mildred stood up and stumbled back. He looked down and sighed. "state
Whatever you want, I’m saving some kids. And probably both. It can also be an adult.
"If those big letters belong to someone other than Regis, we'll probably find them in the park."

"tonight?" said January.


But Mud doesn't listen. He was walking next to a flat field before
rain. He shook his head again. What is this girl wearing?

“Christ,” Gennard said. "|I don't know."

Muldoon walked slowly down the road. And they did.
The sound of the wind. An animal sound.

"Listen," Genaro hesitated, "I think you'd better-."

"Shhh," Mildred whispered. He paused to listen.

"It's just the wind," Gennaro said.

Again they hear his voice. There was no wind. from within.
There was a bunch of leaves in front of him by the side of the road. Not like a dog, but Mildred
She studied him carefully. He flashed his light and shouted, but the air didn’t change
feature. Muldoon sniffed the maple leaf.

"What is that?" said January.

"It's Malcolm," Mildred said.


lan Malcolm was next, his skin white and his mouth hanging open. He breathed.
Wind wind. Mildun handed the fire to Genaro, then bent down to look at the body.
"|You can't hurt me," he said. "Good news, Sissy Blots . . ."

Xenari shone a light at her feet. "He had a dress code." Malcolm's mind was blown.
Pressure in left leg. Genaro pushed his light away with his foot. His right leg was numb.
On the underside of the toes, the blisters are small and smeared with blood. Mildred
He snapped his fingers and Malcolm screamed.

Muldoon froze and tried to decide what to do. Malik could have another attack.
It’s beautiful. He might kill her to take it. But if they leave him here, he will die.
mess. Because he was smart enough to wear a tronic around his neck.
He bled to death. And it may have been taken. They can also take it away.

Gennaro helped Muldoon pull the man down and jumped on their back.
Malcolm shouted and took a deep breath. "Lex," she said. "Lexi… go…Lexi…."

Who is Lex? said Mildred.

"Girl," Jannard said. They take Malcolm to the Jeep and arrest him.
Sit down. Gennaro shot himself in the leg. Malcolm shouted again. Mildred
He unzipped his pants and saw the skin underneath, the white peeling
nut.

"We have to bring it back," Mauldin said.

Are you going here without the kids? said January.

"If they go into the park, it's 20 miles," Mudd said, shaking his head. "A
The way we fit everything in with motion detectors. If the children are alive and th
In general, motion sensors pick it up, and we can move with them and retrieve them again.
But if we don’t get Drs. Malcolm now, we’re going to die.

"Then we can go back," Genaro said.

"Really | Think about that."

They got in the car. "You can tell Hammond to the kids," Genaro said.
loss?"

“No,” Muldoon said. "you are."


ride


Donald Gennaro looked at Hammond, sitting in the empty dining room. The man was making a map.
Cream, to eat in peace. "Does Mildred think the children are somewhere in the park?"
"That's his plan, yes."
"So, I'm sure we'll find them."
"|It's amazing," Jannard said. He saw the old man still eating and felt hungry.
"Oh | I'm sure we'll find them. Afterwards | tell everyone that this park is made for children."
Genaro said, "So you know they're not lost, sir."


"loss?" He pulled away. "Yes | I know they're lost. It's not that simple." He was happy and
Change the voice again. "Look, Donald," Hammond said. "We shouldn't take ourselves too seriously. We
It was a stormy Sunday or something, so we were a little disappointed
It’s a bad problem. And that's what happened. We work with it. Arnold is coming.
Computers are cleaned. Mildred takes the children, and | You had no idea if he would come back to them.
At the time when we perform this procedure. So let's wait and see what happens next, shall we?”

“Whatever you say, man,” Gennard said.


"why?" Henry Wu said as he looked at the car.

"Because | I think Nedry did something with the code," Arnold said. "That's why I'm looking."

"Okay," Wu said. "But have you checked your symptoms?" "like

“What?” Arnold asked.

"| I don't know. Aren't the security systems working?" Wu said. Bone tests? All this?

"Jesus," Arnold said, swallowing hard. "It has to go. Safety measures shouldn't die."
Except for the main panel."

"Well," Wu said, "if Keichika is busy, you should explain what he did."

"I really can," Arnold said. He started pushing the buttons. Why didn’t he think of it?
before? That was obvious. Jurassic Park’s computer system has a few security flaws.
His mind is built into it. One of them is the software that manages all software
they involve people in the process. It was originally introduced as a crime prevention tool.
However, it is protected for its protective value.

In a flash, all the letters Nedry had typed on the computer the day before.
It is displayed in another window on the web page:


13, 42, 121, 32, 88, 77, 19, 13, 13, 122, 13, 44, 52, 77, 90, 13, 99, 13, 100, 13, 109, 55, 103
144, 13, 99, 87, 60, 13, 44, 12, 09, 13, 43, 63, 13, 46, 57, 89, 103, 122, 13, 44, 52, 88.9.
31, 13, 21, 13, 57, 98, 100, 102, 102, 146, 13, 13, 13, 77, 67, 88, 23, 13, 13
system

Nedra

Go to the government level.

Nedra

040/ # L/67& m.

Hello

check

Look at the key.

forbidden

sl te

check

white_rbt.obj


"That?" said Arnold. "I've been here for hours, yeah."

“It probably just delays time,” Wu said. "Until he tried to get away with it."

The first line of code is Nedry’s ASCI keyboard code.
He tapped his console. These numbers tell us that before it goes to the default UI, e.g.
Anyone can use the computer. So, first Nedra just watches, which you shouldn’t do.
Remember the programmer who built the system.

“Maybe check to see if there are any changes, before entering,” Wu said.

"Okay," Arnold said. Arnold is now looking at the amount of legislation he needs to pass
Follow Nedry’s advice, step by step. "We could see what he did."

system is Nedry’s way of evading users and obtaining a code break.
The computer asked her name, and she answered: Neidra.

This name was allowed in the code, so the computer allowed him to access the system.
He asked Nedry to go to the command level, the highest level of computer government. level of government.
He asks for more protection and tells him his name is Nedry, he’s level 7 and so on.


Nedra

040/# L/67& m.

Hello

These consequences brought Nedry to the throne. From there, he sought refuge. and by
He complied, and the computer let him go. On the defensive side, Nedry searched.
Three changes:

Look at the key.

forbidden

sl te

"It's trying to address security concerns," Wu said. “He didn’t want anyone to see what.
He will do it.

"Yeah," Arnold said. "But he doesn't know that he can't change
The systems will shut down if the switches are not changed manually or at the master.

After three failed missions, the computer was worried about Nedry. but
Since it turned on, the computer thinks it’s Nedry.
he withdrew, trying to do something he couldn’t do where he was. So the computer asked
That’s where he wanted to be,” Neider said.

check. And he left it there.

"Ultimately," Wu said, "because it is." He followed Neidra's lead.
He entered.

white_rbt.obj

"What is this?" said Arnold. "The white rabbit? Is that what he did?"

"It's called something," Wu said. In computer terms, an “object” is a collection of code.
One can be carried and used the same way you would carry a chair throughout the house. Something
It could be a set of commands to draw an image, refresh a screen, or do some
The number.

"Let's see where it is in the code," Arnold said. "We can do what I do." fluent
Go to the main program and type:


Search for WHTE-RBT.OBJ
The computer brought up the light:
Nothing available in the library


"Not there," Arnold said.
"Then ask for the code list," Wu said.
Arnold wrote:


search/write: witt-rpt.obg


The screen moved quickly, lines of code stuttering as they passed. So he stayed.
for a minute, then quickly disappear.

"That's it," Wu said. "It's nothing, it's a bug." The screen shows an arrow.
to display a page:


curv = gett{cm.dt} tamrn {itm.dt2}. Wait
= gehandle {ssd.etcl} tamrn2{etm.dd4}.
In radiometer (!gN), set shp-val.obi to lim(Val{d})-Xval. and
Impedance (mH) (**mH). Definition of MeterVis.
if metroband](vGT) ((Drobuck(tY)) Return.
limitDat.4 = maxbytes (%33) of {limitation 04} type.
digit.5 = digit, fivedigits, 0 {digit .2-value(sb)}.
On whte-rbt.obi link.sst {security, privacy} ready to install.
Northern={Maxiran+Spect} Tampine(fdn-&bb+$404).
hormone={max range-set/2} buffer(fdn-&dd+$105). empty
Camera SendScreen.obi print.


"Son of a bitch," Arnold said.

Wu shook his head. "It's not a code problem."

"No," Arnold said. "It's a trapdoor. The green man put in something that looked like an invitation, though."
A policy that regulates and regulates security and perimeter systems. He likes it
You can go anywhere in the park."

"Then we can do it again," Wu said.

"Yes, we should." Arnold frowned at the paper. "All we have to do is learn the commands."
I saw the violence on the page,” he said.

Wu got up from his chair. “At that point,” she said, “someone came in
Freeze for an hour. | Rates | You better go find my genes.


Eli was in his room taking off his wet clothes and changing into his clothes when there was a knock on the door
mouth.

"God?" he said, but when he opened the door, he saw Maud standing there and
bag in her hand. Muldoon is also hot and has a few lines.
His clothes are dirty.

"I'm sorry, but we need your help," Mildred said quickly. "The Land Cruisers attacked and
1 hour later. We took Malcolm, but he was disappointed. His leg was badly injured. Is
He still doesn't notice it, but | He lay down on the bed in his room. Harding is on the road."

“Harod?” she said. What about the others?

"We haven't got the others yet, Dr. Satter," Mildred said. He spoke slowly now.

"Oh my God."

“But I think Dr. Grant and the children are still alive.I think they’ve been in the park, Doctor.
Satter.”

Have you been to the park?

"I think so. At the time, Malcolm needed help. I asked Harold."

Shouldn’t you call a doctor?

"There's no doctor on the mountain. Harold is our best friend." "but

Of course you can call the doctor-” he said.

"I don't." Mildred shook her head. "The phone lines are crap. We can't call." He changed his appearance.
Pack in hand.

"What is that?" she said.

"It's nothing. Just go into Malcolm's room and help Harold if you want." and

Milden had left.

She sat on her bed, miserable. Ellie Satter is not a woman afraid of risk.
And he knew Grant from the hard times he had gone through. He disappeared immediately.
badlands on the fourth day when he hit a bottom and his truck fell a few hundred feet
A back. Grant’s right leg was amputated. He had no water. But he returned to walking with a broken leg.

On the other hand, the children. .

He shook his head, dismissing the thought. Luckily the kids loved Grant. and if
Grant came to the park, of course. .. the right person to take to Jurassic Park
More than a dinosaur expert?


In the park


"I'm tired," Leake said. "Take it from me, Dr. Grant." "It's too soon to go," Tim said.

"But I'm tired," she said.

"Okay, Lexi," Grant said, picking her up. "Oh, so sweet."

It was around 9:00 pm when the full moon was obscured by clouds and shadows
He led them down a steep path into a dark forest nearby. Pausing, Grant tried.
Tell me where he was. Because we went through the wall at the end, which is where the car
It exploded, and Grant was sure he was somewhere in Tyransor.
Paddock. The one place he didn’t want to go. Thought he was looking at a computer.


Tyrannosaurus length distribution, the dashed line that traces its length
In a small house. The house was now occupied by women and children.

But Grant also remembered;
This means they’ll know they’ve left the farm if they cross a line.
moat, or both.

He hadn’t seen any thanks so far.

The girl rested her head on his shoulder and tucked his hair into her forehead. Soon it was over.
Energy. Tim walked over to Grant.

"How do you keep him, Tim?"

"Okay," he said. "But | do you think we can be instead of Tyransaurus?"

"I'm sure it's true. | I'd like us to go out for a while."

"You going into the woods?" said Tim. As they approached, the forest seemed dark.
Make a profit.

"Yeah," Grant said. I think we should play by the numbers with motion sensors.

Motion sensors are green boxes built about four feet off the ground. Some
labour; Most of them are attached to trees. None of them work for us like that
The power wasn’t there yet. Each sensor box has a central glass slide and an engraved barcode.
The chart is below. Above him, in the moonlight, Grant could see a console looking
T/S/04.

They went into the forest. There were big trees everywhere. In the moonlight the snow faded.
The ground scraped against the tree trunks, soft, but they kept going.
He is a bully. And Grant watches the centaurs. They seemed to be gone.
narrative. Passed T/S/03, and T/S/02. Finally, they reached T/S/01. He was too tired to
girl, and expected her to go to the Tyransaurus lair, but
Just another condo in the middle of the street. Then the next letter T/N/01,
After T/N/02. Grant recognized the need to assess the surrounding land
center, like a compass. They were moving from east to west, so their
They got towards the middle and then shrank back.

“At least, we’re doing well,” Tim said.

"You're welcome," Grant said.

Tim laughed, pushing the vines in the snow. He stood up quickly. They kept walking.
A little while. "My parents got divorced," he said.

"Uh-huh," Grant said.

"My dad died last month. He has a cemetery in Mill Valley now."

"Okay."

"He wouldn't bring my wife. He wouldn't."

"And he said you had brain damage," Grant said.

Tim was happy. "Yes."

Have you forgotten? Grant said.

"Not really," Tim said. "Sometimes. It gets very annoying."

Who, your mother?

"No, Lexi. My mom has a boyfriend. She knows him from work."

Departed on the next day before T/N/03 and T/N/04. "Did you see him?" extend
said.

"Yes."

"How are you doing?"

"Okay," Tim said. "Smaller than my father, but still worth it."

How does it affect you?

"| I don't know. It's okay. | I think he's just trying to get a good look at me. | I don't know what's going on
process. Sometimes my mom tells us to sell our house and move. Sometimes he and I
My mother fights at night. | sitting at home playing games on my computer and | I hear it too.

"Uh-huh," Grant said.

Are you divorced?

"No," Grant said. "My wife died young."

"And now you want Dr. Satter?"

Grant smiled darkly. "No. My student."


"You mean you're in school?"

"Go to college, then." Grant took a moment to pull Lexi to the other side and
Moving, passing T/N/05 and T/N/06. There was a lightning in the distance. that
The rain is moving south. There was little sound in the forest except the plane.
cicadas and the calls of the wood frog.

Do you have kids?" Tim asked. "No,”

Krantz said.

Will you see Dr. Satter?

"Well, she'll be married to a good doctor in Chicago next year."

"Oh," Tim said. He seemed surprised to hear that. They walked for a while. "So who
Are you getting married?

"|Don't expect me to marry anyone," Grant said. "AM

You too,” Tim said.

They walked for a while. Are we going to play all night? said Tim.

"| I don't know | right," Grant said. "We'll have to wait a few hours." He looked over his shoulder
protect. "We're fine. We have eleven hours to get back. The boat hasn't left yet
It reaches the whole country."

Where can we stay? Tim asked suddenly.

Grant thinks the same thing. His first thought was that they could climb trees and
Sleep in front of the house. But they had to climb a long way to get out of the herd safely, and
Lex can fall while sleeping. The leaves are strong; They would not rest.
At least, he didn’t.

They needed a better place to live. He thought back to the scenes he had seen on the plane.
below. He remembered that there were terraced houses everywhere.
Divided. Grant couldn’t see where they were because they were on higher ground.
It didn't help. And he couldn't remember where they were, but he remembered
They were all near the park. Well from the beginning.

But there was no need for that and he just crossed a barrier and walked out.
tyrannosaur paddock, searching for a horse is a search for nostalgia. And well
The answers are-

"Tim, can you hold your ass for me? I'll climb a tree and look around."


Among the branches that peeked straight out of the forest, the tops of the trees raised
Left and right. They were so surprised that they approached the forest behind the trees.
This was before electricity and asphalt. Then there’s the mother.
In the field, he thought it was a sauropod shell. In the distance, lots of trees and snow.
The moonlight glinted off the sea.

In the distance, he heard a dinosaur roar, but it was too far away. This is Tim's body-
sunglasses and try again. He followed a bunch of sinkholes, and finally saw the
Looking for it: a dark road leading to a place far, far away. first house;
It wasn’t from the ground, but it was. And it wasn't far. Maybe a mile or so
on the tree.

As he got to his feet, Lex sighed.

"What does it mean?" "I've heard."

So be it.

"We weren't hurt. Do you understand now? Come on."

He took her to the door. Twelve cubits high, with a bronze plate on top. fluent
It looms over your eyes in the moonlight. Water was still on the other side.

Lexus looked up at the ceiling in shock. "can

Are you riding it?” Grant asked.

He put on his gloves and baseball bat. "Okay. It's easy." He started to leave. "but | all
Tim is bad.”

Tim shouted angrily: "You're about to die."

“Tim is afraid of heaven.”

"It's not like that."

He went to the house. "That's it."


"I don't."

"Then take it from me."

Grant was shocked at Tim, stunned in the darkness. The boy doesn't move. "You're very good with the wall."
Tim?

"sure."

Do you need help?

"Tim's a bad dog," Lex said.

"Bad idea," Tim said, and started to leave.


"It's going to be cool," Leake said. They swam up to their waists in the boiling water.
Cement to cement. They went upstairs and nothing happened until Tim took off his clothes.
Wire strips in front. Then they all trained underwater, and now Grant
He was looking for a way to go.

"At least | I got Timmy on the wall for you," Lex said. "You're scared all the time."

"Thanks for the help," Tim said with a smile. In the moonlight, he could see flickering light bulbs
The outside. He walked to the hole and looked at the concrete wall in the distance. concrete;
practical; They could not get on it.

"Eww," Lex said, pointing to the water.

"You won't be hurt Lex."

Grant saw a place where the bridge had collapsed and a crop had grown
fluent. He grabbed the vine and held its weight. "Let's go kids." They started walking.
vine, returning to the deep pit.

It only took a few minutes to walk from the village to the cascading waterfall
Service road, and building on the right. They went through two motion sensors and
Grant noted with some relief that the sensors weren’t working and the lights weren’t working.
More than two hours after the first fire, it has yet to be repaired.

From a distance, they heard Torraso’s voice. Are you here? Lex said.

"No," Grant said. "We're on a different side of the park than he is." They fell on the grass.
reservoir and walk along the road. In the dark, he was allowed.
like.

"What is this place?" Lex said.

"It's alright," Grant said, hoping he was right.

The gate is wide enough for a truck to drive through. It was full of strict bars.
Inside, they can see a rooftop terrace with a patio and bar
between the body parts.

The door was closed behind a heavy shutter. When Grant stopped, Lex stepped aside.
Between offices. "Come on people."

Tim followed. "I think you can do it, Dr. Grant."

He was strong; It was a big stretch, but Grant managed to push his body between the boards
And in the bathroom. As soon as he entered the house, he was very tired.

"|I think there's something deeper," Lex said.

"It's just bad." Grant broke a brick and threw it into the street. The grass in
The middle is hot. They are sure they feel the heat. Lex crawled up next to her and hugged her.
eye. Tim shook his hand. He heard the sounds of the sarpods in the distance.

None of the children speak. They’re getting closer now. Grant raised his hand and looked at her.
You looked up, but it was too dark to see the light. He felt the children's warmth against his body.

Grant closed his eyes and fell asleep.


ride


When Muldoon and Gennaro arrive at the control room, Arnold flicks the switch and says.
"I understand, little bitch."

"What is that?" said January.

Arnold commented on the page:


Vgl = getHandled {dat.dt} timecall {atm.time}

Vg2 = get { date . itl} timecall {itm.time}

if link(Vgl,Vg2) is given by lim(Vgl,Vg2) and
link(Vg2,Vgl) returns link(Vg2,Vgl).

In whte_rbt.obj SecurityGraphics (Vgl), Permissions (Vg2)
limitDat.1 = maxbytes (%22) to {threshold .04} set
border.2 = Steven, Steven, 0 { border.2-value(dj)}

in the fini.obi link.sst {security, privacy} option to configure
fini.obi for link.sst {security, privacy}
in fabric.obj define page rf whte_rbt.obj, fabric.obj Vgl =
getHandler {data.dt} utility {atm.tmp} Vg2 =
gethead {dat.atl} vatcal {atm.tmp}

limitDat.4 = maxbytes (33%) of {limit .04} of .
boundary.5 = setBoundary, setFive, 0 { value .2-value(sj)}


"That's it," Arnold said cheerfully.

"What is that?" Genaro asked, looking at the screen.

"| Finally I run the command to restore the original code. The 'fini.ob' command is restored
The most common parameters are walls and power.

"Okay," Mildred said.

"But I do other things," Arnold said. "Then they remove the lines that show."
It destroys all evidence that he was there. Very happy.

Genaro shook his head. "I don't know about computers." Although he knew a lot about
Learn what it means when you’re a leading technology company. It means very, very much.
battle.

"Well, look at this," Arnold said and tweeted:

Fine.obj

The screen flickered and quickly changed.


Vg1 = GetHead {Da.DTPMT™} Vg2 =
gethead {dat.atl} vatcal {atm.tmp}

if link(Vgl,Vg2) is given by lim(Vgl,Vg2) and
link(Vg2,Vgl) returns link(Vg2,Vgl).

limitDat.1 = maxbytes (%22) to {threshold .04} set
border.2 = Steven, Steven, 0 { border.2-value(dj)}
Vgl = Gateway {data.dt} vTalk {atm.tm} Vg2 =
gethead {dat.atl} vatcal {atm.tmp}

limitDat.4 = maxbytes (33%) of {limit .04} of .
boundary.5 = setBoundary, setFive, 0 { value .2-value(sj)}


Muldoon gasped at the windows. "protect!" Outside, large fires burned.
Throughout the park, they walked to the windows and looked outside.

"Hot fire," Arnold said.

Gennaro said, “Does that mean electric paints are bad?”

"You say yes," Arnold said. "It takes a few seconds to regain full strength, because we
It has a 50-mile coastline and producers have to support their products along the way.
But in half a minute we’re back to business,” Arnold told the standing bull
Map of the park.

On the map, the lightning bolt comes out of the fireplace and moves around.
Park, as the fire burned in the yard.

"And the motion detectors?" said January.

"Yeah, they are too. It'll take a few minutes for the computer to work. But it all works."
said Arnold. "About nine thirty, we had everything ready and done."


Grant opened his eyes. Natural light enters the room through the ceiling.
gate. Yellow Quartz: The energy he felt when he looked at his watch. Just 59.
He sleeps two minutes. He tried to lie down for a few minutes and
Then he returns to the net, standing in front of the motion sensors and the waves.
Let them go. The Countess had seen him; They sent a car to pick him up and the children, who
He tells Arnold to call the ship and they all stay the night in bed.
Logic.

He would do it now. Just a few minutes. He sighed and closed his eyes.
further.


"Not bad," Arnold said in the courtroom, looking at the highlighted map. "There are three
Throughout the park. better than | Hopefully."

"The leaves?" said January.

"The wall breaks down a few small pieces," he explained. "You can see your mother."
"One here, on Twelve Street, across the street."

"That's where Rex cut the fence," Mildred said.

"Just a moment. and there's another one here in Sector Eleven. Near the Sharppod Training Center."

Why is that section removed? said January.

"God knows," Arnold said. "It could be a snowstorm or a fallen tree. We should check
Wait a moment. The third is the big forest. I don't know what will happen.
Outside, too."

When Genaro looked at it, the map became a blur, filled with green dots and numbers.
"What does all this mean?"

"Animals. The motion sensors are working again, and the computer is booting up."
The abode of all the beasts of the field. And other people, too."

Gennaro looked at the map. "It's about Grant and the kids . . ."

"Yeah. We've doubled our search count to four hundred. So, if you're there to
inside,” said Arnold, “the movement treated him like any other animal.” He looked around
card. "But | I haven't seen anything yet."

Why is it taking so long? said January.

“You must know, Mr. Gennard,” said Arnold, “that there are many holes
there. Tree branches in the wind, birds flying and all sorts of things. The computer should
Put everything back together. It can be taken. ok. The account has been banned.

Aren’t you children? said January.

Arnold leaned back in his chair and looked at the map. “No,” he said, “now
There are no markers on the map. Everything looks like a dinosaur.
They may be on top of a tree or somewhere out of sight. | You can't think.
Not many animals appeared like Rex's mother. This is because you sleep
One side and not moving. Maybe people are sleeping too. We just don’t know.

Mildred shook her head. "Well, let's get you started," he said. "We have to build the walls."
And the animals returned to their places. According to this computer, there are five
Return to the beautiful garden. Now I’ll organize the maintenance team.

Arnold was angry with Gennard. "Please see Dr. Malcolm's opinion. Tell Dr. Harold
that Muldoon should be there for an hour to see the animals. And I gave the information to Mr. Hammadi.
"We're starting our final preparations."


Genaro walked through the metal doors and entered the Safari Gate. He looked
Ellie Sattler comes down the stairs with makeup and a bottle of water for her. "There it is."
In a restaurant," he said. "We use it to heat water.”

"How are you doing?" Gennaro asked.

"Very well," he said.

Genaro followed Ellie down to Malcolm's and was shocked to hear her scream.
laugh. The dentist sucks on his stomach and Harold hooks up an IV.

"Then someone else said, 'I'll tell you straight up, | I don't like it, Billy. | I'm back on the bathroom thing!"

Harold laughs.


"Not bad, is it?" Malcolm said laughing. "Oh. Mr. Gennaro. You see. Now you
You know what happens when you try to go again.

Gennaro came in and tried it.

"He had a morphine addiction," Harding said.

"Not long, | I can tell you," Malcolm said. "Col, she was affected by her drugs. Did you understand
What about the others?”

"No, not yet," Jenna said. "And I'm glad you're doing the right thing."

"There must be another way," said Malcolm, "if a leg flick can
septic and starting to smell very, uh, putrid? but | Always say you can’t protect your privacy
funny. . ."

Gennaro laughed. Do you remember what happened?

"Okay | Remember," Malcolm said. Do you think a Tyrannosaurus spits?
rex And you're out of your mind? Not really, I assure you, you will remember it for the rest of your life.
life. In my experience, probably not very long. but, even-now, | delighted."

Malcolm said as he ran out of the Land Cruiser into the rain and followed her.
Rex. "It's my fault. It's very sad, but | he was scared. Anyway, he chose
I woke up in bed.

"as well as?" said January.

"Torso," Malcolm said and lifted his shirt. One half of the circle is separated from it.
tail to tail. "He pulls himself up onto his back, gushes out a lot of blood, and falls to the ground. And |
He was shocked, but it all made sense when he pulled it off. | sunday
foot. But the kiss isn't half bad." He sighed. "I think so.

"Most carnivores don't have very big teeth. Their real power is in their teeth," Harding said.
body. The breasts just suck, and they use their tongues to lick and suck. but with a slight
Faith like Drs. Malcolm Banga just shoots and shoots.

"I'm afraid it is," Malik said. "| I think I live only the heart of a great man
It didn't help. To be honest, he struck me as a bad striker.
A car or a small house.

Do you think he jumped in half-heartedly?

"I hate to say it," Malcolm said, "but | I'm wrong | He was in the right mindset. He was
Mine, of course. Then again, it only weighed eight tons. | I don't. "

Genaro smiled at Harding and said, "They're going to finish the walls now. Arnold said."
"Muldoon needs your help guarding the wolves."

"Okay," Harold said.

"As long as you leave me with Dr. Satler," Malcolm said, "and lots of morphine." “And if you don’t
"It doesn't matter here, Malcolm."

What does Malcolm mean? said January.

"Your attitude makes me want to tell you the truth about something," Malcolm said.
I." She sighed again and closed her eyes. In a few moments, she was asleep.

Ellie walked out onto the balcony with Genaro. "Don't lie," he said. "It's a big problem
Envelope. When will the helicopter be here?

"Helicopter?"

“Surgery is needed this time.
island."


park


The portable generator pulsed and roared, and electric pins glowed in the background.
with telescopes in hand. Muldoon could hear the rustling of the forest water a few yards away.
north. He came back to the maintenance van and saw a worker driving the big truck.
Peter St.

"No, no," he said. "Just shut up, Carlos. We don't have to."

He turned to look at the wall. They had trouble finding their seats at first.
Because there wasn’t much else: there was a small tree in the park. I was
Many of the local park volunteers are on hand to
Hide the shadow from the public.


But these trees were held together with nails and needles. The wires
It broke apart in the gust of wind, and the metal bar hit the wall and closed in on him.
leave. Of course, none of this had to happen; Farmers have to use plastic.
Insulated and insulated wires behind walls. But that’s what happened.

Either way, it’s not a big deal. All they had to do was remove the wood from the wall.
Remove the barbed wire and put it in the field ready for the morning. It shouldn't go
More than twenty minutes. And it worked, because Mildred learned about dilophosores
He always stays near the river. Although the river staff
A wall where demons can enter the water and make fire.

Rama, a servant, comes. He said, "Sixcuse Mud, did you see the dream?"

What light? said Mildred.

Ramen went east into the woods. "|We saw it when we left. We loved it
weak. Have you seen it? It's like a car with lights on, but it's not moving.”

Muldoon rubbed his eyes. Maybe immediate adoption. After that, the government reconsidered.
"We'll worry about it later," he said. "Now, let's get that stick out of the wall."


Arnold was very happy. The park is coming back to life. Mildred is doing
They are a wall. Hammond went to see the animals they were taking with Harding. although
He was tired, Arnold was kind; Thinking about hiring a lawyer Jenny.
"The Malcolm Effect?" said Arnold. "You like that?"

“I’m just looking,” Gennard said.

"You mean I'm going to tell you why Malcolm's a bad guy?"

"sure."

Arnold took another sip. “It’s the technology.”

"Look at me."

"Okay," Arnold said. Linear theory describes a nonlinear system. Now it’s deployed.
His goal is to study everything from bags to populations to the brain
waves during the syndrome. It’s a very sophisticated science of fashion. It can be used on any uneven road.
Where things can go wrong. ok?"

"Okay," Gennard said.

"Lan Malcolm was a mathematics professor who studied chaos theory. He was a very humble and wonderful man.
But what he does, in addition to wearing black, he uses the computer to enhance his
Complex systems. And John Hammond liked new discoveries, so he asked Malcolm
A scene from Jurassic Park. What did Malcolm do. All of Malcolm’s models are phase-space models.
the display on the computer screen. Have you seen them?

"No," Gennard said.

"Well, they're like bloated sunflowers. As Malcolm said, everyone's
The target follows the shaft of the propeller. “You and me?”

"Not good," Genaro said.

Arnold threw his hands in the air. "Say | put a bottle of water on my neck. Oh.
The point slipped out of my hands. It can slip out of my hand. It can fit on my hand.
Or between my hands. | I really don’t know where it’s going, but | Just know that it will pass.
I have one hand on one side. It must be done.

"Okay," Gennard said.

The GPS system is described as the whole system as a flowing waterfall.
Complex attack surface. The blade can slide out or slide to one side. Very good
Do a lot of things, basically. But it always goes hand in hand with the giant’s height.

"ok."

Malcolm’s designs usually involved creating a funnel, or channel, through which the water flowed
plenty. He calls this phenomenon the Malcolm Effect. Everything about him.
can fall. And that’s what he said about Jurge Parker. Because it was in
Unfortunately."

"That's a problem," Genaro said. "And what did you do when you got your order?"

"We didn't do well, we really did," Arnold said.

"Isn't that good?"


"He'll clean up," Arnold said. "We're dealing with life stuff, after all. This is life, not
Computer Models."


In the candlelight, the head of Hypsilophodent’s skeleton rose above the surface.
The mouth is guarded, the eyes are guarded.

"Careful! Careful!" cried Hammond, as he began to clear the corridor.

Harding was stunned, his head pounding against the leather sheets. He doesn't want to live.
via the intravenous artery. Crank yelled, lifting the beast into the air.
Waiting for truck paint. Hipsy was a small dryosaur, seven feet tall and five feet wide.
A hundred pounds. smear the lips with the sweet potatoes. He was barely breathing, but
It’s just meaning. Harding had shot himself moments earlier with a knife and
He seems to have learned the right way to go. There’s always time to take these parties
Animals. It’s too fast and you’ll run off into the woods and land somewhere you can’t get to.
they. Unfortunately they went into cardiac arrest. This confirms the same
Drag and go. The right amount.

Look! Practical! Hammond yelled at the workers.

"Mr. Hammond," Harold said. "please."

"Well, they have to be careful-."

"He thinks," Harold said. He took off like a hippie.
And he went down, and put the chains on him. Harding rocks a heart-shaped necklace.
She listened to his heartbeat, then pulled out a large turkey-shaped thermometer
baster and put it in the chest. They say: 96.2 degrees.

"How is it?" asked Hammond angrily.

"Okay," Harold said. "He missed a class and a half."

"It's huge," Hammond said. "It's very fast."

“You don’t want him to get up and jump on the truck,” Harding said.

Prior to arriving at the park, Harding was director of the San Diego Zoo
animals, and is a world expert in animal welfare. He travels the world and talks to animals.
In Animal Husbandry in Europe, India, and Japan. You don’t have to do the most important thing.
The little boy points and gives a ride at a playground. But when he learned what
Hammond ... couldn't move. Harding is a researcher and
Inspired to write the first book on animal medicine: Diseases of the Dinosaurs
coercion. By the beginning of the 20th century, veterinary medicine had evolved in its own right –
Good pets take hospitals very differently than hospitals. The new books are just improvements to the old books.
For a farmer, there is no land he cannot control. But going ahead to get it right.
New Animal Science: That’s a thing!

Harding didn’t regret his decision and put on a great show with
These dogs. And he didn't want to hear a word from Hammond now.

Hypsy sighed and nodded. He breathes a little; There is no optical illusion.
yet. But it’s time to go. "You're all on board," Harold shouted. "Let's give this girl back to her."
Paddock.”


"Living organisms," says Arnold, "happiness is not like mechanical organisms. Living organisms never
Balance. The results are not good. It may look like they are sitting still, but they are not. Everything is in
Mobility and change. In a way, everything is falling into place."

Gennaro sighs. "But not much changes, the body temperature doesn't
Another way-"

"Our body temperature is constantly changing," Arnold said. "Forever. It changes every now and then."
Twenty-four hours, less in the morning and more in the evening. varies with context, with
Sickness, with work, with high temperatures, with food. varies with
below. Minor changes to the page. Because at any given moment there is a force pulling the
At the top, there are other forces pulling it down, and it isn't affected by bending A. And everything else that happens in life
So are systems.

"So you say . . ."

“Malcolm was a different person,” Arnold said. "He sat in his office, did the right thing
mathematical model, and it didn’t occur to him that what he was seeing was wrong.


They are important. See: time | When we work with sounds, we use something called 'resonance'.
You.' The resonant diameter means that even if the missile didn’t break through the barrel, it
There was no hope for him. He couldn't, and he couldn't go back. is
Characteristics of mechanical systems. A small tear can become serious and affect the entire body. but
These small steps are important in life. It shows that freedom is.
And the answer. Malcolm didn't understand.

"Are you sure you don't understand? You're confusing the difference between
Life and not-"

"Look," Arnold said. "That's proof." He pointed at the cameras.

"In about an hour," he said, "the whole park was back on track. One thing that kept me
Phones obviously. For some reason they keep showing up. But everything else will work out.
And that’s not science. That is true.”


The needle was inserted into his chest and Harding was sprayed with Medrine.
The female dryosaur seems to be closer to the surface. And immediately the beast was made whole.
She screams and kicks her legs and arms.

"Go back, everyone," Harold said as he ran off. "Come back."

The dinosaur smiled and crossed his legs and shrugged. He lowered his head and looked
People ate in stone fireplaces.

“It’s growing,” Hammond said, grinning.

"Yeah," Harold said. "She's standing."

The Dresaurus was shocked, then walked slowly across the clearing in the distance.

Why don’t you go?

"He will," Harold said. "It'll take an hour to heal. Normal." He was shocked
Back to the car. "Alright boys, let's head over to Stego."


Muldoon watched as the tree trunk fell to the ground. The lines are drawn.
thickness, and the protocarpus layer was thickened. Muldoon could see dark bands;
Against the silver wall where he walked. At the bottom of the salt, a lot of concrete.
The insulators suffered. We had to replace them. But before that, Arnold
It should have covered the entire wall.

"Cote. This is Mildred. We're ready to start practicing." "all

“All right,” Arnold said. "Shut up now."

Muldoon looked at his watch. Somewhere in the distance, he heard a voice. I hear
Like whales, but he knew they were dolphins. She goes to Ramn and says we will finish.
above. | You want to get to the other side of the fence.


It’s been an hour. Donald Gennaro sees the glowing map in the control room as dots and
The numbers are staggering and changing. “What’s happening now?”

Arnold works in Kansas. "I'm looking for their phone numbers. So we called
Malcolm.”

"No, | I mean later."

Arnold looked down at the floor. "As the animals end up and both
education. from | I told you the park is in the barracks. If it wasn’t for Malcolm’s troubles. Hear,
There are three such categories. . . ."

"Arnold." was Muldoon's voice.

"Yes?"

"Did you see the bloody thing?"

"Just a minute."

Through an observer, Genaro saw a shadow in the distance below a field of grass, darkening.
air. There was a house away from me. "This is the school of Sarpoda,"
Arnold explained. "It's one of the most important ingredients we use in cosmetics, food coloring, and more."
We have them everywhere in the park, in every neighborhood." TV Video
He's walking. "Now we're turning the camera around to look at the ceiling . . ."

Gennaro saw the wall gleaming in the iron light. a protected section;
He was killed. The Mildred Jeep and crew were there.


"Huh," Arnold said. "You mean Rex went into Sauropod form."

said Mildred, "Nice dinner tonight."

"We have to get out of here," Arnold said.

"With what?" said Mildred. "Rex and I have nothing to work on. I'm building this wall, but
thou shalt not go in until the morning.

"He doesn't like it, Hammond."

"We'll talk about it when we get back," Mildred said.


How many sharks do sharks kill? Hammond said as he walked towards the courthouse.

"Well just one," Harold said. "The larger sauropods, the rex could only swim for a while
party.

“We’ve got to get out before nightfall,” Hammond said.

Mildred shook her head. "I won't be in there until the morning."

Hammond stood up, as he always did when he
pain. Have you forgotten that you work for me?

"No, Mr. Hammond, I don't. But it's an old Tyransaurus after all. How
Do you want to find it?

"We have weapons."

"We have 20-grain guns," Muldoon said. "It's good for an animal if
It weighs four or five hundred pounds. It weighs eight pounds. He was not afraid.

"You didn't ask for a powerful weapon . . ."

"|I asked for three big guns, Mr. Hammond, but you're sorry, we only got the stock
a. And he went out. Nedra took it when she left.

"It's ridiculous. Who ordered it?"

"Nedry is no problem to me, Mr. Hammond," Muldoon said.

Hammond said, “I think at this point, there’s no way around it
Tyrannosaurs?"

“That’s my point,” Muldoon said.

"That's a problem," Hammond said.

"This is your park, Mr. Hammond. You don't want a trespasser trespassing on your property
Dinosaurs. Well, now Rex has Sharpada and you don’t have to worry about that
Okay." he left the room.

"Just a minute," Hammond said, trailing off. Genaro looks at the screens, and
Hearing the noise from downstairs, she said to Arnold, "|I didn't know you knew."
You still own the park, after all.

"Don't worry," Arnold said, lighting another cigarette. "We have a park. It's going to look like that."
two hours. We may have to kill a couple of dinosaurs before we get Rex out of here, but hopefully
We have our park.”


breakfast


Grant woke up with a loud, mechanical creak. He opened the door.
The eye catches a glimpse of lightning passing in front of it on a path leading to the front of the house. double
This was richly blessed. Then the game was stopped from the beginning, and the garbage
The house was quiet again.

Grant sighed. He pulled away reluctantly, wincing in pain, and sat down.

Sunlight streamed in through their windows. Next morning: he slept all night!
He looked at his watch quickly: 5am.
Look at the idea. She threw herself on his chest and cried. His head was pounding and his body ached as he did.
And he got lost. He heard a noise near the stairs, like a lightning bolt. and
Then Lex laughs.

Grant pauses and looks around. Now that the sun was shining, he could see
Some home treatment, lots of medication and activities. He saw the hole in the wall.
Metal box and specimen: Sauropod Conservation Bldg (04). This should be
sauropod Paddock, as you might expect. He opens the drawer and looks at the phone, but when he does.
He picked up the receiver and found that the phones were still working.


"Watch your sleep," Lake said. "Don't be a dog, Ralph."

Grant walks down the hallway and sees Lex at the office door, holding a hand in a
The animal in the background is a black cat screaming at Grant
You know. A baby of three, the size of a horse. There was no needle in the baby.
In the head, it’s just a flat surface. He pushed his dick between the sheets.
As for Lex, his eyes watched her face as she put on more kisses.

"Better," Leake said. "There's plenty of medicine, don't worry." He shook the baby's head.
"You like horses, don't you, Ralph?"

Lex turned to look at him.

"That's Ralph," Lex said. "That's my friend. He likes trouble."

Grant took a step back and stood, sighing. "You're beautiful

“It’s bad,” Leake said.

"|You're so scared."

"Tim, too. He's got a sweet tooth."

“Where’s Tim?”

"Sleeping," she said. “Do you want to help me feed Ralph?”

The little Triceratop looked at Grant. Grass fell from both sides of his mouth.
The top of the tree becomes dangerous.

"He was a big eater," Leake said, "and he ate a lot."

The child coughs and licks his lips. He opened his mouth and swallowed again. extend
He could see her rounded nipples and cherry-shaped belly.

“Okay, just a minute,” Lex said, pushing another piece of trash out of the way, “Yeah,
Ralph, she said, "I hope your mother never left you."

Why the name Ralph?

"Because he's just like Ralph. In school."

Grant reached out and touched her thumb.

"Well, you can shoot," Leake said. "It feels good when you hold it, doesn't it, Ralph?"

His skin was dry and hot, like a ball. Ralph shouted something.
Grant shrugged. In the fields of the poles, the right tail bounces back and forth with excitement.

"It's very fast." Ralph watches Lex walk up to Grant as he eats and shows no signs of fear.
He reminds Grant that dinosaurs don’t just have the answers for humans. "maybe | maybe
Of course,” Leake said.

"We shouldn't do that."

"|It makes me laugh," Leake said. "It'll be fun to ride a dinosaur."

Grant looked at ribbons of animals and in the field of sauropods. I was
It lights up every few minutes. You need to explore the world and get
sensors at the base. After all, it might take the people in the control room an hour
Here she is. And he didn’t like the idea of ​​phones. . . .

They heard a noise, like the neighing of a large horse, and the boy was surprised.
They were worried. She tried to push her head between the pillows, but he caught her in the crotch.
frill, and screamed in fear.

The sun came up again. It was closer this time.

Ralph rose on his hind legs nervously between the ropes and shook his head.
Back and forth, he pushed against the boards.

"Ralph, you're right," Lex said.

"Wait," Grant said. He put his hand on Ralph's head and he leaned down and sighed.
Next to and behind the animal. The gun went wild and the boy fell into the gun and disappeared.
He walked faster and closer. So the baby hid in the shade and came up with a big
in sight, near the base of the tree. His feet have five toes like those of an elephant.

Ralph looked up and sighed. A bear appeared: six feet long and three feet wide.
A white mask, one over each big eye, and a small one behind her nose. fluent
A complete Throshertop. The creature looked at Lex and Grant, slowly blinked, and
He glared at Ralph. A mouth comes out and licks the baby. shouted Ralph and
He shrugged his shoulders happily.

Is that his mother? Lex said.

"Yeah," Grant said.


Should we feed the mother? Lex said.

But Mrs Thrushtorp pushes Ralph with her breasts and kills the baby
Barves.

"Don't worry."

The boy leaves the boat and goes. Sometimes, I have a mom.
His son, he called after they both left the bathroom.

"Good morning, Ralph," Leica said, extending his hand. Tim went out onto the porch.

"It tells you what," Grant said. "I went up the hill and turned off the motion sensors so they wouldn't move
Please welcome us. You two stay here and wait for me.”

"No," Lex said.

"Why? Stay here. It's safe here."

"Don't leave us," he said. "No, Timmy?"

"Okay," Tim said.

"Okay," Grant said.

They ran through the streets and outside.


This was before it was completely dry.

The air is hot and humid, and the sky is pink and purple. The white black is blocked.
ground. Off to the side, they see a mother Thrustertop and her cub playing in the yard,
The large mammals of Hadrosaurus fed on vegetation along the shore.

Some Hadrosaurs stood upright in the water. They bowed their heads and drank.
they stick their heads in the dry water. Then, they looked at each other again, their heads moving.
From the shore a little boy came out, screamed, and ran towards the water
The adults looked at him with confusion.

To the south, other Hadrosaurs fed on leaves. Sometimes they grew up
On their hind legs, put their feet up on the branches to reach the branches.
The legs are long. And far away, in the trees, was a huge Apatosaurus, small
wrapped around his big neck. The place was haunted, Grant couldn't believe it.
battle

"Yes!" Lex shouted and stepped closer. Two rounded arches with six legs are camouflaged.
they. "What's that?"

"Scorpions," he said. "Jurassic is the Age of Animals." "I can

He’s falling down?” Leake said.

"|Don't worry about it," Grant said.

Tim picked up his instrument. A dragon radiates light. He could feel the weight of the big thing.
insect.

"He's going to bite you," Lex said.

But the ball slowly turned white, and, when Tim
He reached out and pulled it back.

"Which way are we going?" Lex said.

"there."

They started walking to the other side of the hall. They came to a black box on a high metal railing.
tripod, the first motion sensors. Grant stopped and shifted his group forward and
But nothing happened. If the phones aren’t working, it’s possible that the sensor isn’t working.
"We'll see each other again," he said, pointing to everything. From a distance they hear
The voice of a large animal.


"Ah, hell," Arnold said. "I can't find it." He took a sip of coffee and watched the TV with his eyes closed.
He had deleted all the TV footage from the internet. At the courthouse, he searches for a computer.
Code. He was tired; He worked twelve hours a day. He looked at Wu, who
from the lab.

"What did you find?"

"The phones aren't out yet. They can't be returned. | I think Nedry did something to the phones."

Wu picked up a phone and heard a ringing. "Like a modem."

"But that's not it," Arnold said. because | went down to the basement and covered everything.
Modem. "What I hear is a white noise, which sounds like a modem is transmitting."


"So phones are bad?"

"Basically, yeah. Nedry's gotten too close. He's kind of covered it up."
Software Code, and System | I can't find it, because | issued a statute of limitations which was partly based on
program page. But the rule of thumb for phones seems to be set.
Computer memory.

Wu raised his hand. "So? Just do it: shut down the computer and reset the system."

"I've never done that before," Arnold said. "But I don't like it. It's all right."
You can go to the beginning-but you can go over them. You are not a computer scientist and neither are you. I don't
really. And since there is no phone line, we cannot talk to anyone who lives there.”

"If the process is RAM-resident, it won't show up in the code. You can free up some RAM and
You don't know what you are looking for. | You think you can only do it by thinking.

Enter Gennaro. "We don't even have a phone."

"We're working on it."

"You've been working on him since midnight. And Malcolm is the worst. He needs therapy
attention."

"That's why I have to sell it," Arnold said. "| I can't believe everything can go back."

Genaro said, "Look. There's a sick man in this room. He needs a doctor or he'll die. You."
Never call a doctor without a phone. At least four have died. contemporary,
Put down the phones and use the phones!

Arnold was shocked.

"good?" said January.

"Well, that's... Security systems don't allow access to the computer, and-"

"Then kill the guards! Don't think in your head that he's going
Dies without help?

"Okay," Arnold said.

He stood up and walked over to the main panel. He opened the doors and knocked
latches on secure straps. He released them one by one. "You asked for it,"
said Arnold. "And you understand."

He threw away the key.

The palace is dark. Everyone watching was black, and the three men stood in the darkness.

How long do we have to wait? said January. "Thirty seconds," Arnold said.


Pi! "It's going to be tested," Leake said.

"than?" Grant said.

"The flower!" Lex said. "Smells like free garbage."

Grant was shocked. He looked across the field at the tall trees, trying to figure it out. fluent
He saw nothing. There was no wind to move the branches. It was peaceful and quiet.
Early in the morning. "I think it's his idea," he said.

"No-."

Then he heard his voice. He came from the surrounding group of guards.
they. First one animal, then another, and another, until all the animals were screaming
cry. The ducks were so excited, they started swimming around and came out of the water to lay their eggs.
Others to be protected. . . .

They could smell it too, Grant thought.

With a roar, the Tyransaurus dashed through the trees, thirty yards away, beside the lion. He ran away.
You go to the field with a lot of bags. He ignored them and went in search of weeds.
Hadrosaurus.

I told you so! Lexi shouted. "No one can hear me!"

In the distance ducks crowed and wandered off. Grant could feel an earthquake.
under his feet. "Hey, kid!" He grabbed Leaky, picked his body up off the ground and ran off with
Tim loves the woods. He saw a tyransaurus on the beach, swimming.
hadrosaurs, who used their tails to protect themselves and moved around for mating and offspring. He heard
The rustling of leaves and trees, when he saw it, the ducks were flying.


Arnold looked at his watch, Arnold looked at his watch. Thirty seconds. The idea should be
It’s gone now. He flipped the power switch again.

Nothing happened.

Arnold's jaw dropped. He closed the shutter, then pulled it back. However, nothing happened. fluent
He has sweat on his face.

"What's wrong?" said January.

"Oh, hell," Arnold said. Then, remember that you have to turn on the safety switch.
Before the power came back on. He cut off the three panels and glued them back together with this.
Good page. Then he held his breath and made a strong surge.

The city lights are on. that

The computer beeped. leaves;

Think.

"Thank God," Arnold said. He confronted the chief of the guard. There were pages.
screen:


Gennaro reaches for his phone, but it’s dead. There was no scream this time - nothing.
"What is this?"

"Give me a moment," Arnold said. "After saving, all system functions must be restarted."
line manually." Soon the worker went back to work.

"Why?" said January.

"Would you let me work for Jesus?"

Wu said, "The system is not designed to shut down. So if it shuts down, it hurts
There is a problem somewhere. You have to start everything manually, otherwise, with
Somewhere down the line, the system starts, exits, resets, and discards.
Again, in an infinite loop.

“All right,” Arnold said. "Let's go."

Genaro grabbed his phone and started dialing, and he was shocked.

"Jesus, you don't see," he said. He pointed to a video monitor.

But Arnold doesn’t listen, looking at the map where the dots
the lagoon had begun to move in a straight line. It moves quickly, in a spiral pattern.

"What's going on?" said January.

"Ducks," Arnold said softly. "They made a mark."


Ducks move with rapid speed, their long bodies moving together;
And screaming, the children screamed and tried to stay a foot away. The animals raised big animals.
Clouds of lightning. Grant could not see the tyrant.

The ducks fly by.

Still holding on to Lex, he and Tim sprinted toward a boulder with big arms. And he oq.
It was hard, they felt the ground shaking beneath their feet. As the animals approached, they called out
It hurts the ears like the noise of planes at an airport. It filled the air and hurt their ears. Lexi screamed.
For one thing, however, he couldn’t hear the screams as he stepped on the rocks,
The animals joined them.

Grant had larger legs than the early Hadrosaurus, weighing more than any animal
Five tons, then he was in the clouds and couldn’t see anything. Heart
The display of large muscles, large legs, cries of pain when the prey is taken and
page. A duck threw a stone and bounced in front of them, then left the field.

Through the black clouds, they could see nothing more than rocks. They meet each other.
Listen to the voices and voices of the South. Lexi signed her name.
Her breasts were on Grant's chest.

Another Henderson slams his fist against the rocks, leaving a trail of blood. extend
He waited until the sound of fighting came from his left, then joined the boy.
He began to climb the big tree. They climbed up quickly, grabbing the branches like animals
They covered themselves with dust. He walked about twenty feet, and Lex caught Grant.


And he didn't want to go far. Tim was shocked too, and Grant thought there were too many. through
Earth, they can see the movements of the animals as far as they can go.
Grant sat back on the wooden bench, leaning back into the bed and closing his eyes.
And to catch it.


Arnold turned off the camera as the animals walked away. He slowly cleared his throat. He looked at her.
The hadrosaurs passed by and the tyrannosaurs stayed behind, which means
He had committed a murder. Samson was near the water. Arnold looked at the video camera.
"Muldoon you better go and see how bad it is," he said.

"I'll take it," Gennard said and left the room.


park


And that this is like a spark in a fire. Something hot and black pressed against Grant's neck.
He opened his eyes and saw a huge tower of skulls. The head is placed in a locked door.
Like a duck breast. The eyes on the back of the duck breast are round and bright yellow.
of cow. The duck door opened and Grant sat eating his hands. fluent
He saw big dicks in his class. The tails pulled back and the animal gasped.

Hadrosaurus means duck. It was interesting to see it up close. Epic; all
There are several species of dinosaur that ate land and these worked like cattle. and
Despite its size, the scene was bold and brave, and Grant wasn’t intimidated by it. stay
From where he was on the tree branch, he told her off and watched her eat.

What surprised Grant was that there were some references to the animal:
Probably Mysore, from Montana of the Late Cretaceous. and John Horner, please
He was the first person to describe different types of soil. Myshaur has a rounded neck, which is
The face is a tree. Her name means she is a beautiful woman, thought to protect the maiasaurs.
The eggs last until the babies are born and can fend for themselves.

Grant heard a noise and his left side twitched. He turned to look.
The young Hadrosor threw himself at the old man's feet. The baby is black and white.
bar. The old man lowered his head and waited, motionless, for the boy to wake up.
It places its hind legs and front legs on its mother's neck and eats twigs.
from near the shore.

The mother waits patiently until her baby has finished eating and everything falls to the floor
Four more, and the tail was back at Grant’s side.

Hadrosaurus was still feeding just a few meters away. Grant took a moment on the two.
Air hole at the end of the frame. The dinosaur couldn't detect Grant's scent. therefore
Although the ghost was looking at him for some reason, Henderson didn't answer him.

He remembered seeing it the night before. Grant exclaimed.
About a test.

He sniffs.

Suddenly Hadrosaur was shocked, and suddenly the huge head was no longer rubbing its tail. Only
He walked forward, looking for the source of the noise. Then, after a while, when he decided
There was no danger, the creature began to forget.

Strange, Grant thought.

Sitting in his arms, Lex opened his eyes and said, "Hey, what's that?"

Hadrosaurus roared, the loud Portuguese that scared Lexus and made
He fell from the tree. And Hadrasa lifted up his head from the tree, and laid it on his head, and spake again.

"Don't be afraid," Tim said from the front row.

And the young man cried, and ran unto his mother's feet, and came to Harozor.
amusing. His mother raised her head and asked the tree, Grant and him.
Lex sits down. A dinosaur has a smiley face shape.

Don’t you like it? Lex said.

"No," Grant said. "He was just scared of her."

"Well," Lex said, "You gonna let us make water or what?"

Hadrozor threw ten bolts. He threw it again. and Grant at
impression He was trying to scare them. But of course, Kanba didn’t know.


Goal. He found it disgusting and disgusting. They wait a minute or so.
the hadrosaur approached the branch again, rubbing his eyes in thought. Obviously, it goes
Start eating.

"You're right," Lex said. "I'm not staying here." He began to climb the branches. along
Walking away, the Hadrosaur drops a new message.

Grant was great. He thought he wouldn't see us if we passed. And a minute later
We've almost forgotten we're here. This looks like another example of Tyransaurus
Amphibian optic cortex. Studies of frogs have shown that aquifers are not static, e.g.
Insects. If something doesn't move, they don't see it. It was like the same thing.
Dinosaurs.

Anyway, it looks like Mayasaurus has discovered these weird tree climbers
How encouraging that is. She threw her son into the backyard and slowly fell asleep. It saves time.
Once, and look at them and move on.

They got to the bottom of it. Lex shook his head. Both children kiss goodbye.
dirty. The forest was cleared all around them. There were smears of blood and urine
smell.

Grant looked at his watch. "Well, let's go kids," he said.

“No,” Leake said. "I'm not going here."

"We should do it."

"why?"

"Sure," Grant said, "we should tell them about the island. If they don't want to see us."
In motion sensor, we have to go all the way alone. It’s the only way.

"Why shouldn't we take the boat?" said Tim.

Which group?

Tim pointed to the sparse maintenance room where they had been for so long.
evening. He was 20 yards from the fence. "| I saw a ship here," he said.

Grant immediately recognized the benefits. It was now about one o'clock in the morning. they
There were about eight kilometers to go. If they took the boat to the other side of the river, there would be more
Fastest growth in the world. "We'll do it," Grant said.


Arnold went into video search mode and saw the monitors flickering all over the place.
park, with images changing every two seconds. I'm tired of being seen, but quickly.
Sal sees Nedry's Jeep and Muldoon decides to do it. Released with
Genaro looked at the people, but now it was too late and he wanted to find the car. fluent
He wanted weapons.

His phone rang. "Mr. Arnold, can I tell you something, okay?" fluent

And Hammond. It sounded like the word of God.

"Do you want to come here, Mr. Hammond?"

"No, Mr. Arnold," said Hammond. "Come with me. I'm in the genetic lab with Dr. Wu. We're
I'm waiting for you.

Arnold took a deep breath and turned away from the cameras.


Grant was thrown into the hallway. He poured five gallons.
Four bottles, pesticides, Jeep tires, air tires;
Hundreds of pounds of dirt, metal, engine oil, tools
The lights and the blankets.

"| You don't see a cloud."

"Keep going."

cement sheets, copper plates, sheets .. . Two plastic boats held up by metal bars.
Environment is not a wall.

"All right," he said, "but where's the ship?" "fluent

You must be here somewhere,” Tim said.

"Did you see a boat?"

"No, | I just thought you were here."


Among Grant’s dirty drawers, he couldn’t find a key. But he found a bunch of plans and went back and
He hangs it on a metal hole in the wall, giving you his thoughts.
on the ground, and a beast appears. He looked at them for a long moment.

"I'm standing... .""Just

minutes."

These maps contain detailed information about the original parts of the island where they are now located.
As a result, the valley narrowed into the river they once saw, which became
at the end of the day. . . Just like the birds do. . . and within half a kilometer of the circumference.

He filled out the paperwork. How do we get to the hotel? According to the figure, there are
Maybe there was a door in the basement where they were. Grant looked up and saw it and shrugged it off.
in the body of the roof. The gate is too wide for a car. When he opened the door, he saw a
Hang out by the lake. The road was buried underground and did not
Light from above. That’s another way of working. And he went ashore to the lake.
And the most noticeable feature of the ship is the RAFT STORAGE.

"Hey," Tim said, "look at that." He handed Grant a gun.

Opening it, Grant found a compressed air rifle and a cloth clip firing bullets. Six years.
arrows throughout, each the size of your thumb. The designation is MORO-709.

"Good job Timmy." He strapped the belt around his waist with his gun tucked in his holster.

"A gun blazing?"

"I'll say that."

“How is my father?” Lex said.

"I think he's at the top of the mountain," Grant said. They started walking down the street. Grant took the boat he needed to take.
shoulder. "I'm glad this is a big boat," Lex said, "because | I don't swim well."

"Don't worry," he said.

"Maybe we can catch a fish," he said.

They were walking along the road, and the water was rising on both sides.
They heard a noise, but Grant couldn't tell where it was coming from.

"Do you think there's a hole in here?" Lex said, shrugging.

"Okay," Grant said.

The noise continued as they i n walking, but they also heard a noise.
The sound in When they reached the end, at the end of the little street,
Grant was overwhelmed by kindness.

There was a Tyransaurus here.

They sit in the shade of a tree with their feet in front of them. The eyes
It was open but only slowly moving;
noise. The sound from the clouds of water rolling past him blinded him and
His throat is swollen and his mouth is bleeding and the carcass of a slain Hadrosaurus lies beneath his neck.
Thirmansaurus.

Tiranasara is divided into twelve districts. Grant was sure he had seen it, but he
The dragon didn't answer him. He just sat there. It took him a moment to realize: Tyransaurus had
asleep. I was awake, but asleep.

He told Tim and Leica to stay where they were. Grant walked slowly forward.
dock, in full tyrannosaur face. The old man was still asleep, snoring slowly.

Near the port end, the tree is stained green to blend in with the beams. extend
She opened the door and looked outside. A half-dozen orange slices were eating at him.
wall, some shelves, some metal, and two mana cubes are sitting
below. The cables are inserted with a pair of clamps.

Raft.

He snarled at Lex again. fluent

Mouth: No date, he shook his head.

Yes.

Tyransaurus raised his hand to rub its tail beside his neck. But that's not
He didn't move. Grant rolled a cube out of the cliff. He was surprised at how quickly. fluent
He removed the tubes, and discovered the cylindrical phenomenon. With a roar, the machine began to spin, and
And with hissy-vape! It opens to the deck. They are very loud.
ear.


Grant was shocked, looking up at the dinosaur.

Tyransaurus roared and screeched. He started to leave. Grant tried to escape, but he
The animal sighed and sat down on the tree trunk and stood still.
Scream, scream.

Lex frowned and waved his hand over his face.

Grant was burned for nothing in revenge. He moved the kitchen to the other side of the dock. fluent
He fell into the water with a thud.

The dinosaur is still sleeping.

Grant ties the boat to the dock, returns to the dock and unloads the two guns. fluent
Put them in the basket, then reach out and pull the kids out of the basket.

Hesitating, Lex threw up his hands, no, he did.

He raised his hand: Yes.

Tyransavari is still asleep.

Grant tossed it into the air with a kick. Lex came over slowly, and gave him a kiss.
gets on the raft; Then Tim came in and they both got dressed. Grant came in and stretched.
The boat is floating downstream. Grant took his plate and held it out.
ship. They fled across the mountain.

Lex sat down and breathed heavily in shock. Then he felt like he was out, and he was grateful
mouth. He rubbed his body, in a low voice: trying to breathe.

She always gets a disease at the wrong time!

"Lex," Tim shouted, turning back to the river.

He shook his head vigorously and stretched his neck. He knew what she meant: a change.
The voice. He only needs one drink. Grant drove the boat, and Tim rode on it.
He reached into the bowl and shook his hand.

Lex pulled hard and gasped. To Tim’s ears, the sound bounced off the water like a
Weapons.

Tyransaurus laughed softly and rubbed the back of his head with his dog-like paws. fluent
He shook his head again. He was very tired after a big meal and slowly got up.

On the boat, Lex makes a little noise. “Lex;

Shut up!” Tim said.

"| I can't give it up," he sighed, then sighed again. Grant worked on the boat to get the boat going.
He jumped into the middle of the river.

At the bottom of the river, Tyransaurus reappeared.

"| I can't talk, Tim!" Lexi shouted. I didn't do it!

"Shhh!"

Grant steered the ship as fast as he could.

"It's good," she said. "We're very careful. He can't go in the water."

"It really sucks, you bastard!" Tim shouted. Downstream, Tiranapur
He got off the boat and jumped into the water. He followed them to the water.

"Well, how does it | know?" she said.

"Everyone knows that turkeys are cheerleaders! It's in every book! Anyway, all animals are cheerleaders!"

"Snakes are bad."

"Yes, death is possible. You bastard!"

"Stop," Grant said. Bring something! Grant looked at the Tyransaurus.
It looks like a dog moves. The Tyransaurus jumped into the water, but it did
Its huge head hit the ground, and Grant knew the animal couldn't move, and it did.
in motion, because after a while only the eyes and nose came from the top of the head
above. At the time he looked like a duck and walked like a duck, changing body
The tail moves and moves, and the water flows behind it. Overhead, Grant is the head
the bottom, and his teeth were all over the place, as if he had crushed their heads a few times.

He thought as happily as a crocodile. The crab is the biggest in the world.

"I'm so sorry, Dr. Grant!" Lex shouted. I don't want him!

Grant looked over his shoulder. Here the lake was not more than a hundred feet deep.
And they get to the middle. If allowed, the water level will continue to rise.
Tyransaurus can also swim and swim in shallow water. extend
He turned the boat around and started heading south.


"What are you doing?"

The Tyrannosaurus was only a few yards away. Grant hears her breathing.
As he approached. Grant looked at the pads in his hands, but they were blank.
All guns.

The Tyransaurus tilted its head back and opened its mouth, revealing its sharp claws.
and, with a sudden jerk of his body, he sprang upon the ship, which was flat;
The big head swung over him, and water splashed down the side of the bridge.

The Tyrannosaurus struck backwards, leaving the glands behind. The lake was still there. Lex
He clenched his fists and looked down.

Is it in your mouth?

"No," Grant said. He noticed bubbles - and a small fire hovering near the mountain -

"Attention!" He screamed as he hit his head under the rubber mat, turning the boat around and drifting off.
It’s in the air, catching their attention before disappearing again.

Do something! Alex shouted. Do something!

Grant pulled the air piston out of his pocket. It looked very small in his hand, but he had
It can kill the animal in an uncomfortable place around the eyes and mouth.

Tyransaurus appeared beside the mountain, opened its mouth and roared. Grant turns and
taken. The shield glittered in the light and snapped its tail. Tyransaurus shook his head.
And he gave it to me again.

Suddenly, they hear a noise coming from the water toward them.

As a result, Grant spotted the young T-Rex on the beach and noticed the sauropod had been killed.
He says it’s his fault. The young man cleared his throat, then shook his head.
he shouted. The Great Tyrannosaurus saw it too, and had the same answer - it went back to
Take care of the kill and go across the river.

He's walking! Lex shouted and threw up his hands. "I'm moving! Nh-nnn-
I don't߹ A fucking dinosaur!

From the shore, the young man shouted in disgust. In shock, the Great Tyransaurus retreated
lagoon in all its glory, with it rising out of the bay and into the mountains beyond the sea.
The boy shook his head and ran out, his belly full of precious meat.

The dragon let go, ran to the dead monkey’s feet, and disappeared from the mountain. they
He heard her breath hitch in surprise.
lagoon, by the river.

Too tired to keep going, Grant collapsed and strained his ankle. He almost couldn’t catch his breath.
He was in heaven and bowed.

"Are you okay, Dr. Grant?" Lex asked.

"From now on, what are you going to | Shall I tell you?"

'Oh-kay, " he cried, as if he had asked the dumbest question in the world.
He held his hand in the water for a while. "You've missed the boat," he said.

"I'm tired," Grant said.

"So how are we doing?"

Grant sat down. It was good. The ship was slowly drifting east. "Now he has to be." that
The metro took them in the afternoon to the hotel. He looked at his watch and sighed.
Fifteen minutes past seven. Only 15 minutes had passed since he left.
Your watch. So two hours.

Grant put it back on the tape and closed his eyes and went to sleep.


Fifth step.


"The problems in the system are getting worse now."
Ian Malcolm
search


Genaro sat down in the jeep and listened to the roar of the sea lions, looking up at the tall palm tree.
The trees are trembling with fire. He was surprised by what looked like a war zone: the jungle.
There are a hundred meters in each direction. A huge palm tree fell.
ground. There was a big pool of blood in the grass and on the rocks to k
good.

Sitting next to him, Mildred said "It doesn't look good. Rex was in the middle of a Hadrosaurus." fluent
He took another bottle of whiskey and swallowed thickly. "It's very fast," he said.

They wait and watch.

Gennaro slammed his fist on the table. What are we waiting for?

The mayor did not immediately respond. "There's Rex in here somewhere," she said, grinning
Landscape in the morning. "And none of our weapons have any power."

"We're in the jeep."

"Oh, he drives in the Jeep, Mr. Gennard," Mildred nodded. "When we go
On this road and inland the most we can do in four rounds is thirty-four miles
an hour. It pulls us down. No problem." Mud shrugged. "But | I don’t see much
I'm going now. Are you willing to go through that trouble?

"All right," Genaro said.

Muldoon started the engine, and with a whoosh, two little Otniellia
Wood made of wood. Muldoon gave me his car. He walks in a circle.
He found the hole and went inside and jumped down some tunnels to the bottom
And he came to a place in the field where the young men of Othniel were. Then he got out and walked away.
Continue walking through the grass, away from the jeep. When he stops, a tall cloud rises in the sky.

"What is that?" Gennaro said.

"Bring on the radio," Mud said.

Genaro got out of the Jeep and walked towards it. Even from a distance, he could
Powder-ointment dries quickly. He saw something black in the grass with blood on it, he kn
askew.

"Son of Hadrosaurus," Mildred said, glaring at Suri. "Everyone's going."
And the kid was scared and a T-rex attacked him.

"How do you know?" said January. The meat is cut into pieces.

"You can tell the difference," Mildred said. "See that white stuff in the grass?"
The Hadro Spore. Uric acid acts white. But you can see it here”-he pointed towards a large mountain.
He pokes his tail in the grass-"That's the tail of a tyrannosaur."

How do you know Tyre came later?

"It's kind of weird," Mildred said. "You see those kids?" He pointed to the bird.
"These are from autism. These spots are not bloody. The post-mortems are from deer."
Otis did. But Hadro landed with a chip on his shoulder - you see the big scar
That, over his shoulder, was T-rex, no question.

Genaro looked at his body, looking at his feet.
It's not true. Next to him, Muldoon turned on his radio. "ride. "

"Yeah," John Arnold said over the radio.


"We found another dead Hadra. Juvenile." Muldoon crouched among the branches and watched.
The skin on the back of the leg. There was a number written, "Book is number HD/09."

The radio crackled. "I have something for you," Arnold said.

"Oh? What's that?"

"|Found Nedra."


The Jeep drove through the palm trees on the west side of the narrow road.
The work road, which leads to work in the woods. This part of the park was hot and very wooded.
and fetid around them. Muldoon looks at Gibb’s computer, which is now
He showed a map of the social media location. "They got it on remote video," she said
said. "Scot 1104 is in front of you."

Further down the road, Gennaro saw a cliff, a jeep pulling up next to it. "fluent
It could have gone the wrong way,” Muldon said. "Little boy."

What did he bring? Gennaro asked.

"Wu said fifteen young men. Do you know what it means?"

Genaro shook his head.

"Somewhere between two and ten million," Mildred said. He shook his head. "It's a lot."

As they got closer, Janrod saw the body lying next to the car. The body is not red and
Green – but then the usual greens popped, as did the Jeep.

“Comps,” Muldoon said. "The Comisers got it,"

Twelve Prochomygnathidae, small birds larger than ducks, are distinguished.
Out of the woods, shouting for joy, the men got out of the car.

Dennis Nedry was sprained on his neck, shoulders and back. The dogs are gone.
His mouth was open and his mouth was agape. His body was damaged - throat tightness, a
His feet are ready to go. Genaro froze for a moment, looking at the dwarves in concern.
Their hind legs stretched out slightly, and they looked at the crowd. There were dinosaurs.
Five fingers, he gave. They wash their eyes and mouths and give them the shock.
The best-

"I'm cursing," Mildred said. "We don't have time for a committee."

"than?"

Mildred shakes her head. Do you see the patterns? In his clothes and face? Do you wear makeup.
Does it smell like old dry smoke?

Genaro frowned. He sniffed.

“It stinks,” Muldoon said. "Dilophosares are gone. You see the problem
corneas, all black. In our eyes, it’s painful but not deadly. You have about two hours to wash it.
Go out with the antennas; We keep an eye on everything around the park when we can. If it doesn't mean that this
bastard. They blinded him and cut him in half, unfairly. It's okay.
There are animals in the world, after all."

procompsognatbids screamed and jumped up and down as Genora opened the front door
At the door find a gray metal pipe and a metal box. "Everything was still there," he said. fluent
He handed Gennaro two black pills.

"What is this?" said January.

"That's how good they are," Muldon said. "Rockets." When Genaro returned he said;
You don’t want to miss out on anything.

Genaro rubbed his leg over Nedry's body. Muldoon took the pipe and went to the other Jeep;
and put it at the bottom. Get in the back of the car. "Let's go."

"How is he?" Genaro said, pointing to his chest.

"How is he?" said Mildred. "We have things to do." He drove the car. I'm looking.
In the background, Genaro watches the cars start to slow down. One jumped up and landed on Nedra's shoulder.
He opened his mouth and licked the flesh of his lips.


The forest canopy has been reduced. The plates on both sides are sealed to prevent the installation of wood and debris.
These converge on the front and block out the sun. Tim hears the birds chirping and he
Small dinosaurs roam the trees. But soon enough, the air was hot;
under a tree canopy.

Grant looked at his watch. It was eight o'clock.


They walked peacefully in the light. If so, it looks like
Moving faster than before. You just woke up and Grant was laying on his back looking at the trees.
Head to head. Just then, he saw his wife get up.

"Hey, what are you doing?" she said.

Do you think it is safe to eat these fruits? He pointed to the trees. Some would say
Her toes seemed to ache to touch. Tim looked at the yellow spots on his hands.

"No," Grant said.

Why? Small dinosaurs eat them. He showed the little dinosaurs moving
The leaves.

"No, Lexi."

He was happy, not happy with his power. "| I wish my father was here," she said. "Always
He knows what he is doing.”

"What are you talking about?" said Tim. "He doesn't know what he's doing."

"Yes, he does," she sighed. Lex watched the trees go by, their roots spinning
Below the water. "Because he's not a follower . . ."

Tim sighed, not saying anything.

"But don't worry, you look good too, Dad. Even when you're on computers and in gyms."

"My mom was an athlete," Tim explained to Grant.

Grant shook his head. In the branches of the trees moved a few small green birds.
There was laughter and another laugh. They had a ceramic head. "Do you know what they're called?" said Tim.
"Microcertop."

“It’s big,” Leake said.

"| I think you're right."

"Only kids are interested," he said, "in dinosaurs."

"Who's saying?"

"Sir."

Tim started crying, but Grant consoled his friend. "Children," he said, "shout."

"why?" Lex said, "|you can do what | I want, if you-"

Then he shut up because he heard it too. A noise comes from somewhere.
T-five.


Well, where's Rex?" Mildred asked, speaking into the radio. "We really don't know.
see here." They were again at the edge of Sarpodah, looking at the ragged forest
This is where the Hadrosaurs lived. Tyrannosaurus is nowhere to be seen.

"I see now," Arnold said and sighed.

Muldoon was angry with Genaro. "I see you now," she repeated quietly. "Why don't you
Have you tried it? Why didn't he try?'

"|I don't know," Janari said.

“It doesn’t show,” Arnold said after a moment.

What does it mean that it doesn’t show?

"Not on the cameras. The motion sensors don't pick up."

"Hell," Mildred said. "Most of it's upside down. Did you see Grant and the kids?"

"Gentle movements are not welcome."

"Well, what do we do now?" said Mildred.

"Calm down," Arnold said.


Look! Look!

In front of them, a large bird wing towered overhead. Grant had only seen it once.
clingy; Now he realized it was four miles or more away. example
The Zedis struts glowed in the black and his first impression was that the glass must
It weighs a ton. Then, as they drew closer, he saw that there was no glass, only glass. soft wire
He hides in their land.

"It didn't happen," Lex said.

"|I think that's what it's all about," Grant said.

"That's why all the birds are flying away."

"If they're big birds," Grant said.


The river flowed down the mountain. They look up at the ceiling. now they
In the bathroom, you can still fall to the floor. Except for a few minutes.
If we don’t see it in the fog. Grant said, "|I remember there was a second bedroom
Here." Shortly thereafter he bought a house in the woods on the east coast.

Do you want to go? said Tim.

"Maybe it's a phone. or some kind of foul play." Grant went after him. "We have to try
to contact the Control Center. Time is running out.

They climbed out of the water, gliding along the flat water, and Grant pulled the boat out of the water.
Then he tied the rope to a tree, and they stepped out into a thick forest of Indian trees.


vehicle;


"|I just don't understand it," John Arnold said over the phone. "It's not Ricky, and |
Also, you can’t go anywhere with Grant or the kids.

He sat down in front of the consoles and took another cup of coffee. All around, government.
The house was covered in blankets and perfectly baked sandwiches. Arnold was shocked. I was
Saturday at 8:00 a.m. For fourteen hours since Nedry turned off the computer.
In Jurassic Park , Arnold patiently repeats the scenes, one after the other. "The whole park
The settings are back on and working fine. The phones work. I called a doctor.
You are."

Across the hallway, Malcolm looked uneasy. Arnold talks to him in his room.
Logic. "But is there a problem with the motion sensors?"

"Well, I don't get | what I'm looking for."

"Like Rex?"

"It's not hungry today. It started at dusk, about twenty minutes away, and went
on the feast day, and then | It is destroyed. | I don’t know why, but I’m always sleeping.

"But shouldn't it be Grant and the kids?"

"I don't."

"I think it's simple," Malcolm said. "Social relationships create a safe space."

"Doesn't fit in?" Arnold rubbed his eyes. "They closed ninety-two-"

"Ninety-two percent of the world, | remember," Malcolm said. But if you put the others down.
places on the surface, | Consider that you will find that eight percent is a reasonable percentage, as
that these parts are relevant. Basically, the animal can roam anywhere in the park.
Explore streams, forests, rivers and water.
anything."

"Still," Arnold said, "dogs don't have the brains to feel it."

“I don’t know how the animals suffer,” Malik said.

What do you think Grant and the kids are doing? said Arnold.

"Not now," Malcolm said, charging again. "Grant is no genius. He really wants to be
Ask him to tell you. The wife and children hide from the motion sensors they see. But you can
They have other problems that we do not know about. Or they're on the river, chij.

"|Don't expect them to reach the river. The banks are steep. You can't swim in
there."

"Are you going to take the question all the way here?"

"Yeah, but this isn't the best road, because it goes through the birds…."

Why not the birds that fly? Malcolm said.

"We had a problem with the concept. First, the park was just a grove of trees
Built on the ground, travelers can see the glaciers from a different perspective. Us
Four species of dactyls have been identified among birds now - yes, cearadactyls, the dactyls are very carnivorous.

How are they?

"Well, while we're building the house, we put the ducks in the chicken coop to train them. But they
This is a big problem. It turns out that our whales are territorial.

"Tyretori?"

"Hard ground," Arnold said. They fight each other for land and invade
"All the other animals that come into the area will hear it."

"attack?"


"It's great," Arnold said. “Birds of the heavens flap their wings, and
dive. A 30 pound dog would knock a man to the ground like a brick. They
The workers were beaten and forced to dismember their bodies.

Aren’t your ducts damaged?

"That's not it."

"So if children are among the birds.. ."

"Not them," Arnold said. "At least, I don't think so."


"Is that Lori?" Lex said. "What a leaf."

Underneath the bird’s nest, Peteratops Lodge is built on the ground in the treetops
pylons, in the middle of the tree. But the house was unfinished and unpainted; that
The windows are tinted. The trees and the house are decorated with white flowers.

"I think they didn't do anything," Grant said, hiding his disappointment. fluent
He looked at his watch. "Let's go back to the store."

The sun rose as they walked, and the morning was beautiful. Grant looked
A line of sight lines from the dome above saw that the earth and
The lines are marked in a single white box as the
room. And the smell wafted in the morning air.

"It smells bad in here," Lex said. "What do you mean all white?"

"It's like a pigeon feeding. It's good for the birds."

Why didn’t they finish Lorraine?

"|I don't know."

They entered a clearing of grass covered with moss. They heard a voice.
Then the horn sounded, coming from the other side of the forest.

"What is that?" "I don't

expert."

Then Grant saw a dark cloud over the grass. the slope
I go faster. Soon, he ordered them arrested. He looked up and saw that it was very dark.
They light up the sky.

"Yes!" Lex said. "Pteridactic?" "Yes,"

said Tim.

Grant didn't answer. He was a good jumper, skydiving. above
In front of their heads, the pterodactyl releases a tail and makes a beautiful sound, turning towards them.

How do you not walk down the street? said Tim.

Grant thinks the same thing. Dinosaurs flying are beautiful and beautiful.
He was flying through the air. When Grant looked up, he saw a second bird in the sky.
The third and fourth.

"Maybe it's because they didn't finish the lodge," Leake said.

Grant thought that pterodactyls were not unusual. They’re too big. They should
cearadactyls, the largest flying reptiles of the Early Cretaceous. If he was at the bottom, he wou
Like small planes. As they descended, he saw creatures with five-legged wingspans.
His body was red and his head was like a crocodile. They ate the f out of it. North America and
Mexico.

Lex opened his eyes and looked up. Can they harm us?

"|Don't worry. I eat fish."

A figure hovered on the ground, and a black shadow screamed at you and the police.
The hot air and the smell of smoke.

"Wow!" Lex said. "They're really big." And he said, do you think they shouldn’t hurt us?

"Dump."

The second layer goes through the process faster than the first. He came right back and did it.
in front of their heads. Grant shrugged and rubbed his body. It means something big.
bat, he thought. But the animals looked shocked Grant. Their mother
The wings are attached – the black feathers are attached to it – so it’s a bit of a stretch.
Everything encouraged the Ducts.

"Envelope!" Lex yelled and grabbed his hair. But he sent me! "fluent

What?" Grant said.


"He shot me! He shot me!" When he picked up his broom, he saw blood on his hands.

Upstairs, two more Doctors catch their wings and collapse into little blankets
He fell to the ground. They made a scream as they ran downstairs.

"come on!" Grant said holding their hands. They play with each other and.
With a roar, he jumped to the ground one last time and picked up the children
They came down after the two dogs that were riding them, flapping their wings. extend
He felt like he had the shield on his back.

Then he got up, got the Lexus up and ran with Tim a few steps ahead and
Two more birds circled overhead, chirping. In the end, the
Throwing the children to the ground, the darkness stretched deeper and deeper.

"Uck," Lex said, annoyed. He noticed that the birds were white.

Grant jumped to his feet. "come on!"

As he was about to run, Lex cried out in fear. He flinched and saw something.
dactyls had held the neck with their dorsal shields. animals with many wings, leather;
It glistened in the sunlight, split in two. The doctor tries to wake him up.
But Lex was too heavy, and as he struggled, he hit his head several times with his breathing.
The back of his neck.

Lex yelled and waved his hands frantically. Grant did the same thing he was trying to do. fluent
He jumped forward, turned, and threw himself at the Duke’s body. He threw it.
His fist hit the ground, and he fell on his body. The animal screams;
Grant lifted his head from his mouth and rolled onto his back as a scream echoed around him.
body. It was like being in a tent in a breeze. He couldn't see; He couldn't stand it; I was
Nothing but screaming and yelling and pulling leather. The legs are dry.
in front of his neck. Lex screamed. Grant threw himself at Dactyl and screamed.
And he recoiled when he changed direction and tried to turn around. Finally, he gave in.
His wings like the wings of a bird flapped and he flew up on his back and started walking down the street.
He stopped immediately.

He could even walk on his wings! Lederer was right! But there are other doctors.
He thought of them, Grant was shocked and helpless, in horror he watched Lex walk away, the
Hands on head. . . Tim shouted in the background. . . .

The first of them fell to the ground and hit something with a fist.
And to spit. The other ducts soon rise and follow the first floor. The fourth
dactyl flies through the air to mate with others. Grant looked up, saw.
What had happened. The three doctors asked first, shouting angrily.

They were the only ones on the show. "than

Good? Grant said.

"They got my gloves," Leake said. "The Daryl Strawberry Special."

They started walking again. Tim put his hand on his hip. "Are you okay?"

"Yeah, it's bad," he said, sighing. He looked up at the ceiling. "|I hope they get hurt and die,"
she said.

"Yeah," Tim said. "me too-"

The boats are offshore. Grant looked at his watch. Eighty-thirty. fluent
He now had two and a half hours to get back.


Lex shouted as they passed the Silver Birds Dome. Then, in 1990, the beaches were closed.
On each side, the tree meets the river. The river is smaller than it looks, in some ways.
The holes were ten feet deep, and the water was flowing. Lexi reached out and touched their hands.
Like they will pass.

Grant sits on the boat and listens to the hot tub. they
They walked for a while, and now the tree branches were passing. It's beautiful. FLUENT .
A cool breeze passed through the burning trees and moved. And that means they will get
A lot of time.

Grant wasn’t sure how far they had traveled, but it was several miles
sauropod where they spend their days. Maybe four or five miles. There can be many.
This means that they only have an hour’s drive from the hotel once they leave the ship. But then the


aviary, Grant didn’t hesitate to repeat the process. Now they were doing good
schedule.

"| I wonder how Ralph is," Lex said. "You could die or something."

"It's good."

"| I thought you were going to let me take it." He liked to sleep under the sun. "It will be fun to run
Ralph.

Tim said to Grant, "Remember the Stegosaurus? Last night?"

"Yes."

Why did you ask them about turtle DNA?

"It's for our health," Grant said. "They can't explain why dinosaurs lived
Because they’re playing, and because they’re all women.

"good."

"Well, radiation is dangerous and harmless. I think it's safe."
is shown here. But there’s still the problem of female dinosaurs. How can they survive
When will all the women come?

"Okay," Tim said.

"No, in the entire animal kingdom, being gay is a bad thing."

"Tim is very interested in sex," Lex said.

None of them are the same. “For example,” says Grant, “most animals are self-grooming
If we can’t have a relationship. The male releases a sperm that has
The lion, the woman will kill him next time. This change is not significant
There are as many physical differences between men and women as you might expect. people and
Women value the names of animals more than humans.

Tim shook his head. "And what about the frogs?"

Grant heard a rustling sound in the trees above  as the Microcertopsians disappeared in a panic.
The branches shook. To the left the huge head of Tyransaurus sticks out of the tree trunk.
Tables are used on board. Lex screamed in shock and Grant ran to the side.
But the lake here is only ten feet deep. Tyrannosaurus trapped in a body cage
He turned his head and screamed. Then, he tilted his head back.

Among the trees along the river they saw a large black Tyransaurus.
He heads south, looking for a spot in the trees along the shore. All microservices are available
He went to the other side, where he was screaming, yelling and jumping up and down. On
raft, Grant, Timothy, and Lexus were on a warpath when the Tyransaurus tried to attack again, but the
There were many trees along the river. The Tyrannosaurus changed again.
At the bottom of the stairs, he tried again, the branches flinching.

However, this was not always the case.

Then he went lower. "AM

I love it,” Leake said.

Grant sat in the boat, very confused. If you miss Tyransaurus, you’ll
Nothing could have saved them. The river was calm and small.
ship. It was like being in a cave. The rubber bands hurt the side like a boat.
He was swept away by a wave.

He looked at his watch. Nine is close. The ship sank.

"Hey," Lex said, "listen up!"

He heard a voice, among the many noises. Voices were coming from outside
Legal, under the river. He listened, and heard their voices again.

"What is that?" Lex said.

"|I don't know," Grant said. "But there's more than one." He took the boat to
In front of the shore, he grabbed a branch to steady the boat. His voice was strained again. And the more they scream.

"Like a bunch of bugs," Tim said.


Malcolm shouted. Isn’t it time for the Middle East?
"Not yet," Ellie said.
Malcolm sighed. How much water do we have here?
"| I don't know. There's plenty of tap water-"
"No, | I mean, how much is it? One?"


Eli raised his hand. "nothing."

"Go to the rooms on this floor," Malcolm said, "and fill the tubs with you."

Ellie rubbed her eyes.

"And," said Malcolm, "are we going to have a fire? Lamps? Aluminum? Stern fuses?"
Are they his descendants?"

"I'm looking for everything. Do you think it's a tornado?"

"It's kind of like that," Malcolm said. The Malcolm Effect represents a dramatic shift.

“And Arnold said all the systems are working fine.”

"That's what it's all about," Malcolm said.

Ellie said, “You don’t think much of Arnold, do you?

"Okay. The store. Uh the same. Both you. Not
advice. What they have | Call it an 'idea'. They are looking for that now. I think
It’s small and they call it ‘focusing’. He’s not around. No
effect. That’s how you get a group like that. It comes from the right mindset. Because you
He cannot make an animal unrecognizable. To run away. But they
Don't look at it.

Don’t you think it’s just human nature? Ellie said.

"God no," Malcolm said. "That's why we say that coffee and saba in the morning are people
nature. It's not like that. It’s just a Western culture, for many parts of the world.
Just thinking about it." He rubbed his eyes sadly. "Morphine makes a philosopher."

Do you want water?

"No. I'll tell you the problem with engineers and scientists. There's a simpler way to
Bad talk about how they are trying to find out the truth about the country. Yes, but not
which separates them. No one approaches things as a 'search for truth'.

"Scientists are worried. So they're wondering if
They can do something. They never stop to ask if they need to do something. People are mean.
Note that these numbers are not significant. If they don't, someone else will. knowledge, the
Dale, not good. So they just try to do that first. That’s what it means in science. Even pure science
Teaching is a problem. They’re doing powerful work and changing
The world is beyond that. Particle accelerators heat the earth and release radioactive byproducts. Local
Throw dirt on the moon. There is still evidence that scientists were there to make their
Discoveries. Research is always a part of the world. always.

"Scientists want that. They have to put their resources into it. They have to go
Their symbol. They just can’t see it. They just cannot say thank you. They just can’t get into the space.
narrative. They need to do something nonsensical. That’s the scientist’s job, and now
Some of their group wanted to be scientists.

Ellie said, "Don't expect him to grow up-."

What will one of your families do after a year?

"It's good," he said.

Can’t you always imagine the world outside of your dreams?

"I don't."

"why not?"

He held out his hand. "No money | think. . . .

"Got the money to spend, but not to do it?"

"No, we work in the wrong country . . ."

"Only bad towns," Malcolm said, shaking his head. "Just a mess. Just the beginning of things. Just the beginning."
Consequences . . . I give you the scientists who agree with that. They just need accessories and no problems.
and muscles and bones. It’s their way of having fun. It’s based on science.
And it gets messy.

"Then what's the answer?"

"Remove the wise men from among you. Remove them from office."

"But then we lose everything we've done-"

"What are you doing?" Malcolm said angrily. How many hours do women spend on housework?
It hasn’t changed since the 1930s, despite all the advancements. vacuum cleaners, washers and dryers;
Trash compactors, trash removals, laundry and clothes. .. Why does it take so long to..
Cleaning up the city like it was in the 1930s?


Ella said nothing.

"Because there was no plan," Malcolm said. "Yes. Thirty thousand years
As cavemen at Lascaux, he worked twelve hours a week.
They provide food, shelter, and clothing. The rest of the time they could play or
Sleeping and doing whatever. And they lived in a world of clean air and clean water.
Beautiful trees and sunshine. Think about it. Twelve hours a week. Thirty thousand years ago.

Do you want to relax? Ellie said.

"No," Malcolm said. "| I want people to wake up. It's been four hundred years now
The science, and we should all hear by now, is both good and bad. It’s time to
change."

Haven’t we destroyed the world yet? she said.

He took a deep breath and closed his eyes. "Oh, my gosh," he said. "That's the last thing | I regret it."


In the darkness of the forest, Grant went from hand to hand, grasping the branches and sighing.
The raft is moving forward. She was still hearing voices. And finally seeing the dinosaurs.

Aren't they poisonous?

"Yeah," Grant said. "Dylophosaurus."

Two dilophosphates were at the mouth of the river. Spears longer than ten feet were sharpened.
And black. Below, the birds are as colorful as rabbits. The first pair of red tails flees.
The top of his head from his eyes to his nose forms a V on top of his head. bird-
As we can see from their behavior, they tease them to drink from the river and then go to the
snarl and hoot.

Lex said in the conversation, "Should we go for a walk?"

Grant shook his head no. Dilophosaurs were smaller than the triazoles, and smaller
to hide among the logs by the river. And they seemed to be playing the same
They screamed and yelled at each other.

"But we can't pass them on the boat," Leake said. "She's poison."

"We have to do it," Grant said. "precisely."

Dilophosaurs were always drinking and snoring. They seemed to be talking to each other.
It’s very ritualistic and elaborate. The animal on the left is smiling and drinking, closing its mouth
His mouth opened wide, and he screamed. The animal on the right has
boot in response and rushes to drink the first picture of the beast. after
The sequence is repeated.

Grant noticed that the creature on the right was smaller and had small holes in its tail and a
Christian blushed.

"I'm hurting," she said. "It's a sexual rite of passage." "can

Will we get through them? said Tim.

"Not like now. They were on the beach." Grant is often known for animals.
He performed these sexual rituals for hours at a time. They went without food and rested.
Nothing else. . . . He looked at his watch. 29 .

What are we doing? said Tim.

Grant sighed. "|I don't know."

He put it on board, and the Dilpozors shouted again;
bad. He looked up at the sky. Both animals are aware of the situation.

"What is that?" Lex said.

Grant laughed, "I think we're getting some help." He jumped into the tub. "I want you
Two children on the platform. We are going through a time of uncertainty. But remember: whatever
It happens, you didn’t say a thing, and you didn’t push- okay?

The ship began to sink the Dilophosores. It has spirit. Lexi believes
Grant’s eyes stared up at him with eyes on the water. Approaching the Delphosaurs.
They are still near the river. Then he took out his air pistol, and looked around.

The ship is moving and they smell something sweet, soft and angry at the same time.
schedule. It smells like sweet potatoes. Dilophosaurs’ jaws were very sharp. Five boats.
After a dramatic incident, Grant kept his composure. Dilophosores are only a few kilometers away,
They talk about the trees by the river.


According to Grant, it referred to Tyransaurus. Tyransaurus seeks revenge
As they plucked the leaves, the animals struggled with their feet in the mud. The ship is sailing
in front of them. The smell is infuriating. The Tyransaurus screamed, probably because it was a living being.
But for another time. . .

leather.

The group keeps it going. They were only a few meters from the cliff edge.
under the delphosores.

Lexi sighed, "Oh, okay."

There was a faint boat noise outside. So the ship was going
further. They were coming down to the river. Tyransaurus roared one last time and lunged; a
The dilophosaur watched in horror and hissed. Another dilophosphate roared in response.

The boat was floating on the river.


Tyrannosaurus


The jeep is driving in the sunlight. Muldoon walked, with Genaro by his side. they
They were in a field, taking pictures of the stray leaves and green palm trees.
The river was a hundred cubits long on the east side. When they arrived, Muldoon
car.

"Col, it's so hot," he said, rubbing his temple with the back of his hand. He drank the bottle.
A whiskey between his legs, and he handed it to Gennaro.

Genaro shook his head. He looked at the ground glistening in the morning fire. Then
He looked at the ship’s computer and the video uploaded to the screen. TV
It shows the layout of the park to remote cameras. Grant and the children have yet to be identified. or
Thirmansaurus.

The radio crackled. "Mildred."

Muldoon picked up the phone. "Yes."

"Do you have the key? | You have Rick. He's at 442 grits. He's at 443."

“It’s just a matter of time,” Muldoon said. points to the TV. "Yeah. I've got it now. Stay at the river."
The animal grazes on the branches along the wall in the west.

"You're right. Just take it off."

“Don’t worry,” Muldoon said, winking at the sun. "| It's not good."

"Remember," Arnold said, "Tyransaurus is our tourist attraction."

Muldoon turned off his radio with a loud crack. "Okay, Joel," he said. "They also talk
on tourists." Muldoon sighed. "Let's go see Rexy and give her some medicine."

The jeep rolls on the ground.

"They were looking forward to that," Gennaro said.

"I've been wanting to stick a needle in this great guy for a while," Muldoon said. "And there it is."

They came to a crossroads. In the furnace, Genaro immediately spotted the Tyrannosaurus.
They led the palm trees along the river.

Muldoon downed the bottle of whiskey and poured it into the corner. He held out his hand.
tube. Gennaro watches the video, which shows their Jeep and their Tyransaurus.
There should be a camera in the trees somewhere below.

"You want to help," said Mildred, "you might as well take these canteens off your feet."

Gennaro sighed and opened a stainless steel Halliburton box. Dressed at the bottom with
Movies. Four cylinders, each the size of a can of milk. All of them.
The designation is MORO-709. He took one out.

"You put your head down and laugh," Muldoon explained.

Gennaro saw a plastic pump with large holes, each the size of his thumb. fluent
Hit one of the canteens. On the other end of the drum is a slightly slower pace.

"It's a plum. It's about anger." Muldoon sat in front of him with a candle.
The legs. Made of black metal and shaped like a Janro, similar to a bassooka or shark
arrange.

What is Moro-709?


"Small animals are working on it all over the world. We'll see a thousand cc
to begin with. Muldoon opened the box to draw his hand.
He took the box back to the bottom and closed it.

“It should be,” Muldoon said. "Cows get about two hundred cc, but they
Weighing only two to three tons each, Tyrannosaurus rex was eight tons, and it was massive. This is important.
Dose.


"why?"

“Measurement is the difference between a physical characteristic and a physical characteristic.”
As an elephant, hippopotamus, or rhino, you ride the elephant, to be precise
statue. You put a hippopotamus to sleep, but it keeps moving. And Richard has
Just go crazy in the game. But on the other hand, you drive the car for more than five minutes.
car and died from an adrenaline rush. Each problem is complex and difficult and challenging.

Muldoon walked slowly down the river and approached the river. "But that's all
Freedom. It teaches a lot about animal welfare because animals are celebrated
It means animals - lions, leopards, bears, elephants. We don’t know much about the characters. and
No one knew anything about dinosaurs. Cannasauruses are a relatively new animal.

"Do you think about them in the future?" said January.

"No," Muldoon said, shrugging. "Dinosaurs didn't invade some of the islands there are." He turned and left.
Don't get stuck in a marriage. “In fact, what we’ve learned is that dinosaurs evolved as mammals today, as they do today.
Some religions are beautiful and elegant, while others are ugly and beautiful. Some of them are good looking and
Others are not. Some of them are foolish, and some are wise.

"Like the Raptors?" said January.

Muldoon shook his head. "Reptiles are smart, very smart. Trust me, they have all the problems
far,” he said, “it’s nothing compared to what we get when retirees leave
Reading. Ah. | I think this is as close as we can get with Rexy.

Ahead, Tyransaurus pokes its head through the trees, looking out over the river.
You’re trying to go. The animal walked a few feet to the ground to regain his balance.

"What do you see here?" said January.

"It's hard to know," Mildred said. “It could be adapted for Microceratopsians.
Walk in the heels. They will be happy to eat it.

Muldoon parks the Jeep about 50 meters away from Tyranchore and you drive off.
around. He sighed deeply and ran. "Sit down on the couch," Mildred said. "And give your opinion."
on." He took another can and strapped it to his shoulder. Then he left.

Genaro jumped on the back of the car. How many times have you done this?

shouted Muldoon. "No. I'm always trying to win. We'll see how it goes
He's coming." He walked ten yards to the jeep and pulled into a bush
knee. He put the large knife down and let out a sigh of relief.
Muldoon was intrigued by the Tyrannosaurus, which he had never paid attention to before.

A black gas exploded and Genaro saw a white trail in the air behind him.
Thirmansaurus. But it didn’t matter.

Tyransaurus slowly turned in his tracks to look at them. He shook his head from side to side.
On the one hand, it’s like looking at them with one eye.

Muldoon grabbed the developer and hit the second drum.

Did you hit him? said January.

Mildred shook her head. "He said. Laser lights... Make sure you have some batteries in the box."

"Than?" said January.

“It’s the battery,” Muldoon said. "Bigger than his shoulder. Gray markings."

Gennaro pulled away and looked at the metal box. He heard the Jeep screech, heard his heartbeat.
Frequently. Did not find the battery. roared Tyransaurus. For Gennaro, it was a shock.
The sound coming from the beast's throat echoed on the floor. fluent
He stood up and reached for the steering wheel, putting his hand on the gas shift. On the radio, the
He heard a voice say, "Muddie. It's Arnold. Get out of here. Go."

"|You know how I work," Myrtle said. that

Tyransaurus was shocked.


Mildred was shocked. Although the blade moves slowly and moves in
He picked up his shield and aimed and caught it. The next time, Genaro saw a puff of smoke, and it was white.
The stick goes back to the animal.

Nothing happened. The Tyrannosaurus is still hunting.

Presently Meade was on his feet and running, shouting, "Go! Go!" Genaro drove the Jeep.
And Muldoon jumped out the front door as the Jeep pulled in front of him. Tyransaurus
He quickly closed it, and Muldoon opened the door and stepped inside.

"Go, push! Go!"

Gennaro sighed. The jeep pulled to the left, and for a while they just saw
He goes up in the air, then falls back to the ground and runs forward
further. Genaro walked around the wall to the left until he saw a mirror.
The tyrannosaurus gives one last roar and falls asleep.

Gennaro started the car. "Jesus."

Mildred shakes her head. "I can tell you | I'll kill you again."

"I mean, you thought about it," Jannard said.

"The needle must be broken before an injection is given."

"You say, you didn't stop."

"Yes," Mildred said. He was happy. "|Jenny. The battery died on the laser light. The
confused. | He should have seen her when she went out last night. Let's go back and get some more
Canisters.”

The jeep goes west to the hotel. Muldoon grabbed the radio. "ride."

"Yeah," Arnold said.

"We're going back to basics."


The river is calm now and running fast. The boat goes faster and faster. I was
It starts as a nice walk in the park.

"Wee!" Lex shouted, pulling him away. "Quickly, quickly!"

She looked Grant in the eye. The river is small and dark, but you can see far
Finally he came to the top of the tree, and there was sunlight and a distant sound. fluent
It looked like it was going to end either way. . . .

The boat goes faster and faster. extend

He picked up the bag.

"What is that?"

"You've screwed up," Grant said.

The ship emerged from the darkness in the early morning sunlight and ran.
He walks down a path down the river. They had ringing in their ears. extend
He grabbed hold of the ship with all his might, but he couldn't turn it back. fluent
He continued to the door.

Lex pulled away from him. I'm not doing well! Grant noticed his cheerleader was missing
But there was nothing he could do; They reached the door with a steady stream of breath, and
The sound of water fills the earth. Grant pushed his boat into the water
Red and yellow, your mouth; The rubber bucket floats in the water, but doesn’t sink.
Grant pulled over the edge, looked to the side, and saw a gap about 50 feet away.
The source of the water.

And he was standing in the pool panting and waiting for a tyrannosaurus.

Lex screams in fear and the boat moves and the bottom falls and he runs
They stepped out into the air and the moving water and fell sick. Grant threw his hands in the air and
The rest of the world is dumb and understands little.


He hangs around for a while, and he has time to see Lex in his orange shoes.
fall down before him; He had time to see Tim, and to see the world; He had time
Look at the clear running water; I had time to look at the pool below.
He bowed slightly, there was a small silence beside him.

Then, with a cry, Grant plunged into the cold, steaming water.
He landed and was shocked to see Tyranxhor's foot moving in front of him.
He lands in the water and comes out of the river later. Grant swam into the water and was pulled from the fire.


Rocks, he said, grabbed a tree branch and leaned against the body. It’s windy.
He leaned over his shoulder and onto the rocks, looking out over the river just in time to see the snow.
The kitchen is running. Then he saw Tim, fighting the water, and reached out to take
She blushes and blushes, and goes to the next bathroom.

Grant jumped out of the water and pulled the Tyransaurus's head off.
The water is under his feet. The large head extends and fills both sides with water. Heart
Something between her thighs.

And the heavens lifted up again. Lex’s Life is Lex’s Orange.
taste.


A moment later, Lex surfaced next to the dinosaur's tail. He was lying on the ground.
Water, the body of the small intestine. Grant fell into the water on his back.
He was once a water carrier. Some time later he settled on the rocks
A heavyweight is not life. His eyes bulged. He popped it in his mouth.

Grant shook his head, leaning towards the door, but he didn't mind. Then he shrugged.
Clear water and a serpent's head. He rubbed his eyes. "Thanks," he said. He smiled a little. "We did
fluent."

Tim started crying. He threw it again. Will you leave? What are you crying about?

"Because."

"We miss you," Grant said. Small whites are coming down the river.
Tyransaurus gives you some flowers. Still, he turned away from them and looked at the river. but
At any moment the animals turned and looked. . . . Come on, children, he said.

"Where are we going?" Lexi said she would help.

"come on." He was looking for a place to hide. He sees only the grassy meadows along the river.
It does not provide protection. Up the river are dinosaurs. Grant then noticed a dirt road along the river. fluent
It was like going underwater.

And a dirty clean man's shoe. And leave the way.

The Tyrannosaurus was shocked, growling and looking around the wall. fluent
They seemed to feel abandoned.

They were looking for them on the ground. Grant and the children hide in the large trees that surround them
In the pools. And he sent them away into the land of the South. "Where are we going?" Lex said. "Go
back."

"|I know."

Now they were nearing the shore, and it was very loud. The rocks became stars.
Dirt road. There was always fog. It was like walking on a cloud. way
It looked like it was going underwater, but when they got closer, they saw that
And he went down into the water.

The Tyrannosaurus could still see the water, even with its tail pointed at them. He walks away.
path to the falls, and was almost at the top of the waterfall when Grant
The laugh of Tyransaurus. So he was underwater, and Grant couldn’t see
from the silver lining.

Grant looked around in shock. There was a shed here, no bigger than the garage, and
It’s full of different components: small pumps, large filters, tubes. Everything is slow and steady.

"Are we?" Lex said. He had to scream when he heard the sound of falling water. "Where are you
Us? What is this place? Us?

"It's just a matter of time," Grant said. He looks after the equipment. Obviously, this is a park machine.
And there was probably electricity to run, so there probably was also a telephone to talk.
It goes through your filters and tubes.

"What are you doing?" Lexi shouted.

"I'm looking for a phone." By now it was nearly 10:00 and an hour had just passed.
It took an hour for the boat to land.

Found a steel door marked MAINT 04 and labeled.
next to it is a security card. Next to the door, he saw a row of metal boxes. fluent
Drawers were opened, only switches and clocks were inside. There was no phone.
And nothing more than an open door.


He almost knocked the box into the corner of the door. When he opened it, he found a nine-key keyboard;
It is covered with dots of green molecules. But that seems like a way to close the door, and that
Suppose the phone was on the other end. The blades are made of cast iron.
Number 1023. He jumped at her.

With a creak, the door opened. The darkness moves on with sharp edges.
At the bottom we see the CHARGER MAIN VEHICLE 04/22 with the yellow marker
Go upstairs. Could this mean the car was still there? "Good morning, kid."

"You're right," Lex said. "I'm not going in here."

"Come on, Lex," Tim said.

"You're right," Lex said. "There was no fire or anything. I didn't go."

“It’s nothing,” Grant said. There was no time to talk. "Stay here, I'll be right back."

"Where are you going?" Lex said shocked.

Grant came through the door. He makes an electronic noise and closes the door.
in the afternoon.

Grant was in complete darkness. After a short sickness, he went to the door and
His body felt warm. No code, no line. He squatted on either side of the wall.
The door, the switch, the control box, everything.

There was nothing.

As he fought back the pain, his hands were wrapped around a black metal cylinder. He held out his hand.
On one side of the fan, a crack. . . Dark blinked, and the beam was there.
It’s amazingly bright. He looked at the door again, but saw that it wasn't open. It should be
Allow the children to open it. Therefore . . .

He started with the leaves. They get their hands dirty and cover them with dirt,” Janet explained.
As he stepped onto the wall, he heard a loud crash followed by the sound of nails digging into concrete. fluent
He drew his gun and went forward.

Footsteps brought him closer to the wall, and when the lights dimmed, a strange light shone from behind him.
And then, after a moment, he saw it: a car! An electric car that looks about the size of a golf cart and looks great
It’s a long ridge that goes on for miles. A bright yellow light flashed on the driver’s wheel.
The car, however, is probably more expensive.

Grant heard the noise again, and turned around, seeing something black coming from behind him.
It’s flying, the rules are bad, and Grant doesn’t know where he’s going. Banga fell on it.
He dropped it to the ground and gasped in fear, then BANG.
She didn't wake up, and he was relieved to see her.

It was a Velociraptor, but it was small and less than a year old. It's probably two feet long and maybe two feet wide.
A long, horizontal dog, breathing heavily, with a downward slope.
jaw. Probably too much local anesthetic and Grant pulled the trigger.
brief. The Velliciraptor watched with glowing eyes for a moment.

Grant remembered learning about this creature very differently.
It was a shock and a threat to the adults in the village. The man shook his head.
velociraptor, I think he’ll agree. He looked down at his body, which twitched a little like a
The sedative was administered. And he saw that it was a man.

Young, young, and male. There was no question he was there. The Velociraptor lu
he was in the woods.

Excited, she hurried up the stairs to the door. With his light, he gave
It’s the back of the door that’s nice and plain, and the side panels. They go hand in hand.
At the door, she slowly realized that the door was locked and she couldn't open it without
Children are smart enough to open for him. He could hear them from the other side.
believe.


"Dr. Grant!" Lex shouted and slammed the door. "Dr. Grant!"

"You're right," Tim said. "He'll be back."

"But where did he go?"

"Listen, Dr. Grant knows what I'm doing," Tim said. "He'll be back in a minute."

"He should come back now," Lex said. He pressed his lips to hers and sighed.
wide. He stomped his foot angrily.

and, with a loud cry, the head of the sea  came out of the water to meet them.


Tim looked at him in horror and his mouth hung open. Lexi shouted and jumped up.
ground. The head rocks back and forth and then back down again. But Tim sees the shadows.
The animal's head rests on the grass.

He pushed Lex inside him and when he pushed his hips again, he screamed, loud.
It goes in and out of our mouth quickly. The water flows all the way from the top. Then he went
further.

Lex walked over to Tim and hugged him. "|I love it," she said. He was shocked, and so were the others.
It was only a few meters away, and it was full of machines. There was nowhere to hide.

His head came back into the water, but slowly this time, his tail relaxed.
ground. Tyransaurus snapped its tail as it took a deep breath. But there are fruits
Water in the bowl.

Tim thought: He can't see us. He knows we're here, but he can't see underwater.

Tyransaurus snarled.

What am I doing? Lex said again.

"Shhhh."

With a small moan, her lips opened and her mouth fell open. Beautiful and blue.
Black, with a small chip at the bottom. About four feet tall.
The high walls of the house. The slurry is then poured onto the filter cylinders. Tim and
Lex smokes the pipes.

The mouth moves to the left, and to the right, pulling the organ.
He leaned his head against the knobs and taps and turned them on. Tim saw that he had bruises on his lips.
ivory-like mobility,
He was taken to Lex's feet.

"Eeww," Leak said.

His mouth hung open. He turned and stood up like a snake, his body on one side.

"Don't laugh," Tim growled.

. .. face to face, then back to Tim and then squeezing his neck. Tim
He closed his eyes as a part of his face touched him. It was hot and humid and I felt like
setting.

He leaned forward, his mouth brushing hers.

"Timmy…."

Tim couldn't answer; His mouth was covered with black lipstick. He could see through it, but
I can't speak. Lex took her hand.

"Come on, Timmy!"

His mouth is pulled back. He felt a burning sensation in his legs.
Lex pushes him, but he can't resist the force of the muscles holding him back. Tim left her.
He pushed his chin with both hands back on his head. He couldn't pull it off.
He slammed his fist into the ground, but it rolled forward.

Lex had wrapped his arms around her waist and was walking backwards, shouting at her, but she
He can't do anything. He started to see some. There has been a kind of peace .
He felt an almost unimaginable peace as he left.

“Timmy?”

And his lips tightened, to let go. Tim felt himself slipping out of his eyes. The body.
He ended up with white ears and his jaw dropped to the ground. setting;
He coughed, to open his mouth. Blood blackened and mixed with dirt. that
Nose is breathing heavily.

What am I doing? Lexi shouted.

And slowly, slowly, the head began to lift the edge of the tunnel to go.
Too deep in the dirt. And then it’s over and all they see is money
Pink rainbow.


ride
"Fine," Arnold said in court. "Rex is downstairs." He leaned back in his chair and


He smiled, put down his cigarette, and took a deep breath. This is what happened: End of story
park back into position. Now they just have to go out and get it.


“Country boy,” Muldoon said, looking at his TV. "| I have made him the last of all." He rolled his eyes.
January. "It took him an hour to dry."

Henry Wu looked at the screen. "But you can drown there…."

"He's not going to swim," Mauldin said. "I've never seen an animal so hard to kill."

"|I think we should go out and do it," Arnold said, "We

It will,” Muldoon said. It’s not too loud.

"He's a very special dog."

"|I know he's a very special animal," Myrtle said.

Arnold was angry with Gennard. He couldn't wait a moment. "I'll show you," he said.
He said, "The park is going back to normal now. Whatever Malcolm
It would happen. We are still under control.”

Genaro looked at the side of Arnold's head, "What's that?"

Arnold was shocked. Here is the profile page, in the upper right corner of the page. End
empty. Arnold was surprised to see that it was now flashing red: AUX PWR LOW. Forum
For a moment, he didn't understand. Why is it necessary to reduce the power of the assistant? They walked along the highway.
Power, not power of assistance, was thought to be sufficient for a position of the helper.
Power, you can check the fuel level or charge the battery. .. .

“Henry,” Arnold said to Wu. "Look at this."

Wu said, “Why are you running out of a store? "I

No, Arnold said. "Like you."

"|It can't be."

"Take the license plate," Wu said. The trend has been to maintain that trend over the past few seasons.
hour.

Arnold pushed a button, and they heard the click of a printer on the floor. Wu walked up to him.

Arnold looked at the TV. The box has now changed to yellow and red, and the message
Now please read: AUX PWR FAIL, the number started by ringing.

"What's going on?" said Arnold.


Deliberately, Tim walked a few steps down the dirt road in the sunlight. He looked
He looked around the river and saw the cross behind him, floating by the river.

"|I thought he was dead," Lex said.

Tim saw that it wasn't: the dinosaur's tail was still moving, and one of its arms was waving.
spasm. But there’s something about it. So Tim is the white circle at the bottom.
in the head, to remove the ear.

"He was killed by the sword," Tim said.

"Yes," Leake said. "He ate."

Tim watches, sighing. He was angry because he never expected to see such a big monster.
That’s what it means. He didn't want to die. "It's not his fault," she said.

"Oh right," Leak said. "He has eaten us, and it is not his fault.

"He's a carnivore. He's doing what he's always done."

"You wouldn't say that," Lex said, "if you were in his heart right now."

Then the sound of the water changed. With a loud voice, it became soft and quiet. that
and the waters prevailed in the heavens, and became a river . .

And he stopped.

"Tim. The water's gone," Leak said.

It would be dry as a sheet before it was completely killed. Waterfront Pool
There was water. They were standing near the top in a tunnel full of machinery.
Seen below.

"The water shouldn't be too cold," Lex said.

Tim shook his head. "There must be power...someone has lost the power." around them,
All the pumps and filters are turned off one after the other, the lights are turned off and
The machine shuts down.

And then came a solo, and the door to MAINT 04 was knocked
It opened slowly.


Grant got out, touched his face in the light, and said, "Good job, boys. Lock the door."
"We didn't do anything," Leake said. "Envelope

It’s gone,” Tim said.

"Not good," Grant said. "Come see what I'm wearing."


Arnold looked at him suspiciously.

After a while, the screens went black, then the lights dimmed and
in the courtroom in darkness and gloom. Everyone started crying at the same time. Mauldin you .
The blind give way to the light, and Woo came to write.

"Look at him," Wu said.


Definition of Time Zone [Code]
05:12:44 Security | Open Project [AV12]
05:12:45 Security 2 Locked [AV12]
05:12:46 Security 3 Task Break [AV12]
05:12:51 The Anti-Violence Order [-AVO].
05:13:48 Overview [-AVO}
05:13:55 Security 1 in range [-AVO}
05:13:57 Security 2 on alert [-AVO]
05:13:59 Security 3 on the [-AVO}
05:14:08 Background Overview - Aux Power [-AV1]
05:14:18 Monitor-Masterwork - Auxiliary Power [-AV04]
05:14:19 Security - Super Active - Wake Power [-AV05]
05:14:22 command-worker - Walk Power [-AV06]

05:14:24 Lab - Super Active - Wake Power [-AV08]
05:14:29 Telecom-Webb Opera - Auxiliary Power [-AV09]

05:14:32 Master Plan - Strong Energy [-AV09]

05:14:37 Do the Job - Wake Power [-AV09]
05:14:44 Control Mode Driver Mode - Power Controlled [-AV09]
05:14:57 WARNING: Valley Mode [NB] Worker - Maximum Power [-AV09]
09:11:37 WARNING: Overfuel (20%) Operation - Overfuel [-AVZZ]
09:33:19 WARNING: Fuel Vacuum (10%) Operation - Vacuum Power [-AVZ1]
09:53:19 Warning: Very high (1%) performance - Very low [-AVZ2]

09:53:39 Warning: Fuel Oil (0%) Off [-AVO]


Wu said, “You closed it at fifteen in the morning, the day it started when you decided
It started with the power of the volunteers.

"Jesus," Arnold said. The force at the front had not been turned on since the war. When he gave
It was reinforced, only Japanese help would come. Arnold thought it was great when
He was grateful and knew that this was a good thing. This is what was supposed to happen. is
First: The electronic auxiliary switch is supplied first;
Because you need a high voltage charger to run the main circuit. Thus
It was done.

But Arnold didn't take the time to turn off the power supply. and when we look at and .
The screens in the control room were bright and you never noticed that the power source was off.
It has been restored.

But it didn’t work, and every time since then, while I’ve been looking for Rex and staying
One thing and another, the park was in a state of shock. And it wasn’t good
advice. Of course, the momentum began to take off.

What does this address mean? Muldoon said, looking down at the paper.


05:14:57 WARNING: Valley Mode [NB] Worker - Maximum Power [-AV09]


“That means the alert system’s status was sent to the controllers in the control room,” Arnold said.
"About the birds."

"Have you seen the detective?"

Arnold shook his head, "No."
Take a look at it.

What do you mean, alert: collision status'?

"Well, | I didn't know it at the time, but we were going really well," Arnold said. "and
This means it doesn’t produce enough power to power the fans, so
He gets lost on his own.

Mildred rubbed her eyes. "Did they close the walls?"


"Yes. "

"What about the Velociraptor walls?"

Arnold sighed. "Yes."

“Christ Jesus,” Muldoon said. "Five hours. These animals can fly."

Then, in the distance, they heard a loud noise. Mildred began to talk a lot.
fast. He goes around the house handing out portable radios.

"Mr. Arnold goes to the operating room to turn on the power supply. Under the supervision of Dr. Wu To
burn. Only you can use the computers. Goodbye, Mr. Hammond.
Logic. Don't get ahead of me. Go now. Lock the doors and stay near them until you hear a
I. I helped Arnold to deal with his problems. " He scolded Janard. "You could be in trouble
further?"

"Not really," Genaro said. Very full.

"Okay. Then, you and the others can go home." Mildred was shocked. "That's all. Now
move. "

“And what do you do with my cows?” shouted Hammond.

“It’s not a simple question, Mr. Hammond,” Muldoon said. "The question is, what does
Will it be you?

He walked through the door and down the hall to his office. Genaro fell to his knees.
nearby. "Does he change his mind?" shouted Muldoon.

"You need help," Gennard said.

"I'm fine." Muldoon went into the room next to Animal Control and took out his bag.
shoulder launcher, and opens a panel on the right side of his desk. It had six cylinders.
and the sixth canteen.

“The thing about these wines,” Muldon says, “is that they’re really awful
thoughts. They do not die immediately even after they leave the brain. And they stand firm; Very useful.
Make a noise in his dicey heart, and it’s hard to pull him off his legs and arms. smooth
they're bleeding, they'll soon die." The cylinders behind him opened and he fell into the
Cantor. He threw a punch at Genord. "Shut it."

Gennaro took the key, and Muldoon handed over the keys. "All we can hope for
That is to throw them away. Unfortunately, we only got six birds here. This includes eight reports
The city of flowers. Let's go. Stay by your side. Your wife is right.”

Muldoon got out and walked across the field, looking across the field across the road.
which leads to the opposite. Gennaro sniffed beside him. And the bridge.
Up and down the glass door, and Muddy stood.

Arnold stayed behind in the school. Three men approached him.
Arnold picked up a stick, waved it at them and yelled. Reps show up
They approached together, one staying in the middle and the other two moving on either side. Developed.
smooth. Gennaro was shocked.

Body shape.

Muldoon had already seen it, with the developer hovering over his shoulder. "Dawn," he said.
Genaro shoots the giant behind the spear. There is a short circuit. nothing
done. "Col, you'll get it later," Mildred said, adjusting the stick to hold the box.


Gennaro’s hands. Genaro is brought back. The retorts screamed at Arnold as the animal was shot
In the hand.
Tomatoes were scattered on the walls. The rest of his body falls to the ground, his knees
He screamed in the air, tail wagging.

“You’re giving it to them,” Muldoon said.

Arnold walked through the office door. The Velostrators returned and began to
Mauldin and Genaro. They turned as they approached. A remote location, near a
In the living room, she heard a loud noise.

"This can be a problem," Genaro said. "Donnie," Mildred said.


Henry Wu heard footsteps and looked at the palace door. He pulled away.
next to the consoles, and paused. He wanted to leave, but he knew he had to stay in the house.
If Arnold can regain his strength - if only for a minute - then Wu can recover.
Generator.

He should have stayed in the house.

He heard someone scream. So says Mildred.


Muldoon felt a sharp pain in his chest and fell to the ground.
run. Looking behind him, he saw Genaro walking the other way through the forest. reps
They are not in the Genera, but represent Muldon. Now they had reached over 20 feet.
Muldoon yelled at the top of his lungs as he ran, wondering what would happen next.
go. Knowing they had ten seconds to find him.

Ten seconds. bridge

quite.


Ellie has to help Malcolm up while Harding grabs the needle and takes the morphine. Malcolm
He sighed and fell backwards. It gets harder and harder every minute. On the radio, the
He heard some screams.

Hammond entered the room and said, "How are you?"

"Not good," Harold said. "It's a little weird."

"It's nothing like that," Malcolm said. "|I'm so clean." They turned on the radio. "fluent
I feel like a warrior.

"The answers aren't finished," Hammond said.

"They did," Malcolm said with a small sigh. How can that be done?

"It's such a coincidence. Arnold didn't know there was a support force and the walls."
Close it.

"Did they?"

"Go to the fire, you naughty boy-."

"If | you remember," Malcolm said, "I said a flat wall doesn't look good."

Hammond took a deep breath and sat still. "Damn it all," he shook his head. "Should
We have avoided the idea that what we see here is the worst of all problems.
Simple advice. My friends and | It was suggested many years ago that it was possible to clone
DNA from extinct animals and their offspring. It was a good idea for us.
Time travel-the only time travel in space. Bring them alive. and to be
That was great, and since we could, we decided to go for it. We have learned this lesson and
We walked. Everything is so simple."

"cotton?" Malcolm said. He somehow found the strength to sit up in bed. "Easy? You
He’s a bigger guy than you think. and | He thought you were an idiot.

"Dr. Malcolm," Ellie said, and tried to smile. But Malcolm didn’t care.
He looked at the radio, the bells and whistles.

“What does that mean, happening here?” she said. "It's simple. It's simple. I'm doing it again
Lifestyles, for those who don’t know. Dr Wu didn’t know.
For the things I do, don’t worry about things like the name of the product;
One like that. They can do so much in so little time, you don’t know a thing
They, however, expect to know you because you created them, so they
them; Forget that they are alive, conscious and capable


Don’t do the interview, forget what little information you have about them, it shouldn’t
Do the things you say are easy.... Lord God. . ."

He thought he was paying.

"Do you know how powerful knowledge is?" Malcolm said. “It’s part of a rich history.
And you know, rich people. They don't fall."

What is he talking about? Hammond said.

Harding made a face, to say he was angry. Malcolm looked up.

"| It tells you | what I'm talking about," he said. “Some types of cases require a lot
Anyone who wants power will give it up. There is a value of education, which for many people
birthday. The power you need. Company officer. The black man in the cartoon. spiritual
Teacher. You have to put in the time, hard work, and dedication to anything you set your mind to. You should do it.
It’s a lot to take in. It should be important to you. And if you have, you are.
pressure. It cannot be given: it is yours. This is the result of your leadership.

"Now, the beautiful thing about this is that when someone
He can be killed with his bare hands, and he is also ripe for using it foolishly.
Thus this form of government was introduced. Strength training changes you in this way.
that you will not do him any harm.

"But the power of knowledge is like a lost treasure: you get it without learning it. You read what other people say
Do it, and you can do the next thing. You can do it while you are young. You can do a lot
fast. No government lasts for many years. There is no rule: the old schools are boring.
There is no problem with the location, there is only the initial investment.
philosophy. Cheating, lying, lying - it's not good. You, or your friends. I don't understand
You’re getting hurt. No one has a person. They’re all trying to do the same thing: make something happen.
Yes, and do it quickly.

"And by going after the superstars, you can do something
brief. You don't know what you are doing, but you don't know what you are doing.
You took the patty and sold it. And human resource management is not much more than that. Student Description
It buys power like anything else. The customer doesn’t notice anything.
Maybe you should.

Do you know what he’s talking about? Hammond said. Arrive

He shook his head.

"|I don't know," Hammond said.

"I'll do it," Malcolm said. "A karate master doesn't kill with his bare hands."
He didn't kill him in anger. The person who is killed is not
Lead, not control, and that bought power on a Saturday night.
And it is this negative force that propels and suppresses science. And that's why you think
It's not hard to build a place like this."

“It’s easy,” Hammond said.

"Then why does it get so bad?"


Surprised by the situation, John Arnold opened the door to the maintenance room and entered.
The darkness inside. Jesus, they’re black. He should have known the light would go out. he thought.
The storm, the space tunnels, going two floors below, one must
Take the stick. He had to strengthen her or she would break up.

hiking.

He panicked like a blind man until he realized it was useless. Somehow, he had to find his light
Downstairs, return to the door and paint the four columns. It lets in a lot of light. but
There was no way he could close the door. He quickly took off his shoes and pushed open the door.

He walked over to the platform and saw it easily. He jumped on the metal cylinder and heard it.
The opposite direction, one louder, one quieter, but he could still see the light. The face
A ladder can be used for generators. Ten more places.

dark.

The light was gone.

Arold looked at the door and saw that the light had obscured the Velociraptor's body.
The dog laughed and kicked his shoes carefully.


Henry Wu walked. He pointed to their computer consoles. He touched the screens. fluent
He was still moving. He felt the tension.

This is a tribute to his achievements. It must be worth it. The first line will be displayed, and
Taken-

"Whoa!" The radio crackled.

He took it. "Yeah. I'm here."

"Does the blood have some power?" A Muldoon. There was something wrong with his voice.
Something below.

"No," Wu said. He smiled, glad to hear that Meade was alive.

"| Remember, Arnold came to the bathroom," Mildred said- "After that, I don't remember."

"where are you?" Wu said.

"I'm full."

"than?"

"It gets into the bloodstream," Mildred said. "And I'm happy now."


Muldoon thought it was like riding a tube. There were a lot of holes in the water.
He walked past the visitor’s goal, then took the left and hit the
The poor. The subway pipes were too heavy for him, but he couldn’t go underneath them.

At least, when he stuck his foot in one when the bad ankle was near the pipe.
Turtle shouted, and the others now respected him. His only regret is that
He didn't even bother to look at the nozzle at the end of the tube before he pressed the button.

But he probably still got his chance because three or four people were outside yelling and
She screams nearby.

“Yeah, it’s very fast,” he radioed.

Wu said, "Does Arnold have a radio?"

“You can’t think about it,” Muldoon said. "Just come in. Look."

He didn’t know what the other end of the tube looked like - it was so dark - and
I don’t see it now. It was written. He could only hope that the last thing had been removed. Jesus,
She didn't like having her pussy taken by one of those bastards.


Arnold followed him downstairs. The Velostrator is only ten meters long, and narrow.
His eyes wandered in the darkness. Arnold could feel his fingers stiffen against the metal.

But it’s slow. I know a dog can look good, but Polish Grill
The familiar mechanical smells made him pause. This attention was only temporary for Arnold.
thought. He could have gone over the wall, all the way to the bottom. . .

Because he was convinced that velvet couldn't go up the stairs. Not small, difficult.
ladder.

Arnold looked over his shoulder. The stairs are only a few feet away. Another page. . .

There it was! When he arrived, he remembered the ramp and started to climb almost to the bottom.
The leaves. The posts are supported on the small piece of concrete. 20 feet above him, Report screams in pain.
Patty.

"Nonsense, my friend," Arnold said. He was shocked. He was very close to the current assistant.
Generator. Just a few drops, even in this light. . . .

There is a bruise on his back. Arnold

His wife changed.

The retort stood in the street, crying. fluent

They fly on the ground.

He immediately looked for a weapon, but was accidentally shot in the chest.
concrete. Something heavy pressed against his chest and he couldn't breathe.
When he realized the creature was standing over him, he grabbed the legs as they drove into the flesh
His mouth, smelling of foul air coming from his head, opened.
The door creaked open.


Ellie held the radio in her hand and listened. Two other Tikan employees arrived at the hotel.
It was like they knew he was safe here. But no one else stepped up at the last minute. and
Small size at the bottom. On the radio, Muldoon said, "How long has it been?"


"Four five minutes," Wu said.

"Arnold should do it now," Mildred said. "Okay. Do you have any ideas?"
"No," Wu said.

Have we heard of Gennaro?

Genaro pressed the button. "I'm here."

"Where are you?" said Mildred.

"I went to the emergency room," Gennard said. "Give me a moment."


Gennaro leaned his head against the wall and listened.

In front of him, he saw a hallway leading to the living room. Gennaro knows
There was some furniture somewhere to the east. He heard the birds chirping in the trees. An
There was a chill in the air. A solution screams, but it’s a long way off. He lowered his voice.
The body. Genaro started, got out of the way and fell into the dirt.

Do you want to live in misery? I don't

really.

The truth is, he didn’t. But Gennaro thought he had a plan and an opportunity could
labour. If you live in a house on the west side of the city, you can save on maintenance.
And so it began. All the good fish near the other houses were on the west side. there
There was no house in their forest.

At least, he hoped not.

He pulled out all the stops and knew he was making a lot of noise. He is a criminal.
He slowed down and felt his heartbeat. Here the branches are smaller; He didn't
Six or seven feet up. She began to worry that she would never be adopted again.
every floor of the house. But then he saw a building to his right at the top of the platforms.

He approached her and leaned close to her. He found the door, opened it, and went inside. fluent
It was very dark. He tripped over something.

Human shoes.

Genaro frowned. He opened the door and led her downstairs. fluent
He saw a man walking ahead of him. He realized he didn’t know where to go. therefore
He had left his radio on.

damn!

The radio can be placed anywhere in the nursery. Or just watching
Generator. He knew what genius meant. Maybe somewhere under
below. He saw a ladder collapse.

It was dark downstairs and it was hard to see anything. He felt the pressure between the pipes.
He grips his bars to keep from hitting his head.

He heard the sound of a dog and froze. He listened, but no voice came again. It changed.
Proceed with caution. Something slid over his shoulder and over his left arm. It burned like water.
He touched it in the darkness.

Stickers. He sniffed. blood.

He looked up at the sky. The raptor was sitting on the branches, just a few inches above his head. There was blood.
It comes off the back. He asked if he had been assaulted. and then
He started to run, but the weight hit him on the shoulder and he fell to the ground.

Gennaro had the strength, stood up, hit the ball and walked away.
concrete. When he woke up, he saw that the dog was lying next to him, panting.

Yes, it hurt. His legs hurt for some reason.

Kill

Gennaro crouched down, looking for a weapon. The reporter is always happy.
concrete. He searched for something to use as a weapon. When he changed
Next, there’s the raptor.

He shouted, raising his voice in the darkness.

Genaro turned in a circle and felt their hands tugging at him. And then he heard something strange
Pain in the left arm.

finish.

He would destroy it.


The man shot his head and Donald Gennaro stumbled and fell.


Malcolm lies in bed, panting, listening to the radio broadcast. "anything?" said Mildred.
"Do you have anything?"

"There are no words," Wu said. "Hell,"

"There was," Mildred said.

withdraw.

Malcolm sighed. "I can't wait," he said, "to hear your new idea ."

"Our | wish," Muldoon said, "is for everyone to get home and get back to normal. But | not
Look at the road.”

"There's a jeep outside the church," Wu said. "If | runs away from you, you can catch
In your body?"

"Fine. But you're leaving the court."

"I can't do anything here."

"God knows it's true," Malcolm said. "A private home without electricity is not a problem
The Government House.

"Okay," Mildred said. "Let's see. This isn't good."

As she rolled over in bed, Malcolm said, "No, it's okay. Sounds like an accident."

Wu said, "The team comes close to us."

"We're still good," Malik said. "Let's go."

The radio crackled. Malcolm closed his eyes and breathed softly as he regained his strength.

"Just imagine," Ellis said. "Just keep it simple."

“You sure know what we’re talking about here,” Malik said. “To see all this….”
We’re talking about five hundred years of western thought. Then they start.
At the time Florence, Italy was the richest country in the world. Scientific theory - you
There is a whole new way of seeing reality, if it’s okay if you don’t care about your
Or your city, he thought—an idea that was new and exciting at the time. FLUENT .
hope and hope for the future;
10 years. Politics, Religion, and Prejudice in History
It came down to science. But, in reality, that’s because the medieval universe doesn’t work.
It failed economically, it failed religiously, and it failed in the new world that was
they are doing it.

Malcolm was shocked.

"But now," he continued, "science is something of a belief that's hundreds of years old. And yet."
Before the Middle Ages, science began to come into contact with the natural world. Science has
He became so strong that it became clear that he could not do it. Maybe through science.
Millions of us live on a small, crowded, interconnected planet. But science is bad
Help us to decide what to do on earth or how to live. Science can build a nuclear reactor, but
He will not tell us to stop. Science can make medicine, but it cannot tell us to use it. and
Our planet is beginning to be polluted in important ways—air, water, and soil—because
He knows he shouldn't." She sighed. "This is right for everyone."

There was silence. Malcolm closed his eyes, his heart pounding. No one spoke.
It was as if Malcolm had fallen asleep. Then he stood up again, at the edge of the tree.

"At the same time, there is a huge need for education. From
The discovery of Newton and Dickett proved the theory of generalization. Science has
In the beginning he seeks the power to control everything through his study of the laws of nature. but
In the 20th century, this issue had become an unsolved problem. First, Heisenberg
His theory of uncertainty underpins what we can learn about the subatomic world. Oh, well, we are
state. None of us live on a planet without an atmosphere. It doesn’t matter how we
in our lives. Then, the G"del key extracted the value of the number in a valid word.
science. Mathematicians thought that there was an important truth in their words.
derived from the laws of logic. We now know that what we call 'consciousness' is just a thought
play. It’s not as big a deal as you think.

"And now chaos theory says that chaos works in our everyday lives. It implies that the universe
Like the rain we cannot say. So the smartest scientist for centuries -
The dream of total government is dead, in our century. And with it comes a lot of responsibility, he thinks.


Let science do what it does. And let's listen. Science always says it’s not
You know everything now, but you will understand later. But now we know that this is not true. That’s thank you.
Like a genius, and like a child who jumps off a building because he believes he can
fly."

"This is ridiculous," Hammond shook his head.

"We are witnessing the end of the education era. Education, like other old traditions, is
He humbles himself. While the force is increasing, it shows that the force cannot be maintained. because
Things are looking up now. Fifty years ago, everyone was on the atomic bomb. that
a power. No one can predict that. However, only a decade after the bombing, we started
To get the power of arithmetic. Thermal energy is more powerful than nuclear energy. and in 2019.
Everyone’s hands. It will be in the farmers box. demonstration to students. cheap
laboratories of terrorists and dictators, and this leads everyone to ask the same question - what
good | Am I doing what I want? Science says it cannot answer that question.”

"So what's going on?" Ellie said.

Malcolm looked up. "Change."

"What song?"

“All the big changes are like death,” he said. "You can't see the other side until you get there."
And he covered his face.

"Not good," Hammond shook his head.

Malcolm sighed. "Do you have any ideas?" He said how you don’t care if you or any of us
Can you get to this island alive?


Sixth iteration.


"Restoring the way it works is not enough."


Hi Malcolm
return


Its electric motor roared and the car lurched forward into the darkness. Grant goes
Feet on the ground. The tunnel is powered only by a wind generator at the top, dark.
To protect against the rain, the system lets in some light. But he noticed that there were
There were white animals in many places. Obviously there are a lot of animals here.

Sitting next to him in the car, Lex shined a flashlight at the base where the Velociraptor lay.
Why does the heart suffer?


"Because | shot him with a tranquilizer," she said.

Are you dying? she said.

"|Perhaps not."

Why should we accept it? Lex said.

"To show people downtown that dinosaurs actually work," Grant said.

Do you know how you know they are alive?

“Because this is a young man,” Grant said. "And because he's a baby dinosaur." "is

it?” Lexi said as she looked at him in the candlelight.

"Yeah. You're glowing now, aren't you?" He reached out and handed her his watch.
What does he say?

"He says... fifteen."

"ok."

"That means we only have forty-five minutes to fight the group," Tim said.

“We’ve got to get closer,” Grant said. "I think we should get to the inn now."
He didn’t know, but he knew that the blade was rising upwards, pulling him back
outside, and-

"Wow!" said Tim.

He walked into the sunlight with a smile. There was a light drizzle going on in places.
The headroom was dark. Grant immediately knew someone was watching him.
average. They were in front of the garage!

"Yes!" Lexi shouted. "We did it! That's it!" She was jumping on the couch when Grant walked over.
The car is in the garage. There were dog houses next to a wall. They installed the velostrator for a day.
with a glass of water. Then, they start climbing the stairs to the roof.
Traveling house.

"I'm going to get a burger! And fries! Chocolate milkshake! No more dinosaurs!"
Yay!” They reached the door and opened it.

So they settled down.


At the visitor’s entrance, the glass door shatters and something blows through the air.
of the tip of the leaf. For example it refers to the time when dinosaurs ruled the world
At one point, he screams at the sky. The giant Tyransaurus robot wakes up and goes to sleep.
The legs are in the air, its pipes and exhaust systems are exposed. Outside, inside, they saw
palm trees, shaded in the fields.

Tim and Lex approach the guards behind the metal fence. Grant picked up his security radio.
And watch all the channels. "Hi, it's Grant. Who's there? Hi, it's Grant."

Lex looked at the body of the guard lying on the ground to his right. He couldn’t see anything but
Legs and feet.

"Thank you, Grant. Thank you."

Lex frowned, looking at the office door. Grant held out his hand.
"Hey. Hold on."

Deceased? What is that thing in the world? Blood?

"Yes."

How is it not black? "You

Not good,” Tim said.

What does 'sick' mean? | no.

The radio crackled. "My God," came a voice. Great? Are you?

And then: "God? God?" And Ellie. "I'm here," Grant said.

"Thank God," Ellie said. "Are you okay?"

"I'm fine, yeah."

What about the children? Have you seen them?

"| Kids like me," Grant said. "wish you all the best."

"Thank God."

Lex walked over to the desk. Grant shrugged. "Come here."

The radio crackled. "-n Where are you?"

"In the courtyard. In the courtyard."


On the radio, he heard Wu say, "My God. He's here."

“Alan, listen,” Ellie said. "The coaches let them go. They can close their doors. They can
Like a house.

"Okay. Where are you?" Grant said. "We're in S o."

said Grant, "And the others? Mild, all the others?"

"They've evacuated some people. But we've sent everybody home."

"And the phones work?"

"No. Your whole idea is stupid. I don't do anything."

'How can we fix the problem?'

"We tried."

“We have to accept it now,” Grant said, “if we didn’t do it in half an hour
It reaches the ground.

He began to explain about the mountain when Myrtle nodded. "I don't think you understand."
Dr. Great. We have less than half an hour here.

"How is that?"

"We have teams behind us. We have two now."

"So what? This house is untenable."

Muldoon sighed, "No. You don't want the dogs to wake up."
outside the house." The radio crackled. "-Please hit a tree near the fence. The reps are over.
On the floor and on the roof. Either way, the metal part on the taillight should be
There is fire, but fire is not known. They destroy the light of heaven.

Grant said, "Going into the woods?" He shrugged, trying to ask, "How is it?"

“Yeah,” said Mildred, “they weigh fifteen thousand pounds a piece.
They’re like an insect, they can teleport and-” The transmission cut off abruptly.

"How is it?" Grant said again.

"I think they have another ten or ten minutes to go," Mildred said.
He entered the house with the light from heaven. And when they entered. . Ahhh, that’s it.
Minister Dr. Grant.”

The radio crackled.


In the dim light of the floor in front of Malcolm’s bed, the steps hit the first steel frame.
A report caught the end of the barrel and pulled, firing again. He gave her a thumbs up.
The ceiling light and the broken ceiling light shone on Malcolm’s bed below. Ellie got to the bottom of it.
And remove the most valuable items from the pile.

"God, they're bad," Malcolm said, looking up.

Now that the glass had shattered, they could hear screams and the sound of clapping, screaming
Their lips were on metal as they baked the brownies. Where there were small silver areas.
They are hurting. She poops all over breakfast and the bedside table.

“They’re really bad,” Ellie said. “They’ll just do it at another bar.”

said Woo, "If only Grant would go to the dressing room . . ."

"Bloody hell," Mildred said. He walked around the house with shaking legs. "Not found
There it’s very simple. It cannot get stronger quickly. to get this started."

Malcolm was shocked. "Yes." His voice was as gentle as the wind.

"What did he say?" said Mildred.

"Yeah," Malcolm replied. "can. . ."

“What’s going on?”

"Anxiety . . ." He shrugged.

What kind of evidence?

"Go to the side…" "Oki?

And what do you do?

Malcolm laughed heartily. "Shake your hands." "Envelope

Jesus, Muldoon said, is coming back.

"Wait a minute," Wu said. "Okay. There are only two answers here. Which means that
There are at least four more. We can go out and relax.”

"And what?"

"Then Grant drove to the parts store and started the engine."


"And you go back to the control room and start shooting?"

"really."

"No time," said Mildred. "No time."

“But if we can keep the retorts in here,” Wu said, “they can get rid of
The light of heaven. It can work. It's good to see.

"My dear," said Mildred.

"really."

Who will be the anchor? I'm not good. I have lost my leg. "illness

Do it,” Wu said.

“No,” Muldoon said. "Only you know what to do with the computer. You have to
I talked to Grant earlier."

"Then I do," Harold said.

"No," Ellie said. "Malcolm needs you. I'll do it."

"Hell, | he didn't even think about it," Myrtle said. "There are repeaters behind you, repeaters in front of the house. . . . ."

But he was already changing, putting on his running shoes. "Just don't tell Grant," she said.
"That's what scares you."


The hallway was silent, the cool elements flowing through. For several minutes, the radio remained silent.
Tim says why don’t you talk to us?

"I'm awake," Leake said.

“They’re looking for their own,” Grant said.

The radio crackled. "Grant, y-nry Wu is calling. Is he here?" "Am

Here,” Grant said.

“Listen,” Wu said. "Can you look down the hallway where you are?"

Grant looked back through the glass door at the palm trees and flowers. "Yeah," Grant

said.

Wu said, “There’s a path through the trees to the school building, which
Where are the electrical appliances and wires. | Make sure you have checked the maintenance facility.
yesterday?"

"Yeah," Grant said. Though he was shocked for a moment. He only learned this morning.
Room? That’s how it was a few years ago.

"Now listen," Wu said. "We think we can get all the answers right here next door, but we
You don’t think so. So be careful. Give us five minutes.

"Okay," Grant said.

"You can drop the kids off at a restaurant and they'll be fine. Don't take the radio with you
If you go.

"ok."

"Shut up before you go, so I won't make any noise outside. Let me know when you're ready."
kindergarten."

"ok."

Grant turned off the radio. Lex returned. Are we going to a restaurant? she said.

"Yeah," Grant said. They got up and started walking in the peace of the breeze. "AM

I want a burger,” Leake said.

"|Don't think you don't have fire to cook."

"Then ice cream."

"Tim, you have to help him."

"I will."

"I have to go away for a while," Grant said.

"|I know."

They walked to the door of the restaurant. The door opened and Grant saw the empty dining room.
Then there are the tables and chairs and the sliding metal doors. On the one hand, a change sheet and page, and
Gum and Bombay.

"Okay, kids. | You guys wanted me to stay here no matter what. Got it?"

“Put on the heart radio,” Lex said.

"| It's okay. | I have to. Just stay here. I'll be gone in five minutes. Okay?"


"ok."

Grant closed the door. The dining room was dark. Lex took her hand, "Light."
His ideas,” he said.

"Not good," Tim said. "No mercy." Then he took out another night light.

"You're welcome. What about me?"

"Just hold my hand. I'll eat something." He allowed her to move forward. He saw a light.
Table and chairs. On the right, a flower change sheet and a cake with frosting and
a dog. He grabbed handfuls of candy.

"|I told you," Lex said. "I like cream, not candy."

"Take that."

"Ice cream, Timmy."

"No, no."

Tim put the scope in his pocket and took the Leica into the dining room. He touched
On your team. "I don't like the sun," she said.

"Just walk with me. Hold my hand."

"Then, a little later."

Behind the tables and chairs were two sliding doors with small windows in them.
Maybe they went to the kitchen. He slammed a door and everything stopped.


Ellie Sattler walked out the bedroom door and felt the smile on her face and
feet. His heart was pounding, even though he knew he was safe.
fence. Up front, he saw strong bands embedded in the paper.

But he couldn’t see much beyond the ceiling. Twelve other places in the world.
It becomes white milk. And he still hasn’t seen any results. Yes, there were gardens and trees.
Almost vomit. "Hey!" He screamed into the fog and tried.

Muldoon leaned against the doorframe. “I think that’s possible,” he said. “You should think
noise. " He went out and got a piece of metal that was being made inside. He threw the
And bars are like buffet food. "Come get it! Dinner's ready!"

"It's awesome," Ellis said. He looked up at the sky in shock. He didn't see any answers.

"They don't understand English." Mildred laughed. "and | we hope they accept all of their proposals. . .

He was still afraid and the thought of anxiety made him angry. He visited the homes of his hosts.
He was close to graduation. Muldoon pressed the taps again. At its peak, it was about to end in 1914.
Through the blackness he saw a shadowy creature. rept.

“It’s the customers first,” Mildred said.

The dog disappeared and came back in the darkness, but didn't come near anyone.
Getting closer, there he was.
You start to think. If he couldn't get the hosts out of their house, Grant would be in trouble.

"You make a lot of noise," Ellis said.

'Bloody hell,' said Mildred.

"No, this."

"| You know these animals-"

"You're drunk," he said. "Let me do it."

"And how do you do that?"

He didn't answer. He went to the door. "They say retirees are smart."

"They're good. Just a little, like champagne."

Are they okay?

"Yeah, okay."

"They can hear that noise," he said and opened the door. Metal row, but off.
The black there is already screaming. He closed it again and opened it with another shake.

He left it open.

"|I don't do that," Myrtle said. "You can do that, leave it alone.  I'll take the launch."

"Take the printer."

He took a deep breath in thought. "Genard has bodyguards."


"Well, yes," he said. "Look at him." And he went in by the door.
Brushes. His heart was beating so fast he could barely touch his feet to the ground. It changed.
He quickly disappeared into the fog. He soon separated from his wife.

As you can imagine, Muldoon started spitting on her in a fit of rage. "God dammit, girl."
'Don't do that,' the man says.

"Don't say 'girl'," she said.

"I'll ask you for everything | I want," Mildew growled.

He doesn't listen. Startled for a moment, his body looked everywhere. Heart
Just 20 yards from the bird now, he could see the snow drifting in like the rain had passed.
Leaves. He threw himself on the boards. It’s like the darkness of the world. that
The joints of the legs and feet often ache as a result. He was shocked.

"Can you hear me?" shouted Muldoon.

How cute are these animals? He muttered to himself. Should I reschedule? there is no
far down the mountain, no.

They attacked.

There was no sound.

The first animal to turn the stick to the tree on the left. goes ahead and
He turned and ran. The second one attacks the other side, obviously hitting
It crawls, floats in the air, lifts its feet and runs, treads like a running track, and
The animal fell to the ground. Now he was walking and couldn’t look back, the
The heat causes the heat to become too high.
Muldoon knocked on the door, saw her reaching out, screamed, grabbed her arm and
He kicked so hard that he lost his footing and fell to the ground. And then he changed
time to see first, but the two bree-dogs were in the house and barking.

"Good job," Mead said. Now he barks at dogs, barks and walks
Their names. They threw themselves at the wall, jumped in front of it, and one of them almost made
above. "Col, that was hard! These bastards can fly!"

He stood up, looking at the cuts and bruises, blood running down his legs. all
One can only guess: Three dogs here. And two eyes. That means it has a purpose.
One side.

"Please help me," Mildred said. Let’s take care of them!


Grant left the spectator area and went straight to the bubble. He found his way.
Palm trees follow it to the west, and above it, a glass maintenance building emerges from the
Cloud.

There was no door in sight. Continue to the ledge. at the top,
As it turns out, Grant is a truck driver. He stood up and faced her.
The front door, wrapped in armored steel, was locked. He leaned back and shot.
Around the house. Far ahead, to his right, Grant saw a door. was created
with men's shoes.

Grant entered the room and crouched in the darkness. He heard, but he did not listen. He took
His radio came on.

"That's Grant," he said. "I'm in."


Wu looked up at the light in the sky. Two repeaters are seen in Malcolm’s room, but
He seemed to have forgotten about the noises outside. He went to the window of the house. Inside, the three
velociraptors are hunting. Eli was going back and forth, well, back
Brushes. But it seems like the Raptors don’t have the guts to accept it. Now they know
He walks, walks up the stairs, jumps and screams, then falls again.
Use the gun and complete the mission. Their performance received the highest rating.
rather than a problem.

"Like the birds," Mildred said. "I'm making a show."

Wu shook his head. "They're smart. They see it as unacceptable. They don't really try."

The radio crackled. "-around."

Wu picked up the radio. "Tell me again, Dr. Grant?" "Am

Inside,” Grant said.


"Doctor Grant, are you in the hospital?"

"Yeah," Grant said. “You may say that I am God,” he added.

"All right, God. If you go through the door, you'll see a lot of cracks and crevices."
Wu closed his eyes and looked, “Because there’s a big hole in the middle
Two-story apartment. On your left is a train track and a shark.

"| Look at him."

"Go and walk on the road."

"Five." He had a radio on his phone.

"When you've gone twenty or thirty meters you'll be at another road going off to the right." "AM

Look,” Grant said.

"Go this way."

"ok."

"If you keep going," Wu said, "you'll be in a set of stairs on your left. You'll be in the cave."

"| Look at him."

"Come downstairs."

There is a long rest period. Wu dug his fist into his pocket and Muldoon rolled his eyes.

"Well, I'm going," Grant said.

"Okay," Wu said. “Now, there should be two big black tanks in front of you.
meaning 'fire'.

"They say: Fire." And there’s something at the end in Spanish.

“Aye,” Wu said. "Two e-fuel tanks. One of
It's cold so let's change it to one. If you look below
Tanks, you see a white tube sticking out.

"PVSWS.- Four?"

"Yeah. PVC. Insert that pipe and it goes."

"Okay. I'm following him... Oh!"

"what happened?"

"No. | I'm shaking my head." there

It’s a process.

"Are you okay?"

"Yeah, it's fine. It just gave me a headache. It's funny."

"Keep following the pipe."

"Okay, okay," Grant said. He looked like he was angry. "Okay. The pipe goes into a big aluminum box
With their hands at their corners. He says, 'Honda.' It’s like an engine.

"Yeah," Wu said. "He's an artist. If you go anywhere, you see a plate."
Two buttons.

"|Look at them. Red and yellow?"

"That's it," Wu said. "Click the red one first, then move it. Press the black one
a."

"good."

There was another seat. It lasted a minute. Wu and Mid looked at each other.

"God?"

"It didn't work," Grant said.

Did you take the yellow first and then the black? Wu asked.

"Yes, | I did," Grant said. He looked angry. "I'll do as you told me. I was
A scream and a scream, a scream, very loud, and then the scream stopped and there was nothing left.

"Try again."

"|He already did," Grant said. "It didn't work."

"Okay, just a minute." Wu rubbed his eyes. "It's like the engine is trying to turn on and can't
For some reason. God?"

"I'm here."

"Go under the engine bay where the paint bucket goes."

"ok." In one example; Grant added, “The pipe goes to a black cylinder and that’s what it looks like
Fuel pump."

"That's it," Wu said. "Yes. The fuel pump. Find a small valve
above."


"Once?"

"You have to push it down, with a little metal thing you can push."

"| He understands. But he's on the side, not in front of him."

"Okay. Shut up."

"It's windy." "good.

Wait until-”

"Water's coming out now. It smells like gas."

"Okay. Shut that beard." Wu sighed at the Midwife, shaking her head. "The bomb went off too soon. God?"

"Yes."

“Press the buttons again.”

Moments later, Wie heard a small hiss and a gust of wind as the engine revved up and
Then a clicking sound as if it had been locked. "It makes sense," Grant said.

"Good job God! Good job!"

"Now what?" Grant said. His voice was strange. "The lights don't burn here."

"Please return to the courtroom and I'll talk to you about revising your plans."

Is that what | Do you need to do it now?

"Yes."

"Okay," Grant said. "I'll call you when I get there." His voice was loud, and he was nervous.

"God?"

The radio was dead.


Tim walked through the front doors of the restaurant and into the kitchen. An
The large table in the middle of the room has a large fireplace burning to the left, and
There are also large mobile fridges. Tim started opening the fridge to make ice cream.
Smoke billowed into the air as he opened each one.

How does a fire burn? Lex said letting go of his hand.

"It's not like that."

"They all have little blue lights."

"These are the pilot samples."

What is a pilot light? They had fireplaces in their houses.

"It's nothing," Tim said, opening another fridge. "But that's the point | I can do something for you."
In another breath he sees all kinds of things, milk jugs and wood chips and
Lots of T-bone slices, pork - but no cream.

"Do you want ice cream?"

"I told you, did you |?"

The other fridge is bigger. The door was a steel frame with a piano key behind it. fluent
He grabbed the lid, opened it, and saw an animal crawling. A whole room.
Star star.

"Tim.. ."

Have you got a minute? She said she was angry. "I'll try to make your cream."

"Timmy…there's something here."

He continued the kiss, and for a moment the last two words were unscripted. Then Tim takes
In the freezer, I see wisps of white smoke. Lexi stays.
metalworking table. Looking in the kitchen.

He heard a sound like a large snake. His voice rises and falls. I was
It won't take long. Maybe the wind was blowing, but he knew it wasn’t there.

"Tim," she said, "I'm scared."

He leaned against the wall and looked out. In the dark dining room, the
Table width of green rectangles. And walked among them, silent
his breath was only that of his lizard, a velociraptor.


In the darkness of the kitchen, Grant scanned the drawers and back
ladder. It’s hard to find your way in the dark and somehow you find the sound
Product orientation. He reached the stairs and started to go when she stopped.
There was something else in the room besides the hum of the generator.

Grant stopped and listened.


Only one person was crying.

It was like Genoa.

"where are you?" Grant shouted.

"Here," Genaro said. "To the truck."

Grant couldn’t see any trucks. He squinted into the darkness. He looked at her again.
eye. He saw shiny black objects moving in the darkness. Then he looked at the truck and saw
He frowned.


Tim saw the silence and sighed.

Velosraptor is 6 meters tall, and very agile, even with its hind legs and one tail.
Hidden among the tables. Tim could only see the wounds on the back of his neck wrapped in both hands.
Next to his body, his legs are split. He could see the smiles glowing.
back. The Velliciraptor was cautious, shaking its head as it struck.
With lizards they are like birds. The head also moves up and down with a
His tail is bent, allowing a bird to peck at his face.

It’s a big, ugly bird.

The dining room is dark, but it looks like the retrofit could use good lighting to brighten it up
forward. Sometimes, he would drop his head and hit his head under the tables. Tim knows a
A kiss. Then his head pops up and he looks bird-like and upright.

Tim watched until he realized the Velociraptor was coming down the hallway. Is that the
About their grief? All the books say dinosaurs don’t hurt, but this
It turns out that it can be done. Anyway, what do the books know? That’s the real deal.

and he came near.

She went back to the kitchen.

Is there something here? Lex said.

Tim didn't answer. He threw it under a table in the corner, next to a large garbage can. fluent
He rushed to her and said angrily: "Stay here!" And threw it back in the fridge.

He grabbed a piece of red meat and pushed it back to the door. He threw it first.
The steaks were on the floor, and he tore off a slice and served the second one. ...

Through his glasses he saw Lex looking around the corner. He growled behind his back. FLUENT .
Third meat, and fourth, I went deeper into the kitchen.

His voice grew louder, and a locked hand closed the door, and his big head peeked out.
Take care of your body.

The Velliciraptor stood at the entrance to the hospital.

Tim was standing at the back of the house, next to the blacksmith shop. but
He hadn't had time to hide; The head and neck rise above the table;
He was in control of the Velociraptor.

Slowly, Tim lowered his body and sank under the table. . . . Velostrator shook his head.
He looked around, watching Tim's expression.

Tim sighed. He was, but he was thinking about making a change. that

The velociraptor lives in the doorway. A kiss.

It’s too dark in here,” Tim said. It doesn't look good. This makes him slow down.

But now he can wear dragon fur and look at the glasses.
The dinosaur eats in silence, lifting its snout to reveal its fangs. that
the velociraptor looked at him again and cocked his head to the side. There’s a lot going on.
Broken bones.

Tim felt his heart pounding. In some ways it’s hard to make an animal like this
Kitchen, in front of an open forest. Meaning, meaning, meaning, meaning.
breath...

He was probably more afraid of animals than Tyransaurus. Tyrannosaurus was a
He was tall and strong, but he was not wise. The Velostrator is the largest man-made vehicle and is
She is clearly quick and clever; Tim is afraid of search terms as they are important ears.

Velosrapport buried it. Gone then - from the modern day Lakers! You have to clean it.
precisely! Tim's heart sank.

Velocirapport was shocked. Gradually, he became interested.


He had a dream.

Tim wanted to lean over, look under the table, but he didn't budge. Made of black.
One half froze, listening for the sound of their screams. Eaten by a dinosaur. Bones and all.

Rator raised his head and looked around. Frustrated. A second dream. fluent
He quickly went forward. He looked at the ground.

attention.

Didn't eat the cake.

His head shot up. Tim's legs were stiff with sweat, but he didn't move.

Why did the animal not eat the second piece of meat? Eleven ideas run through his mind.
And he didn't like the taste of the beef, nor did he like the pork, because it was bad.
My life, I like Jean, I like Lex, I like Tim, the Tim

Velliciraptor now moves faster. He saw the third piece of meat, lowered his head and looked away.
We’re moving forward.

Tim caught his breath. The dinosaur was only a few feet away, and now Tim could see the little
It sticks to the bones. He saw the black blood on her hands and feet.
He could see fine cracks in the broken furniture and raw leather.
The voice under his breath.

Velosrapport buried it. He shook his head and looked at Tim. Tim almost choked.
afraid. Tim's body was dry and stiff. He looked at the dogs looking around the house.
Another kiss.

"He grabbed me," Tim recalled.

Then, the head pulls back, and the animal goes into the fifth stage. Tim
I mean, Lex please don't change please don't change anything don't...

The Velliciraptor cleared his throat and looked at him. Now open the freezer door.
Tim blew the smoke in and threw it on the ground next to the animal. a big
He kicked his left foot, then kicked again. The dinosaur is available in two versions. It’s too cold,” Tim said.
Doesn’t fit in, cold, doesn’t fit, doesn’t fit….

The dinosaur came.

The head was gone, then the body, then the tail.

Tim walked over, leaned against the metal door, and opened it.
He stuck with the first thing! He didn’t close the door! The Velostrator roared in shock.
noise. Without warning, Tim pulled a knob, closed the door and
Listen to catch it! It's closed!

Lex! Lex! She almost screamed. You’ll hear the rapper knocking on the door, you’ll hear him
Bed. He knew there was a metal part in it, and if he fired the retort, it would
The door opened. They had to be destroyed. "Lexi!"

Lex is next to him. "what do you want!"

Tim leaned against the doorframe and locked it. There's a pin! Little pin! Carry.
Pine!

The Velostrator roars like a lion, and its roar is like a sharpened metal. Everything fell apart.
His body is in his mouth.

I can’t see a thing! Lexi shouted.

The pin is inserted near the doorknob, riding on a metal frame. "Ok
there!"

“I don’t look good!” he shouted, and Tim realized he wasn't wearing pants.

Think about it!

He saw her small hand reach out to touch the pin and pull it closer
He could hear how nervous he was, his breath quivering as he held Pin.
And the Velostrator knocked on the door and knocked-God forbid-but no
She ignored him and turned back to look again and Tim closed the door
further. Lex leaned forward and reached out into the darkness.

"|There you are!" Lex yelled, grabbing Pin by the arm and pulling him into the hole. He pulled away.
Take it out again.

"From upstairs, downstairs!"

He grabbed her again, lifted her over the chain, swung her over his arm and down. Urban.

Closed.


Velostrator yelled. Tim and Lex return to the door and the dinosaur attacks.
Inside again. With each strike, the metal walls creaked, but they held still. Tim didn’t do it.
You think the dog can open the door.

The raptor was hidden.

He let out a deep breath. "Come," he said. fluent

She grabbed his hand and ran.


"You should see him," Jannard said as he led Grant to the hospital
building. "It must be twelve. Committee. | must go by truck to .
Separate yourself from them. They were all in the air. This is where we hide and wait like muscles.
But they fled when you came.

“Scavengers,” Grant said. “They’re not going to shoot something that moves and looks powerful.
Attack anything that is dead and about to die. Either way, it's not going away."

Now they were going up to the door.

What happened to the reason you jumped? Grant said. "|No

Find it,” Janrod said.


Tour?
"| He doesn't see it. | He's gone, | I think it's because he's hurt. | I think Meade is on his knees and
It’s bleeding, it’s here. then. . . | I don't know. Maybe go back outside. Very good


He died here. | I don't see.
"And you're good," Grant said.


Woo looks out the bedroom window. They watched as he walked away.
I attack Ellie. This practice continued for a long time and reached
It's very straightforward. As if trying to get the attention of Eli, century.
He was trying to imitate them.

Wu has always been fascinated by the behavior of dinosaurs. And well:
It is responsible for DNA damage, such as protein synthesis. You don’t think so.
Creativity, however, can only be measured in complicated ways, such as creating an animal.
It interacts with a food to protect an enzyme. But overall, the main features
They didn't understand. You should not look at the DNA sequence.
To describe his creation. That was impossible.

This is Wu’s DNA research. It’s just a shame that
Today the designer can repair an old clock. He was doing something.
The past is something made of old stuff and follows old rules. You didn't
Learn why it works the way it does, and it's been tweaked and tweaked countless times
The forces of growth over time. Thus, as an operator is defined and
Makes sure the clock is running correctly, Wie makes an adjustment, and makes sure the animals
He pushed harder. And he just tried to rationalize his bad behavior:
Electric fences or installing barbed wire fences. These are the products they sent.
Please go to the website.

And the latest research has given us a glimpse into the dinosaurs.
park. He didn’t know that animals were behaving.
Complete history or not. Were they acting like they had done in the past? It was open.
It’s an impossible question to answer.

Although Wu doesn’t say so, it’s clear that dinosaurs evolved.
This is a great example of his work. The survival of the animal is essential.
In a practical sense; It shows that Wu can play all the parts. End-
He created a million-year-old animal to imitate the monster
It does not live in itself.

However, he also, looking at the responses from the outside, was shocked at their behavior.
Raptors are smart, and even smarter animals get spooked quickly. Intelligent animals have also evolved
opinion, and-

Harding left Malcolm’s room and went down the hallway. Where is Ellie?

"Exactly."

"Please. The guards are in the light from above."


"when?" Wu said walking towards the door.

"It's not just a moment," Harold said.

Wu opened the door. Ellie! Home now!

She looked at him, confused. "No problem, everything is under control..."

"contemporary!"

He shook his head. "I know what I'm doing," he said.

"Now, Ellie, no way!"

Muldoon did not like to deal with the open door, he almost said;
He saw a shadow fall from the sky, and now he knew what had happened. I
Just as he was out the door, Muldoon heard Ellie scream. Mildred came to the door and
When he looked up, he saw that Wu was lying flat on his back, his body hanging from his chest.
And the retort blew his head off when Wee’s soul was suffocated, even though Wee was still alive
He reaches up and smashes the big chunk he was eating when he
He’s still alive, and Ellie takes off her glasses and starts crawling up the stairs, and
Muldoon closed the door and looked around nervously. How quickly that happened!

Harding said, "Did he fall off the roof?"

Muldoon shook his head. He went to the window and looked out and saw three dinners.
Now he walks up the stairs. But they were not following Eli.

They turned back and forth, down the sidewalk.


Grant came to the door of the maintenance room and looked up into the fog. He could
He heard the retorts crackle and sounded like they were getting closer. Now he could see them.
People moving forward. They walked to the auditorium.

He turned back to Gennaro.

Gennaro shook his head, no.

Grant leaned over and whispered in her ear. "No choice. We have to turn on the computer."

Grant stepped out of the fog.

After a while, Zener followed.


Eli did not stop to think. When the retorts fell off the ledge and fell into the w
He rushed towards the roof. There was a fifteen meter
Long distance between the wall and the house. He ran, not hearing the animals chasing him, just
She heard his breath. He pulled up the shade and saw a tree growing near the house.
And he cried, and took hold of a branch, and rose up. Epic. He felt a wonderful relief as
He saw her feet and lifted them up and placed them on a branch
Moreover, he grabbed his neck, and stood up quickly.

He was twenty meters down and the Reapers were still below and
As he was about to rest, he saw the first wild beast in the field. mouth
He was covered in blood and had pieces of meat falling out of his mouth. He immediately went and shook his hand.
Left, maybe, you can see the roof. He looked at the ground.
further.

Two retorts mounted the tree.

Now from the house, he sees the mountain just four feet away and
From the lights above the glass pyramid, there is a gate to the city; He could
Get inside. With so much effort, he leapt into the air and landed
Cave. He rubbed his eyes, but it was just a happy feeling, like
The game he played, he wanted to win. He ran to the door leading to the
Centuries later, he could still hear the responses from the vibrating branches. They were still
Inside the tree.

He reached the door and knocked. The door was locked.

It took him a while to adjust to the situation. The door was locked.
He was riding a horse and couldn't get off. The door was locked.

He knocked on the door with his heart, and ran upstairs, thinking that
Look at a street below, but only the murky edge of the water showed the wind
foggy. All around the pool was paved. Twelve layers of concrete. Then more
You pulled away. No more trees to climb. There is no staircase. There is no fire escape.


nothing.

Ellie gasped and threw the retorts easily out of the house. He ran away.
He expected there to be another door, but he didn't know.

People slowly approached him, followed him, and walked silently through the glass pyramids.
He looked at the ground. Ten meters from the edge of the pile.

It's very straightforward.

The answers were coming to him, and he thought: Isn’t that always the case?
way? Small mistakes can ruin everything. He was always funny, always happy and
Somehow he couldn’t believe that this monster was coming, couldn’t believe that now was the
Your life was about to end. It seemed impossible. He was in a safe mode
Cheerful. He did not believe this would happen.

the Raptors are excited. Ellie turned and pulled him downstairs. He took a deep breath.
And he started running towards the door. As he ran to the side, he saw the cat.
The pool, he knew was too high but thought, hell, it jumped up.

And he fell.

And with a terrible shock he felt himself in the middle of his soul. He was in the water. fluent
He would do it! He came to land and looked up, saw the retorts pointing
He fell down. And he knew if he could do it, the Reps could too. He changed the air.
Water and water, can reptiles swim? But he was confident they could. Probably
Travel like pirates.

The gatekeepers returned. And then you heard Harold call
"Sather?" He realized he had opened the door. The cakes are beautiful.

He quickly got out of the pool and ran to his room.


Harding climbed the stairs twice at the same time and opened the door
I thought. "Sater!" he shouted. And he thought. There was a black hole among the firmids on the roof.
The answers were not checked.

"Sater!"

He was very impressed with Stirling and soon revealed his feelings. fluent
He must see the animal in his mind. The next hour, he broke a finger.
Near the door, he felt a pain in his back;
He leans over and closes the door with his hand, listening inside.
Muldoon said, "He's here. He's already in the house."

On the other side of the door, the black bell rang, Harding pushed the door open again, and
He reached out, closed the door with a metallic click and left.
below.


"Where are we going?" Lex said. They were watching from the second floor. Glass-
The wall ran the full length of the house.

"In the living room," Tim said.

Where is he?

"Over here on the side." Tim looked at the names written on the doors as he passed.
they. These are just like offices: public services come to Park Ward. .. general
Chief... Director...

They came in a glass case marked with this logo:


open body
Authorized Users Only


against this background.


There was a security card, but Tim just opened the door.
How is it made?
"It's over," Tim said.


Why are we going to court? he asked.

"To get a radio. We need to call someone."

Beyond the glass doors, the living room is quiet. Tim remembered this place, looking at it.
He was there during the tour. Lex stepped closer. In the distance they were.
inflammation. It looked like the animals were approaching. Then Tim heard footsteps.
The glass is on the floor.

"They are…" Lex sighed.

"last but not least."

"What are you doing here?" Lex said.

"About now."

Park Ranger... Jobs... Head Ranger...

"That's it," Tim said. He closed the door. The castle was just as he had always seen it.
before. In the center of the room is a console with four seats and four computer screens. that
All the rooms were dark, except for the TV, which was showing rectangles of different colors.

"Where's the radio?" Lex said.

But Tim had forgotten all about radio. He looked down at the computer screen.
The screens are on fire! This is not good enough -

"Power must be restored... ."

"Ick," Lex said as he rubbed his stomach.

"than."

"|It was in someone's name," he said.

Tim didn't get up when they entered. He looked down and all he could see was his ears.
He was on the ground.

"It's definitely different," Leake said.

"last but not least." He threatened the reporters.

Where is the rest? she said.

"You can't be a thing now."

He looked at the TV intently. There was a screenshot of their work on the website:


"Well, don't worry about it, Tim," she said.

"Don't worry, | it won't hurt."

Before he saw expensive computers like those sitting at home
His father worked on it. These computers control everything from elevators to security and
Heating and cooling systems. They look similar - different colored dots - but they
It is not difficult to understand. And there is almost always some sign of help, if needed.
Kenko’s lesson, however, doesn’t apply here. He looked back to see.

But then he noticed something else: the numbers in the upper right corner of the page. they
Read 10:47:22. Then Tim knew it was time. It’s only thirty minutes away.
ship-but the people in the house were worried.

There was a cross. He turned around and saw Lex holding a radio. He was sweating.
buttons and buttons. "What am I doing?" she said. "It doesn't work well."

Give it to me!

"It's mine! | I got it!" "Like

For me, Lexi!" "I would.

first!"

"Lexi!"

Immediately, Radio Fora. "What's going on!" Muldoon's voice.

Suddenly, Lex turned on the radio.


Grant sighed and buried his head in the palm trees. Through the fog he could see
the raptors screamed and screeched and pounced on the lions’ dens. but,
Between cries, they opened their mouths and raised their heads, as if listening for something far away.
And then it makes a little noise.


What do they do? said January.

"It's like they're trying to get into the restaurant," Grant said. "What's in the pantry?" "AM

she left the children there. . ." Grant said.

"Can they break this glass?"

"|Don't worry about it, no."

Grant looked around, and suddenly heard the sound of a radio wire and the repeaters going off
Jumping in the wrong direction. They ran at each other, until
After seeing the first of them, he jumped to the second floor and from the
on the second floor of the hotel.


In the office on the second floor, Tim picks up the radio that Lex was holding. fluent
Close the paper. "Thank you? Thank you?"

"-are you, Tim?" was Muldoon's voice.

"I am, yes."

"where are you?"

"In the courthouse. The fire is on fire!"

"Okay, Tim," Muldoon said.

"If someone tells me, I'll do it." There was silence.

"Hello?" said Tim. Did you hear me?

"Ahh, we have a plan for that," Mood said. "No one, uh, anyone here knows how to do this
that. Computers are too bright.”

Tim said, "What, are you kidding? No one knows?" It’s different.

"I don't." I do. "I think it's something about being a big network. Being a big network... you
Are you doing anything on the computer, Tim?

Tim looked down at the paper. Lex snorted. "Say it, Tim," she said.

"Of course some. | Know one thing," Tim said.

"You might want to," Muldoon said. "Nobody knows what I'm doing. And Grant doesn't
On computers.

"Okay," Tim said. "I'll do it." He turned off the radio and looked at the screen to read.

“Tim,” Leake said. "You don't know what you're doing."

"Now | do it."

"If you know how to do it, do it," Leake said.

"Just a minute." To start, pull the chair next to the keyboard and press
Turtle owners. These buttons move around circuits on the screen. but not a
done. Then he pushed the other buttons. The line has not been changed.

"good?" she said.

"Something's wrong," Tim said, his eyes blank. "You

I just don’t know, Tim,” she said.

He looked at the computer again and noticed. The keyboard has a smooth button.
On top of the keyboards, just like a computer keyboard, the camera is big and wide. but
The control room is no joke. Tim looked at the edges of the paper and saw something wrong.
Red light zones.

yellow, near the bottom of the rim. .. What does that mean? He shrugged.
He walked over to the light and saw a bright yellow glow around his body.

He touched the screen and heard a click.


After a while, the screen cleared and the first screen flashed again.

"what happened?" Lex said. "What did you do? Touch something."

really! He thought. He touches the page. A touchscreen! Black fire.
There should be infrared sensors near the wall. Tim had never seen such a screen, but he had read about it.
about them in the book. He touched it.

RESET/REVERT.

Suddenly the screen changed. Received an update:


The computer will now be connected.
Follow the steps on the first page.


On the radio, they hear people screaming. "|I want to see you," Leak said. "You can do it
Look at the VIEW."

"No, Lexi."

"Well, | I want VIEW," he said. And before he could reach out, he grabbed VIEW.
The page changes.


"O-oh," he said.

"Lex, are you going to cum?"

"protect!" she said. "Done! Too."

Throughout the building, viewers quickly watched the various parts of the park change;
Most of the pictures are gray due to fog outside, but one shows the outside
In the living room, there is a dog on the wall.
shows a boat in the sunlight

"What's that?" Tim said as he leaned forward.

"than?"

"That's the picture!"

But the picture had changed, they could see the roof, one.
In the back of a room, then he saw Malcolm lying on a bed-

"Give it time," Leake said. "| Look at yourself!"

Tim tapped the button several times, going into submenus. and various menus.

"Take time," Leake said. "You look... ."

"I don't know about their computers!"

Now there is a stack of images on the screen. One of them was named SAFARI LODGE: LV2- .
4. Alternative to REMOTE: ship (VND). He flipped the page several times.

Video images came from TVs around the house. One pointed to the edge of a mountain of good things.
and the seabed. In the distance, Tim could see the mud houses on the beach, and the harbor. fluent
He knew the port from a helicopter flight back in the day. I was
Pointers. It seemed like the boat was only minutes away.

But the view was taken to the other side, showing the inside of the Safari building;
Gray fog. The reptiles were next to the pyramids, but they raised their heads and
down, into the light.

And, in the third episode, he sees her in a light. Malcolm lies in bed and
Eli is standing beside him. They both looked up. As they watched, Mildred entered.
And he joined them, looking up with an expression of concern.

"They're watching us," Leake said.

"|Don't worry."

The radio crackled. In the corridor, Muldoon raised the radio to his lips. "Are you okay, Timmy?"

"I'm here," Tim said.

"Oh, we don't have much time," Muldoon said ruefully. “Please turn on the power grid.”
Then Tim hears the sound of the retorts and sees a head falling.
Glass, pictured above, clenched his fist.

Quick, Timmy!" Lex said. "Shoot!


network;
Tim suddenly realized that he had been involved in a sexual assault and tried to


Return to the main screen. Most systems only have a return button or command.
home screen, or go to the main menu. But these practices are not—or are not—known. also,


He was sure there was some helpful information written on his device, but he couldn't find it.
Also, when Leica screams and screams with his breath, the sound is infuriating.

In the end he won the first prize. He didn't know what he did, but he did. fluent
he thought, searching for a word.

"Do something, Tim!"

Will you close it? I’m looking for help. He picked up the MAIN-TEMPLATE. The page is full.
A more complex board, with boxes and arrows.

forbidden. forbidden.

He selected the COMMON INTERFACE option. The screen changes:


"What is that?" Lex said. "Why don't you draw the curtain, Tim?"
He didn't listen. Supporting information in this context is referred to as “data.” You received the INFO.


"Tim-ee," Lex yelled, but he was already holding FIND. He saw another useless window. fluent
He threw it back.


Over the radio, he heard Muldoon say, "How's it going, Tim?" He didn't bother to answer.
Danger, push the buttons one after the other.
Suddenly, without warning, the main screen came back.


He turned to the television. The main circuit and SETGRIDS DNL can both be configured
There’s something about their way. He said prevention/treatment and stricter lockdowns would
It’s also important. He heard the retorts shout. He had to make a choice. He threw
SETGRIDS DNL, ​​ and when he saw:


He didn't know what to do. Removed the STANDARD PARAMETERS check box.


The opposite is true.


Park Rail B4-C6 Outdoor Rail C2-D2.
Solution Grade BB-07 Plate Grade R4-R4.
Lori Grades F4-D4 Mantle Grades E5-L6

Main grid C4-G7 Sensor grid D5-G4.
The structure of the AH-B5 A complex of AlCl


An untested circuit.
Security networks are left alone.


Tim nodded heartily. It took him a while to realize that he .
Important information. At least, you know some ways to go now! Press relay F4.


PowerGrade F4 (Safari Lodging)


Do NOT use COMMANDS. the 505
(POWER is not associated with COMAND ERROR.
See pages 4.09-4.11)


"I don't," Leake said.
"|I know!" He pressed another button. The screen lit up again.


D4 Power Grid (Safari Lodge).

Do NOT use COMMANDS. the 505
(POWER is not associated with COMAND ERROR.
See Table 4.09-4.1 1)


Tim tried to calm down and think about it. For some reason it was always a big problem
Every now and then the story tries to throw a punch. He noted that the government and
Gives orders. But what does that mean? Why are there power imbalances?

"Team . . ." Lex said, taking her hand.

'Not now, Lexi.

"Now, now," he said and took it out of his pocket and his pants. and then a
He heard the retorts shout.

He was walking outside.


The lights behind Malcolm’s bedroom nearly pierced the second metal barrier.
Now they can stick their heads through any pane of glass and jump up and down
The people of the world. Then, after a while they separate and start eating with their hands.
"It won't be long now, three or four minutes," Malcolm said. He pressed the radio button:
"Tim, where are you? Tim?"
There was no answer.


Tim looked out the door and saw the Velociraptor at the end of the hallway, standing behind it.
the balcony, he looked around in horror. How did it get out of the freezer?

Then, as he looked, a second raptor screeched, and he recognized it.
The message has not yet aired. He was walking outside. He’s going to heaven.
Come on, downstairs. The second leg falls straight down, laying on the carpet. Tim didn't
Believe in it. The giant beast flew over ten feet into the air. More than ten feet. The legs should be there.
Very powerful.

Lexi said, "I thought you said it was wrong-."

"Shhh." Tim tried to think, but he looked at her with a shocked expression as the third
the raptor flew to the ballet. The animals wandered along the road for a while and
They started off on the same page. They come closer and closer to Lex.

Quickly, Tim slammed the door behind him and returned to the courtroom. but da
He hid it. He finished the short story.

"We're locked outside," Lex sighed. "protect." He showed me the safety card.
Near the door. A flash of black light flashed. In some ways, the security doors work.
"You bastard, we're locked outside!"

Tim looks out the window. He saw many doors, but they all had yellow lights.
beside. That means all doors are locked. There was nowhere else they could go.

Then he saw something down at the edge of the road. The Dead Guard. An
His chest was covered with a white security card.

"Come on," she whispered. They ran into the garage. Tim takes the card, and turns around. but
But when people saw him, they screamed and blocked the road to the control room.
They began to pull away, blowing the air out of the way and pushing Tim and Lex away. Their heads.
He began to fall at a rhythm.

They were going to attack.


Tim did the only thing he could. Using the card, he opened the door closest to his room.
And driving the Lexus. The door slowly began to close around them, the reptiles screaming and
Pay.


Logic


lan Malcolm took a few deep breaths like a lightning bolt. He looked at the answers with wide eyes.

Harding took his blood pressure, rubbed his eyes, and took it back. Ellie Sattler is buried in the cemetery;
He looks nervous and angry. Muldoon sat on the floor and leaned against the wall. Hammond is looking for

In front of him, there are no words. They're all listening to the radio.

What happened to Tim? Hammond said. "Is there a word?"

"|I don't know."

Malcolm said, "They're bad, they're not. They're really bad."

Hammond shook his head. "Who do you think it is."

Ellie said, "So did Malcolm."

"|I've thought about it," Malcolm said. "I don't think so."

Hammond was happy. "It wasn't that bad again, okay. He says I told you a few hours ago. But he did."
No one wants that to happen.

"It's not something you want or don't want," Malcolm said with his eyes closed. He spoke quietly to
Drugs. "It's something you think you should do. When the body goes out in the rain
in the woods to find food for his family, does he threaten to take over the city? No, I think it’s hard
The bottom. He didn't know how to read, and he couldn't help it. Pray for the nations,
The nature of the forest protects it. He prays because he knows he has no control over him. is
His grace.

"But I think you can't be at the mercy of the state. I think you should accept the government and leave
Then you will be in great trouble, because you can't do it. However, he has made some choices.
Tell yourself to do it. And you shouldn’t—and you shouldn’t—or you shouldn’t. You can't help it.
stuff. You can build a ship, but the sea you can't. You can build an airplane, but
The air is not good. You’re not stronger than you think.
believe."

"I'm broken," Hammond said with a sigh, "where's Tim? That's how
Boy is scared.

“I believe he’s trying to solve the problem,” Malcolm said. "Just like everyone else."

"And Grant, too. What happened to Grant?"


Grant reached the front door of the clinic, which he waited for twenty minutes.
before. He took her hand: closed. Then he saw a small red flame. Check
The doors are working again! damn! He ran upstairs and past
He pushed past the study door and stood at the guard's desk where he had been lying.
Listening to your radio. He went to the chicken coop, looking for the children, though.
The restaurant was closed and the kids had left.

He went upstairs, then came to the corner of the room where the device was marked and the door was
Closed. He needed a security card to get away.

Grant couldn’t move.

Somewhere in the street I heard the cries of the responders.


The dragon's tail hit Tim's face, his tail clenched around his neck, and Tim could fall to his knees.
She screams in fear.

"Timmy!" Lexi shouted.

Tim pulled away again. The baby Velociraptor sits on his lap, cooing.
She screams in fear. Tim and Lex were in a White bedroom. On the ground are the creatures: they move
Red balls, dolls and plastic glitter.

"That's a baby raptor," Lex said, pointing to the creature hanging from Tim's neck.

The giant buried his head in Tim's chest. Maybe the poor thing is starving Tim
thought.


Lex pulled him closer and the boy snuggled into his lap. He spat into her neck. "Why
Can you do that? she said. “Scared?”

"|I don't know," Tim said.

He walked over to the raptor to help Tim. The baby screamed and screamed and screamed.
And he leaned back on his chest contentedly, watching her head bounce back and forth. There is no hope
This small difference made sense and-

"Timmy," Lex sighed.

The door was not closed when they entered the nursery. Now, in
the next velociraptor. First, and second.

The baby was crying and squirming on Tim's shoulder. Tim knew he had to do it.
clingy. The child can learn from them. After all, he was a child. He threw the baby
The animal was removed and caged. The baby crawled between her legs.
Adults. The first goat put its mouth in and sucked the baby carefully.

Tim took Lex's hand and pulled him into the nursery. He had to find a way to
leave-

There was a scream. Tim looked back and saw the child in the old man's lap. An
A second velostrator came forward and removed the child’s leg, trying to
The first day. The two friends struggled with the babies as they screamed. It's bleeding.
It falls to the ground.

"They ate it up," Leake said.

Animals would fight with other children, getting upset and head-butting each other. A Tim
The door—open—and he walked, pulling Lex back.

He was in another room, and he realized it was outside.
DNA Extraction Lab, High Resolution Acoustic Microscope
One page shows black and white photographs of animals. His hips and thighs were what they were.
Dinosaurs ate for millions of years and drained blood, which is now being recycled
Dinosaurs in the park. They ran into the lab and Tim could hear them yelling and screaming
The men followed them, got closer, and walked around the laboratory and passed.
There must have been an alarm on the door, because in the narrow corridor the siren sounded from time to time.
he shouted, and the lights above their heads flashed brighter and brighter. As he walked, Tim fell.
He goes into darkness and into darkness again, the sound an alarm, he hears the dogs barking.
he shouted as they followed him. Lex jumps up and screams. Tim saw another door in front of him and
He pushes the door open and walks towards her, and suddenly.
Then something big happened and Lex cried out in fear.

"Rejoice, children," said a voice.

Tim looked at him in disbelief. Dr. Grant home. next to Mr. Gennaro.


In the shadows, it took Grant two minutes to confirm that the guard was dead
Maybe you have a security card. He comes back and takes it and places it on top of her.
Cordova, to get straight to Core. He followed the sound of their answers and saw the soldiers.
They fight in court. She was sure the children would go next door and
Now go back to the crafting lab.

And that's where he met the kids.

Now the repertoire is catching up. The animals paused for a moment.
He was surprised at how many people showed up.

Grant yanked the children from Genora's arms and said, "Put them somewhere safe."

"but-"

“That’s it,” Grant said, looking over his shoulder into the distance.
room, if you can. You should all be safe out there.

What will you do? said January.

People stood by the door. Grant noticed that all the animals were waiting.
Together, and they are running around as a group. Easter Butchers. He was shocked.

"|He has a plan," Grant said. "Now open fire."

Gennaro sends them to the children. The answers flowed slowly for Grant, passing
Large computers, rather than monitors that plug into the computer


Code. People come forward and don’t mind and care about the villages and come
The heads.

Grant heard the door slam behind him and looked over his shoulder. Everyone was standing
On the other side of the glass door, look out. Genaro shook his head.

Grant knew what that meant. There is no door to the palace behind him. Gennaro et al.
The children had been included.

She felt alone now.


Grant slowly pulled away, walking towards the lab, away from Gennaro and
Child. There may be another door next to the one that says TO LABORATORY.
Whatever that means. He had an idea, and he thought it was right. The door in blue.
Biohazard indicators. The answers are coming soon. Grant freaked out and knocked on the door and
He walked away, and there was a shock, a shock.


He was shocked.

Yes.

Where he wanted to be, where he wanted to be: under the red lights, with lots of tables and aisles
Eggs and some red. The pictures on the tables were shaped and breezy.
Black jumps up next to their table and onto the floor, where it disappears.
Difficult.

Grant quickly ran to the far end of the bathroom and into a laboratory with glass walls illuminated by the light of his lamp.
His eyes were shining. He looked around and saw the glass, a bowl full of glasses, glasses.
dish . . . All laboratory work.

The retorts entered the room slowly at first, sniffing the air and looking away
Sliding side tables. The dog wiped the blood from his mouth on the back of his hand. extract.
Pictures passed between the long tables. Animals came through the house.
On a more casual note, you stop occasionally to look at the tables.

They were looking for him.

Grant looked up, walked over to the lab, looked up and saw the metal box.
They are represented with a tail and bones. A sign says WARNING for animals of size A4.
There are several benefits. Grant thought the Regiment had said they were in force.
Poison. Only a few molecules are killed. . . .

Kate was sitting at the lab table. Grant couldn't put his hand in his pocket.
He tried to open it, but there was no door, no crack, no way he could see. . . . Great Ross
Slowly, and you look around the main room. The managers moved between the tables.

He scowled at the captain. A silver bowl is on the table. so
as a closed indoor circuit. He lifted the lid and saw a button.
He threw it.

With a roar, Capone leapt up and  up.

He saw the crystals in front of him and the piles of bottles the size of heads and bones. fluent
Try to administer: CCK-5 5... Tetipa-Alpha Secretion .. . Tymolevin X-1612. ... o
The liquid glowed white in the light of the lamp. Nearby, he saw a basin of water.
The plums are small, each with a little juice. It makes sense.
Blue light, Grant reached out and grabbed the prince. The needles on the syringes are cleaned.
Light. He shrugged. He looked at the small chair.

He rolled his eyes. About their answers.

He has been studying dinosaurs all his life. Now he sees what it really is.
A. Velociraptors were small carnivorous dinosaurs, like oviraptors and dromaeosaurs.
Animals have long thought of stealing hands. Like some new birds eating the eggs of others.
As for birds, Grant always thought velociraptors would eat dinosaur bones if they could.

He leaned against the table closest to her. Slowly, he lifted his hand into the snow.
He brought a large bowl to the table and smoked it. The leaves can be used as football cream.
It is garnished with a small sprig of rose. He took the drink carefully as he inserted the needle.
and remove the tip of the syringe. The egg glows blue.

Grant fell again. He saw the legs of retorts under the table and the black one moving
You hopped off the table. He threw the dragon on the ground to chase the demons away. that


the raptors looked up, heard a faint whirring noise and flew headfirst.
Then slowly they began to search.

The Fen stopped somewhere in the nearby Retort.

damn!

Grant did it all over again: he reached for a drink before opening it, putting it in and blowing his nose.
About their answers. This time, the tail rested on the leg of a Velociraptor. He was shocked.
Press with your toes.

The reporter looked in awe at this new gift. He paused and heard the sound of his voice. fluent
He tapped his chin with his mouth on the ground for a while.

And he did not worry about it.

The Velociraptor was rebuilt and slowly recovering, flying. fluent

It doesn't work.

Grant brought in a third egg and used fresh burritos. He grabbed the steaming drink.
His hands, running k Then he dropped this one as fast as a football. The fire is out.
Going under the roof is a must.

An animal hears his call, sees him coming, and follows him.
Something moved, slithered between the tables, grabbed his tail and walked towards him. setting
He picked it up and hit it in the chest, breaking the rock.

The message fades, a white album falling from his mouth. He opened his mouth loudly, rolling his eyes. is
And he hit the ground, but it didn’t hurt. It was closed.
They eat fish again. Grant looked up to see what was going on. . . .

On the other side of the room, the Gnome looked at him. He looks at her.

The Velliciraptor roared in shock. She smirked at Grant, then paused in the room.
It’s a very straightforward journey. Grant was shocked to see what was happening when he was shocked.
The creature made a shrill sound and the mystery screamed, and its huge body lifted off the ground.
His fist hit the ground with a loud crash. The data still makes noise.
it is accompanied by different sounds at times. Death comes from his mouth. His head fell back.
And go. Tail snapped and snorted.

Same, Grant thought.

However, he was not to die anytime soon. It seemed like he was taking a long time to die. Grant looked away.
stomach- and saw that the other retorts in the room had been burned in half. They listened to the story.
of a dying animal. One raised his head, then another and another. The first animal.
He turned to see the fallen reporter.

The dying retort was now shaking, and the whole world was shaking. He shouted mischievously.
So much saliva came out of his mouth that Grant couldn't see his head. He went
He dropped it to the ground and screamed again.

The second man looked at the fallen creature and looked at it. Worried about that
Death is He looked over the fireplace and at the floor at his grinning mouth.
nerves and feet, .. .

And he took a knife in his hand.

The dying animal screamed and raised its head and snorted and slammed its tail into the ground.
About his fear.

That’s two, Grant thought.

And the beast stood still. Blood came from his nose. He cleared his throat.
his tail, and with the same swing, he tore the fallen animal’s neck. The authorities
His jaws dropped like a lamb’s. The sound of the dying cake filled the room. attack
He shrugged, as if the fight had suddenly become more difficult.

He crossed the room and jumped on the bed! Grant looked at her from
raptor was pulled in, the shiny object slipping from his hand.

That makes two.

The second leg immediately stretched, straightened, and swung forward. This is how it will be
He pushed a table. There were many eggs running all over the place. Grant was looking for them last year.
battle.

There was still a third meal.


Grant has a pair of socks. If the center of gravity is rotating about the ground, it must be
another generation. He was trying to decide what to do when the last beast wagged his tail in anger. extend
He looked up- said the reporter.

The final answer doesn’t last long, just look. And then it was
forward. I’m not looking for that. He walked up and down, looking first at the corners of the tables, then at the heads. fluent
It’s fast, and with its price, it’s not the best shown on the market. An
It's a beast now, he cautioned. He didn't look away from Grant. Grant looked around for a moment.
There was no place for him. I don't do anything to...

Grant’s eyes focused on the raptor as it slowly walked to the side. Grant also moved. He decided to
He kept a few tables between him and the roaming animal. smooth . . . smooth ...
He threw himself into the hand...

His foot is pulling his face into his left thigh. His breath came in a low growl.
Through the pipes.

Grant smashes the drinks at his feet, the redheads tipping the soles of their shoes. fluent
He listened, feeling the radio control in his pocket.

Radio.

He took it out of his pocket and turned it on.

"Hi. It's Grant."

"God?" Eli's voice. "God?"

"Listen," she said. "Just talk."

"Alan, is that you?"

“Speak up,” he says again, pushing the radio to the ground, away from him, and he’s gone.
information in the process.

He moved to the foot of the table and paused.

"Alan, talk to me, please."

Then a sip and a short speech. The radio went silent. The reporter leaned forward and shouted softly.
breath.

The radio went silent.

“What was wrong!” Have ye not yet understood? In the darkness the knight approached her;

"... God?"

The sound on the radio came out of the animal loudly. He gasped for air, as if he could feel it.
There was someone else in the room.

"God, it's me. | I don't know if you can hear me."

Now he leaves Grant and walks over to the radio.

"God... please..."

Why hadn’t he turned the radio away? The retort is closer, but it’s a bit more compact.
The giant stepped closer. Grant could see a spot of light and a flash of light.
Dried blood stains on a paper towel. It makes the body smell good.

"God, please... . God?"

The announcer was shocked to look up at the radio, watching. The scene changes.
of Grant. The bucket landed on Grant’s head. Grant raised his hand and clapped his hands to his chest.
of the skin of the snake, and remove the poison.

The Velostrator roared and flew away. He turned to Grant, his arm.
wide. He leaned back, pressed his nose against the table leg, and lifted his head. The table flipped.
away, and Grant fell backwards, now completely paralyzed. Rotter needs to continue
His head shot up  in the infrared light, shaking like a madman.

"God?"

The man stepped back and raised his leg to kick. Grant was shocked and Sean pulled him away.
Underneath, it was white. He felt a sharp pain in his chest, suddenly on fire.
Blood was running down his shirt. He threw himself on the ground, cleared his throat, washed his hands, gave
forward. The man pulled back, turned off the radio, and looked at the spark plugs. She screamed in pain.
and knocking a third time, Grant reached the wall, going nowhere, and the animal jumped up.
feet one last time.

And then it falls down.

The animal is breathing. The air came out of his mouth.


Gennaro and the children enter the house. Grant tells them to stay. The girl looked at him.
The animal was dying and he said softly, "Wow."
Genaro helped Grant up. Everyone turns and walks towards the court.


ride


Tim was surprised to see that the screen in the control room was bright and shiny. Lex said.
"what happened?"


Tim watches Dr. Grant looks at the TV and reaches for the screen. "|
I don’t know about computers,” Grant said, shaking his head.

But Tim is already walking the line. He quickly touched the screen. In Video
watching, seeing the ship approaching Puntarnas. Now there are only two hundred.
A little farther up the mountain. On the next screen, he saw the building, the retorts were on the ground
ceiling. Over the radio, he heard screaming.

"You did something, Tim," Leake said.

Took the SETGRIDS DNL function,   although it was flattened.

The screen responded:


NOTE: Faulty automatic control (AUX POWER LOW)


"What does that mean?" said Tim.

Genaro shrugged. "It's happened before. That means the weakest link. You."
You have to give it your best shot.

"| Do it?"

He picked up the ELECTRICAL MAIN.


Tim shouted.

"what are you doing now?" Grant said. Every piece is polished.
Tim took the MAIN.

Nothing happened. The screen flashes.

Tim pulled MAIN GRID P. He hit his chest in fear.


The power grid is not working / for auxiliary power only.


The screen is still black. He took MAIN SET 1 .


Turn on the power.


All the light in the room was on. Every piece loses its shine. "Hey! Cool!"
Tim pressed RESET GRIDS. Lay hing went on for a while. He saw the video.
monitors, then go back to the main screen.


Grant said something Tim didn't understand, he just heard the disappointment in his voice. End
He looked at Tim, shocked.

Tim could feel his heart pounding in his chest. Lex yelled at him. He didn't want to see it.
There is no video on TV. They hear music in the room and
the raptors screamed. She heard Malcolm say, “Dear God….”

He took the LODGE.


Specify GRID NUMBER to assign.


For a moment he didn’t remember the numbers, but he
F4, and hold it.


You will now find LODGE GRID F4.


In the video, he saw flames shooting out of the building.
Hotel room. The field glows white. Lex yelled "What did you do!" But almost immediately.
The shadow came back and they saw that the retorts were stuck between the bars, going
And he screams into a blazing fire and Mildred and the others scream, their voices
on the tinny radio.

"That's it," Grant said and patted Tim's shoulder. "That's it! You did it!"

Everyone was standing there gasping when Lex said, "How's the ship?"

"Than?"

"Ship," he said and pointed to the stern.


On the page, the houses near the mountain are very large and go
On the right, as the ship turned left, she prepared to leave. He saw the workers coming out of the side.
The action is approaching.

Tim returned to his room, staring at the ceiling behind him.

He turned to the television. Telecom VBB and Telecom RSD are both based on
Same thing happens with smartphones. Released TELCOM RSD.


There are 23 calls and/or messages.
Do you want to have them now?


He took NO.

"Perhaps the group is an invitation waiting to be made," Leake said. "You're good to go
Phone number!"

He didn't listen.


Enter the desired NUM13ER code or press F7 on the DIRECTORY key.


He pressed F7 and the names and numbers were displayed on the screen, which was
Path. It’s not an alphabet, and it takes some searching to find it.
asks:


WC Ann B. (Freddie) 708-3902


Now, all he had to do was figure out how to track the phone. He pushed some buttons on the floor.
Screen:


Sleep now or after bed?


He pressed DIAL NOW.


We’re sorry that your request didn’t work out as expected.
{ERROR-5981}
Please try again.


He looked at her again.

He heard the sound, and the numbers adjusted themselves.
Competition.

"That?" Grant said.

"Okay, Tim," Lex said. "But they can get there." On screen, they can
First stop of the ship at the port of Puntarenas. They heard a loud bang and then
Ken said, "Uh, hey John, this is Freddie. Have you read me?"

Tim grabs a phone from the car, but all he hears is his phone ringing.

"Uh, hi John, is this Freddie?"

"Shut up," Leak said.

Now they pick up the phones and call all the phones out there, but they just listen to the phones
Wait. Finally, Tim noticed a phone lying on the corner of the console with a bright red light.

"Uh, hi, Col. This is Freddy. Will you help me?"

Tim picked up the receiver. "Hi, this is Tim Murphy, and | I need-."

"Uh, say it again, I don't understand John."

"Don't leave the mountain! Can you hear me?"

There's a pause. Then a voice said, "He looks like a child."

Tim said, "Don't miss the boat! Get back in the boat!"

The sounds were distant and inaudible. Is it Murphy? And another word.
"I wasn't given a name," he said.

Tim looked at the others. Genaro reached for his phone. "Let me do it. Please."
Do you know his name?”

There is bad news on the scene. "-it could be a joke or - it could be a song
Nothing."

Tim was working the keyboard, so he probably knew who it was.
Freddy came. . ..

"Can you hear me?" Genaro said into his phone. "If you don't hear me, answer me now."

“Son,” she replied roughly, “we don’t know who you are, but you’re not good and
We will deliver and we have work to do. Now, please introduce yourself or get out of this
Chanel.”

Tim is looking through his desk at Farrell, Frederick D, (Capt.) Print.

"Do this for a second, Captain Fair," Gennard said. "If you rock this boat
If you return to this island immediately, you'll find that you've unlocked the 509 clothing item.
maritime law, will suspend his licence, the penalty being a fine of fifteen thousand.
$50 and up to five years in prison. Have you heard?

There was silence.

"Do you think so, Captain Fair?"


And then, far off in the distance, they heard a voice say, "I will," and another voice say, "Everything is ahead."
The boat began to move along the shore.

Lexus started crying. Tim sank back into the chair, wiping his tears from his face.

Grant said, "What's a law of the sea?" "who

Do you know what it means? Jannard said.

Everyone watched the TV with excitement. The ship was sailing far
coast.

"|You think the worst is over," Gennard said. Grant shook his head. "That's right," he said.
He said he was just getting started.


Seventh time


“Moving forward, the math will require courage.”
Look at the consequences.”


Hi Malcolm
It’s destroying the world


They took Malcolm to another room in the bedroom and to a clean bed. Hammond thus repeats it;
and he began to touch it, and he was satisfied, "Well," he said, "at least, accident avoided."

What does this mean? Malcolm said excitedly.

"Well," Hammond said, "he doesn't give up and hits the ground."

Malcolm sat in a corner. Are you worried about that?

"That's really what it's all about," Hammond said. "These animals don't have teeth that can
Go and destroy all the peoples of the earth.

"You bastard," Malcolm said angrily. "Do you have any idea what I'm talking about?"
on? Do you think you can destroy the world? "My, how strong you must be."
Malcolm jumped onto the bed. "Don't touch the ground. Don't come near."

"A lot of people believe," Hammond says wryly, "that the world is in peril."

"No, it's not," Malcolm said.

"Experts all agree that our planet is in trouble."


Malcolm sighed. “Let me tell you about our planet,” he said. “We have four and a half planets.
A billion years. Life on this earth is long gone. Three billion eight.
birthday. The first disease. And then, the first animals had a lot of land, and the first ice
Building, at sea, on land. Then there are some species of animals - amphibians, and
Dinosaurs, mammals, each lived millions and millions of years. Great Government.
Trends rise, grow and die;
And massive earthquakes, towering mountains rising and falling, comet strikes, volcanoes
Volcanoes, seas rise and fall, the whole earth is moving. . . Endless, endless and violent
change . . . Even today, the vast majority of geothermal energy in the world comes in two forms
Soils have been eroding and depositing in the Himalayas for millions of years. that
The earth was completely flat in time. We will surely miss it.

Hammond rubbed his eyes. "Just because it's been a long time," she said, "doesn't mean
permanent. If something bad happened to their ancestors. . ."

"Let's assume that's true," Malcolm said. “Let’s say there was a bad storm with all the trees and
Animals died and the earth warmed for hundreds of thousands of years. A life of ten
Somewhere - underground or preferably in an archway. And after all these years, when
The world is not safe and life is once again on the rise. Progress
Work would resume. It may take a few billion years for life to return to normal.
And it brings the current system. But the earth was strengthened by war.
Life was alive in our pain. It’s just us,” Malcolm said, “I don’t think so.”

"Well, if the ozone layer is depleting," Hammond said.

"There's a lot of UV radiation reaching the ground. What about it?"

"No. It can cause skin cancer."

Malcolm shook his head. "Veterans are good for life. They're so strong. They're so strong
Change. “A form of life can increase with increasing radiation.”

“And a lot of people die,” Hammond said.

Malcolm sighed. Do you think this is the first time something like this has happened? Don't you know
By the wind?

"| Know that life is necessary."

"It's now," Malcolm said. "And oxygen is a poison to proteins. The gas looks very
fluoride, which is used to make glass. The first step in making oxygen is to make fertilizer.
The evolution of the plant cell—said to be about three billion years old—has had a devastating effect on all other life forms on our planet
spirit. These plant cells have environmental contamination and dangerous poisoning. They
He pulls out a killer gas and gasps for breath. There are few planets as big as a carnival.
percentage of oxygen. On land, oxygen levels increase dramatically—five, ten, finally.
Twenty-one percent! The air on the ground was filled with pure poison! And life isn’t perfect! "

Hammond was furious. "So, what do you mean? Today's garbage will be
also?"

"No," Malcolm said. “My point is, life on Earth can take care of itself.
Folks, a hundred years is a long time. A hundred years ago, we didn’t have cars and
Airplanes, computers, vaccines. . . . It’s a different world. But for Earth, a
A hundred years is not enough. A million years is not enough. This land lives and breathes deeply.
A very large number. Not to mention her music is short and powerful, we weren’t shy.
be. We’ve been here only a handful. If we left tomorrow, the Earth would
Do not forget us.”

And we should go,” Hammond said as he took a deep breath.

"Yeah," Malcolm said. "We can be."

"So what do you think? Shouldn't we protect the place?"

"No, of course not."

"So what?"

Malcolm sighed and looked away. "Let's be honest. The world is not in danger."
We are all in danger. We can't destroy the world and we couldn't save ourselves. But we can
We have the power to save ourselves.


under his rule.


It had been four hours. The month of the sun; The sun is setting. The air conditioning came back on.
In the courtroom, the computer works fine. Have they come close?
Of the 24 people on the island, eight have died and six are missing. visitor
Both the center and the safari hut are in bad shape, and the southern end is perfect
Dinosaurs. They called the police in San Jose, for help. The Costa Rican National Guard
On the way, and an air ambulance takes Malik to the hospital. But on the phone,
The Costa Rican guards were on guard – no doubt the calls came and went
between San Jose and Washington before aid could be sent inland. And now
It’s been building for a long time—if the helicopters don’t arrive, they’ll have to wait until they do
morning.

At that point, there was nothing to go through. The ship was returning; The team has
They spotted three small repeaters floating towards the stern and shot down
Animals. On Isla Nublar, the situation was even worse, and everyone was on both sides.
Visitor center or hotel. Tim did it on the computer and it lit up.
New blade.





All Animals 292
Masters are found waiting.

Thyroid 2 1
41

Mysore 22 20
2?

Stegosaurus 4 1
3.9.

Trisherrop 8 6
3.1.

Prochomycoagulants 65 , 64
2

Othniel 23 15
3.1.

Velociraptor 37 27
2?

Page 17 12
3.1.

Hadrosaurus 11 5
3.1.

dilophosores 7 4
43

Petersor, 6 5
43

Hypsilophodent 34 14
2?

Euplosplid 16 9
4.0

Styrosaurus 18 7
3.9.

Calvosaurus 22 13
41
292.203


What am I doing now? said January. "Now you're saying that animals are rare?"
Grant shook his head. "bridge."
Ellie said, “Jurassic Park is going to be great.”


What does it mean?

"Balance." Grant pointed to the monitors. In one of them, the hypsolophodonts are swimming.
Windmills like the Velociprit have entered the arena from the west.

"The walls were gone for hours," Grant said. "Animals are mating
other. The regions reached a peak in the true Jurassic period.

"|I don't think it was supposed to happen," Genard said. "Animals shouldn't have
mess."

"No, no."

In the next episode, Grant watches a band playing in a field
of about four tons for Hadrosaurus. Hadrosaurus was afraid to go o q and a reptile attacked it
At the bottom, he kicks his ass, the other runs forward, kicking and grabbing his leg.
They sighed and wiped his fingers with their saliva. Within minutes, it was six for six.
Feed large animals.

Grant looked at his wife.

Can you imagine that? Ellie said.

"|I don't know what to think," he said. He looked at the TV. "No, not really."

Muldoon said softly, "You know, it looks like all the adults are out now."

Grant didn’t give much thought to the first. He just looks at the people watching, their creations.
Big dog. To the west, a stygosaurus wags its tail, flicking its
The tyrannosaur, who was watching him, was shocked, and occasionally tapped him on the back
page. The Southern Forty fought each other.
Opens and closes the ports. A frightened animal.

"We've got an hour left, Dr. Grant," Muldoon said. "If you want to try and
Put your finger on it.

"Okay," Grant said. "Am."

"|You're sure," said Mildred, "if the Costa Ricans come, you'll
This island should be troublesome for warriors. Something disappears quickly.

"Okay," Gennard said.

"They're shooting in the air," Muldoon said. “Maybe napalm, maybe nerve gas, too.But.
It came from the air.

"|They should," Jannard said. "This training is very important. All animals have to be in this training
Well, and so far better.

"It's not good," Grant said. He rose to his feet. "Let's start."

"|I don't know if you understand, God," Janrod said. "I think the lesson is, too
bad. It must be destroyed. All animals on this planet must be extinct, that is
The Costa Rican Guard is doing just that. | We think we should leave it to them to make up their own minds. do you
Don't you understand what I'm saying?

"Okay," Grant said again.

"Then what are you worried about?" said January. "It's military duty. Leave it alone."

Grant’s throat swelled, where the reporter was shocked. "No," she said. “We need to be careful
fluent."

"Leave it to the experts," Gennaro said.

Grant recalled seeing Gennaro drunk and scared for about six hours in the 1990s.
Home maintenance truck cab. Suddenly he became angry and hit her.
The lawyer gets up and looks out the window. “Listen, lady, you have a reason for this.
objects and start doing it.

"|am," Genora gasped.

"No, no. You lost your right from the beginning."

"Hell-"

"He sold out to investors in a company you don't like. You own a
Work was not done. You're not going to interview someone you know.
You know it’s a lie and you’re letting this guy get away with something he shouldn’t
Technology in human affairs. I think you should quit your job.

Genaro was rewarded again. "Well, now I'll explain."


"No," Grant said. "You're leaving too. You can't do it anymore." made
Genaro who snorted. Grant was angry with Muldoon. "What do we have?"
Weapons?

Muldoon said, “We’re getting some draws and it’s not good.”

"How cute are these shirts?" Grant said.

"They're like crazy sharks. They've got busted conductors, they're swimming
hold. More weight, less power. We cannot know, but it can be dangerous.”

"It's not good," Grant said. "Not in the box."

"What's good?" Genaro said as he sniffed. "The raptor's tail,"

Ellie said.

"What does Rapport taste like?"

Grant says, "Did you find a bad radio?" "Am

yes,” said Mildred.

"Give me one. And is there anything else you can do?"

Mildred shook her head.

"Well, you can have whatever you want."

Muldoon left. Grant was angry with Gennard. "Your theory is a mess, Mr. Gennard. Your
Seeing is a problem. It needs to be cleaned. But you shouldn’t do that until you know.
mess. And that leads to setting traps on the mountain. And then the retort parts. I-I don’t
negative. We need to find them, meet them, and see their strengths. We need to calculate
All the animals were born on that land. Then we can burn it. But first we have some work to do.”


Ellie looks at the map on the wall showing the animals current locations. Tim is working.
Keyboard. He read the paper. "The peak is on the west side, where the
land of the mountains. They may like fire.

Is there a place under the house to hide?

“There it is,” he said. "There's a lot of water that can be used to prevent flooding."
Western beaches. Lots of land. Water and honey.

Grant shook his head. "So that's where they'll be."

Ellie said, "I think there's a beach." He looked at the consoles and
He said, "Tim, you're going to show us the source." Tim doesn't listen. "Timmy?"

It hides in the mountains. "Just a minute," she said. "|There's something."

"What is that?"

"It's an empty warehouse. I don't know what's in there."

"So he might as well have a gun," Grant said.


They were all inside the school, closing a door and lifting it.
sunlight, showing the peaks descending on the city. "Damn Arnold," Mildred said as
He walked up the stairs. "He should know he's always here."

"Probably not," Grant said. "He didn't try to get here."

"Well, Hammond knows. Someone knows."

Where is Hammond now?

"I'm still in the living room."

They reached the top of the building and approached the electric gas columns supporting the roof.
in plastic bags. They shine their torches into the room and see a lot of mess.
glass cubes, two feet high, with metal lids. Grant could see small dark shadows in the cubes. fluent
It’s like walking into a room full of giant peppers,” he said.

Muldoon opened the trunk of one, reached in, and pulled out a balloon. 4 He changed it into light.
his eyes widened. "I'm getting hurt."

"What is that?" Grant said.

"Mr.-12," Muldoon said. "It's nerve gas. It's gradations."
Grenades."

"Let's go," Grant said calmly.


"I like it," Leica said, laughing. They park in neighbors’ garages next to the Fit
raptor that Grant shot in the head. You pull the raptor into the side of the sandwich.
The animal waves its hand.

"I'll be safe here," Muldoon said. "They might have made a real mistake."

"I liked it," Leake said. "His name is Clarence."

"Clarence?"

"Yeah," Leake said.

Muldoon clutches his left shoulder with a small piece of metal sticking out. Grant knows
A distant ringing in his ears. Is there anything wrong with petting an animal?

Lex was still in control of the Raptor and reached the building. "I thought you'd let me take over," she said
said.

"|I'm not looking," Mildred said. "They didn't do well." "AM

He will give me time,' she said.

So Muldoon handed the necklace to Lex and held it out to strangle him. Then
She said slowly in Bengali. The news froze when Leica touched it.
And he wrapped it around his waist. Then he comforted the animal and changed again.

"I'm cursing," Mildred said. "Is

chameleon,” Lake said.

"The other answers didn't work," Mildred said, sighing. "This animal
different. Anyway, she asked Grant, “If they’re all born female, how do they survive?”
You didn’t explain that in Bor’s DNA.”

"It's not Born's DNA," Grant said. "It's amphibian DNA. But strange things happen."
In fact, it has been documented in the literature on toads. Also West African tortoises, with | delighted."

"What is this seed?"

"Gender change," Grant said. "Yes, it's just a female change." Grant explained that a
A number of plants and animals are known to change sex during life.
Orchids, some fish and crustaceans, and now ports. Frogs build their arms to lay their eggs
He can change within a few months into a full-fledged person. First they took the fight.
The male reproductive system regulates male fertility, releases hormones and
Their male hormones increase and eventually they are able to reproduce.

"It sounds funny," Gennard said. "And what do you do?"

The changes are caused by the environment in which each animal lives.
Men and women. Meanwhile, some aquariums are starting to change the
A man for a woman.

"And do you think that happened to dinosaurs?"

“That’s going to make a good decision, right,” Grant said. "I think that happened. Now,
Do we get this one?


Once they were inside the Jeep, Lex pulled the Raptor out of the cage. The dog is happy.
He almost joins their group. He gave her one last kiss on the head and released her.

Animals don’t move around.

"Go, Shi!" Lex said. Go home!

The man panicked and ran through the bushes.


Grant grabbed the trigger and pulled the trigger. Mildred is driving. The car is moving.
Main Street, going south. Genaro got mad at Grant and said, “What’s with that butt?

"Nobody knows," Grant said.

"But | I thought you'd bury him."

"I'm getting a tattoo of a dinosaur," Grant said. "But all waters have been changed by gravity
A thousand years. We’ve made assumptions, hypotheses, but nothing is known.
The tails are like that.

Grant hears the noises and tells Muldoon to go to the sunset. It seems like too much and
According to Ellie: The north end is at the top of the southern mountain range.

Grant shook his head. "A lot of people don't know what disability means," he said. He found himself stunned.
It refers to modern animals such as crocodiles and rabbits. Even their quality of life
It was not clear. In fact, the American catfish has been studied more extensively and


Unlike crocodiles, only the female is expected to care for the infant, that is, until it is born. male
The alligator spends much of the early summer sleeping next to the females in pairs, gasping for air
on his skills and add other examples of masculinity that are designed to make him feel uncomfortable.
reception, which led to him shaking his head and threatening her, while lying next to her, gave
male. When she died two months later, the man was gone. and
Although females maintain three-foot-long tails, the
It shows that he didn’t plan well in time and left his neck in time.
The baby birds began to chirp and leave the nest. So, a baby crocodile in the wild
He started life alone, so his belly is full of shit.
Nutrition in the early days.

"How come older elves don't take care of young ones?"

"Not what you think," Grant said. “Both parents abandoned their children.
There is a kind of group protection. The young Alicorns have a roar;
He will attack anyone who hears him - human or not - and attack them with the most powerful attack of all time.
It’s not a sign of fear. every attack.

"Envelope." Gennaro was silent.

Grant added, "But that's a dragon in every sense of the word." "Example,
The biggest challenge faced by the algorithm is to freeze the eggs. Deer are always in the shade. An
A temperature of ninety-eight degrees Fahrenheit would kill a cuckoo’s egg, so the mother goes
It protects the feathers from the cold.

"But dinosaurs aren't toys for us," Muldoon said thoughtfully.

"Good. Dinosaur bones can fuse."
Meaning of the animal-"

"So you're really saying you don't know," Janari said angrily. "You don't know what
What does that smell like?

"No," Grant said. "I don't."

"No," Gennaro said. "Most of them are experienced."

Grant didn't know. You can already smell the sulfur. and a string called
Tacre body.


Hot earth, Genaro thought, as he walked forward. It was really on fire. and here and
The dirt hit the ground. And the sweet, sulfurous smell screams.
Good plum to go. It was like walking through hell.

He saw Grant moving with his head down, listening for the sound. Give it to
Children's shoes with colorful prints and Hawaiian shirts, looks beautiful. Genaro didn't remember.
Correct. He fears he went to this place by accident in the heat, and the Velocitrators are somewhere
around. He didn't know how Grant could be mad at him.

Or a woman. Satler. He too was playing, just watching her in a good mood.

Weren’t you afraid? said January. "| meaning, are you hurt?"

"We should do it," Grant said. He didn't say anything else.

They all weathered the storm. Genaro grabbed the gas cans.
He had put it in his mind. He scowled at Ellie. Why doesn’t he think about it?

"Okay," she said. "But think about that for the rest of his life."

Genaro shook his head and thought about what to do. If anything he
He has been all his life. He thought it was no problem.


Grant blinked in the sunlight. In front of us, among the cliffs, an animal peers and stares.
they. Then he ran away.

"Is it a raptor?" Ellie said.

"| Think about that. Or. Kids, anyway."

And he said unto him, Wilt thou bring us away?

"bridge." Ellie had told him how the retorts played against the wall to remind him of when
Another went upstairs. If true, this behavior shows good intelligence.
Almost all kinds of life exist on earth. In the past, the ability to develop and implement strategies was thought to be
It has been identified in only three species: chimpanzees, monkeys, and humans. Now there was that.
It’s possible that dinosaurs could do something different.


The figure reappeared, jumped into the light, and then retreated, screaming. Of course he did.
As he sends them.

Genaro frowned. "How smart are they?" she said.

"If you think of them as birds," says Grant, "then you need to worry. New studies show
A gray squirrel is as smart as champagne. And chimpanzees can
Use language in a positive way. Currently, researchers are searching for this heart.
A three-year-old is growing, but their intelligence is not fully developed. Sleeping people can
Symbolic theory, yes.

"But I never killed anyone in a suit," Genora said.


In the distance, they could hear the roar of water in the valley floor. Tank bodies .
Behind them for a moment, and looking up at a stone wall. The little girl went up on a rock.
And then it was gone.

"Where did he go?" Ellie said.

Grant listens on headphones. The voice paused. "End."

As they walked along, they found a small hole in the middle of the rock, like a bird’s nest. I was
It can be on two legs. As they watched, the little retort moved and blinked in front of
light. Then he ran away.

“Not good,” Genaro said. "I'm not going anywhere."

Grant said nothing. He began to drink with E ́li. Soon, there was a little video of it.
A camera is connected to a handheld camera. He slid the camera off its shelf, turned it on and off.
Urban.

“You don’t see anything like that,” Gennard said.

“Give him time to adjust,” Grant said. There was enough light in the sky for them to see
The walls were bare, and suddenly, suddenly, the tunnel opened. In the cloud, the
He heard a voice. After that, a trumpet sounded. More voices for more people
Animals.

"Like a scent, right," Ellis said.

"But you can't see anything," Gennard said. He rubbed the bandage on his wrist.

"No," Grant said. "But | it works." He listened to the time tick for a while and took out the camera
He threw it to the ground. "Let's start." He leaned against the tree. Ellie went to
The darkness and the silence. Grant wears a face gas mask and falls
Instead, he throws his foot back.

"You can't get worse than that," Jannard said.

Grant shook his head. "I'm not happy about that. I'm going first, then Ellie, then you come last."

"Now, wait a minute," Zener said, sarcastically. "Why don't we throw the bones
Where do the grenades fall, and do you hit them first? Isn't that mean?

"Ellie, do you have the flashlight?"

He handed the gun to Grant.

"How is that?" said January. "What do you say?"

"I don't want anything better," Grant said. He followed her into the cave. "You've never seen anything
Did you die of gas poisoning?

"I don't..."

"Sometimes it comes with bruises. Those are bad."

"No, I'm sure you don't like it, but-"

"Look," Grant said. "We're going into this cave to look for missing animals. If
Kill the animals first, and some will fall on the animals in their mouths, we will.
It’s about seeing what’s there. So we shouldn’t do it,

"but-"

"You're made of animals, Mr. Gennard."

"|No."

"Your money did it. Your work did it. You helped build it. Your accounts. And you
You cannot kill them just because you are retired now.”

“I’m a little nervous,” Gennaro said. "I'm scared c-."

"Follow me," Grant said. Ellie gave him a shrug. He spent more than
holes, and leaves. "It's good."


Grant exhaled and clapped his hands to his face, causing a scream.
And he walks.
The owl’s mouth is missing and black.


"What happened?" Gennaro said, shocked.

Ellie blinked and stared at the hole, listening for the bell. He threw
The radio, he said simply, "Alan?"

There’s a big difference. Then they heard the words: “Here I am.”

"Is everything alright, God?"

Another great feature. When Grant spoke, his voice sang
He was disappointed.

"Everything is fine," he said.


Standard approx.


In town, John Hammond hangs out at Malcolm’s house. Hammond was unfazed.
And it’s not good. Ever since he donned the belt last summer, Malcolm has taken it in stride.
coma, and now it looks to Hammond that he might actually die. Yes the helicopter
He was called, but only God knows when he will come. you think Malcolm might die.
At that moment, anxiety and fear filled Hammadi.

And, of course, Hammaud made all the mistakes because he didn’t like the president.
plenty. It’s worse than if the person is your friend. Hammond thinks Malcolm’s death
If it does, that will be the last help.

Anyway, the smell in the room is lovely. It’s unfortunate. Human foot
flesh.

"The whole ...parade.. ." Malcolm said and rolled onto his back. "is

awake?" Hammond said. Harold shook his head.

What did he say? Something about Paradise? "AM

He didn’t catch it,” Harold said.

Hammond is always making a trip. He rolled down the window to let in some fresh air.
Finally, unable to take it anymore, he said, “Do you mind going downstairs?”

"|Don't worry, no," Harding said. "I think this place is beautiful."

"Well, look, I'm just going outside."

"Okay," Harold said. It controls the absorption of antibiotics into the bloodstream.

"I'll be right back."

"good."

Hammond steps out into the sunlight, wondering why he’s so nervous.
to Harold. After all, this guy was his employee. Hammond doesn’t talk about himself.

He walked through the gates and looked around the park. It was almost midnight.
When the snow cleared the air, and the sun came out again. It’s late today, and
Hammond found it a challenge. From what they were saying, he knew they had secrets for his park. and
Even if that idiot Gennaro burned it to the ground, it wouldn't work.
contrast.

Hammond knows that on both sides of the stairs, there are many others in Palo Alto.
Babies are dry. It’s not a bad idea to hire them again, on another island, somewhere else next year.
All over the world. And if there are problems here, next time they will be addressed
battle. That’s how the study was done. To end wickedness.

Thinking about it, he realized that Wu was not the man for the job. Who ten
He was obviously very proud of his hard work. And Wu was very shocked.
with the development plan. Instead of building dinosaurs, he wanted to be perfect.
on them. Hammond thought that was Parker’s fault.

Me.

Also, it should be noted that John Arnold is not eligible for the Senior Engineer position. Arnold
It was beautiful, but in the end it was boring and annoying. fluent
He doesn’t like it and he doesn’t like it. Those are important things.


In reality, neither Wu nor Arnold had a successful career, Hammond said.
The differences. It’s a good job creating something.
park where kids climb the walls and enjoy the view and come
They are alive in their storybooks. The true light. Looking to the future. storage type.
Tools to make the decision follow.

No, Wu and Arnold didn’t do the job.

And in this case, Eddie Regis is a bad guy. Harding did not respond.
choice. Mildred drinks… .

Hammond shook his head. It will be better next time.

He sighed, went to his room and followed the small road leading east.
From the boarding house. He walked over to an employee who shook his head. Hammond is not
Put your head down. He saw how bad the Tikan crew was. To be honest, it is.
This island near Costa Rica is incredible. I don’t do that shit.
further-

When he arrived, the dinosaur noises were terrifying. Hammond was stunned for a moment.
He stumbled into the street, and when he looked back,
He walked through the trees near the flagpole, moving away from it.

What is the T-Rex doing here? Why was he inside the walls?

Hammond felt a little angry: then he saw a mill worker, running to save him, and
Hammond took advantage of the opportunity to escape and ran to the blind man on the other side of the woods
On the road. He was in the dark - he fell to the ground, his face wet with sweat.
But the ground, a little at his feet, runs before him, falls again, then runs again.
more. Now he was coming down a steep hill, and she couldn't focus on him. He fell.
He couldn't stand it and rolled on the ground barefoot before he went to sleep.
group. He was thrown face down into the deep, warm, surrounding water and ran over it.
nose.

He lies dead in a bed with his eyes closed.

He was afraid! This is great! He has to go to your birthday party! Hammond said wryly.
to himself. When she woke up, she felt a sharp pain in her right arm and tears welled up in her eyes.
He agreed, though: it would break. He decided to put all his control on
finish. Yes.

He didn't leave.


In the courtroom, Lex says to Tim, "I want them to join us in the hospital."

"We're so excited, Lex," Tim said. "We need to be here. Hey, listen to this." fluent
Press another button, and a tyrannosaurus sound echoes through the musicians
park.

"That's good," Lex said. "It's better than that."

"You can do it too," Tim said. "And when you pull that off, it gives you a sense of magic."

"Let me go," Lex said. He pressed the button. The Tyrannosaurus roared again. "We can do it
How long will it last?”

"Okay," Tim said. "We're just changing the thing here."


Lying at the bottom of the mountain, Hammond heard Tyransaurus growling and growling.
issue.

Jesus.

He flinched, when he heard the voice. He was afraid to shout in the other world. He waited.
To see what happens. What does a Tyrannosaurus do? Has he found that worker?
Hammond waited patiently, listening only to the buzzing of the wild cicadas, until he knew he was getting
Breathe in, take a deep breath.

Because of his injured leg, he cannot climb the mountain. He had to wait inside.
A back. When Tyrannosaurus arrives, he asks for help. This time, he wasn’t surprised
here.

Then he heard a voice say, “Come on, Tim. | You see it too. Come. Let me
Make the sound.

Child!


The Tyrannosaurus roared again, but this time there was a stronger threat and a
echo, which means the end.

''Good luck,'' the little girl said. "Do it again."

These are children!

He cannot take small children. It’s just a problem for them
beginning. Nobody wants them around - Hammaud only took them because he thought
He tries to stop Genaro from destroying the resort, but Genaro does. and
Obviously the kids broke into the control room and started causing trouble now that they allowed
that?

He felt his heart race and his breathing sharp. He forced himself to laugh.
relax. There was nothing. Although he could not climb the mountain, he could not pass .
Hundreds of acres of meadows and pastures. Hammond sat in the tub.
On the ground, he hears noises in the surrounding woods, and, after a while, he begins to cry.
To help.


Malcolm's voice was louder than a whisper. "Everything is different ... on the other side,"
she said.

Harding stepped closer. "How much further?" You think Malcolm is talking.
dying.

"It ... changed," Malcolm said.

"Butterflies?"

Malcolm didn't answer. His left lip is twitching. "Paradise," he said at last.

"Are their paradigms changing?" Harold said. He knew that systems were changing. In recent years,
New ways of communicating educational change. The “paradigm” is another
Language refers to a symbol, but people say, language refers to something, a worldview. mom
view of the world. It is said that a paradigm shift occurs whenever science makes a major breakthrough
It changes the world. These changes are rare and happen only once.
century, Darwinian evolution led to a paradigm shift. quantum mechanics screwed up
Little change.

"No," Malcolm said. "Not . . . dimension."

“Don’t worry about…what….

Harding sighed. Despite all of this, Malcolm quickly became increasingly uncomfortable. your
It’s too high, and they run out of antibiotics.

What don’t you think?

"Everything," Malik said. "Because ... there's everything ... on the other side."

And he laughed.


perfect


"You're injured," Genaro told Ellie Sattler, looking at the bruise on her shoulder.
hole, waving his hands in front of him. "You didn't mean to do that!"

He laughed. "All right," he said. He waved his hand and
Stand on the sides of the hole. And he walks in it.

The hole is black.

Gennaro began to cough. He yelled at Muldoon, who was standing next to the Jeep. "I won't
This, he said.

"You're right."

"|That can't be. | It's not fair."

"Waiting for you," Mildred said. "You have to do it."

“Jesus knows what’s going on underneath,” Gennaro said. "I'll tell you, I can't."

"You have to do it."

Gennaro sighed, looked at the hole, and looked down. "It's not right. I can't do it."

"|Don't," Mud said. He used waterproof steel. Have you heard a word?

"I don't do much," Mildred said. "It's okay to die. He'll get over you, alright
Your body feels better. But it usually has no side effects. Just not about religion. but,
So the population is very small.


Genaro looked at the box. "Forbidden."

"| in my opinion you'd better go and take care of these animals," said Mud. "And you shouldn't go away."

Genaro returned to the cave, a door in the ground. Then, a
Mildred, standing behind him, was large and immobile.

Gennaro sighed and started walking towards the hole. It’s far
It’s a small distance, but as you get closer, it gets bigger.

"That's it," Mildred said.

Genaro climbed back into the hole, but it was too dangerous to walk.
Journey - The idea of ​​going into the unknown was too much for him - so at the last minute he went
And he walked, and went up into the hole, and stretched forth his hands, and thrust his feet out.
Because he needed to see where he was going. You blew gas on his face.

He quickly jumped forward, walking into the darkness, avoiding the walls.
He stepped into the darkness behind him, the walls creaking and creaking.
He complained about the pain from vomiting which was slowly getting worse.
He sucked air into his lungs and he could already feel the water changing
A little back, slowly, adjusting his body, while breathing heavily, checking the dots first.
The face, and the pain is great.

Then suddenly the tunnel was quiet again, it shook, and Genaro felt
Bad soil, roads, and air. Surprised by the freedom, he gasped and turned around.
concrete.

And he broke it.


The tones are dark. His hands clenched, reaching forward to make the sound. that
The air was as thick as a mountain.

"-ok?"

"Pretty good, yeah." "Is

My breath. .. ."

"Correct."

Her hand caressed his face. And Ellie. Can you hear it? He sniffed.

Why is everyone screaming? she said. "Because." He appeared.

Genaro turned, blushed, and slowly stood up. He looked up  as he looked up.
The darkness. But the first thing he sees glowing in the dark are his eyes. red light
eye.

Many fruits. All around him.


He was in a corridor, a narrow door seven feet off the ground. huge
The steel boxes served as hiding places and protected them from prying eyes.
the velociraptors stood before them, not five feet away. The animals are black.
Yellow with black leopard stripes. They stood on their heads. they
They finished, looking at him with dark eyes. children feet adults
the velociraptor roared and snarled. Far in the background, in the darkness, children were running around and playing.
Giving less and less food.

Genaro wasn't surprised and nodded.

Two raptors!

Only a foot or two above the animal's head. reps
They were trembling, trembling with fear and anguish. Sometimes they were hurt.
My patience. Then they went, and returned with a great multitude.

Narrowing his eyes, Janrod could see now that they were onto something bigger.
Underground structures, however, are man-made, having some unique features;
Steel bars protrusions. And inside this great temple were many animals: xenora
Imagine thirteen raptors. There can be many.

"The club is," Grant said, grinning. "Four or six adults. The rest were babies and toddlers. inside."
Only two. One last year and one this year. These babies are about four months old.
Maybe in April.


One of their favorite children walked to the other side of the platform and joined them, shouting. fluent
He was ten feet away now.

"Oh Jesus," Genaro said. But suddenly an old man came to him and raised his head.
And hold the baby back. The boy was startled, and jumped up.
Adult in the ass. The old man walked slowly, leaving the boy to hold his head
The voice, the breathing. In this scene, the young man panicked and shouted at the three men.
country.

The adults don't look at them.

"|He doesn't understand," Gennard said. Why don’t they go for it?

Grant shook his head. "They don't have to look at us. And neither side now... .
It gives them heart.

"Are you okay?" said January. How long are we going to be here?

"His spirit is measurable," Grant said.


As Grant sees it, there are three classes, three teachers. Description of the country
It was in the middle near their hands, although it looked like the babies were crawling on each other and playing
Many countries. Adults are good to children and kind to children.
Sometimes, older dogs are too weak to walk around.

Just then a raven comes up to E ́li and falls on his head. fluent
He looked down and saw the leather box next to the black one. It exploded somewhere. And that’s
He rubbed the skin of the animal's neck.

the young man shouted.

On the roof of the mansion, one of the elders complains about the noise.

"Do you think | you can pull it off?" he asked.

"Just hurry up."

"Okay," he said, kneeling down next to the puppy. he shouted again.

The adults shook their heads.

Eli took the boy in his arms to calm him down so that he would not cry out. He pulled away.
Hands moved along the leather thighs, lifting and shaking them with a grunt. The adults shook their heads.
Their heads.

Then one of them started walking towards him.

"Oh man," Genaro said under his breath.

"You can't go," Grant said. "Shut up."

The old man walked towards them, his knees clicking on the concrete. The animal was protected.
instead of Ellie, who was left with a baby clothed on the floor of the bathroom. He was young.
He appeared, and Elliot's hand was still on his head. The giant raised his head and sniffed the air.
The head of the giant was close to his hand, but he was too busy to see it.
box. One mouth was removed and examined.

Grant picked up a gas grenade, took it out of his waistband, and fired at the barrel. January
He held out a hand and shook his head, looking at Ellie.

She doesn't wear pants.

Grant put the grenade down and lunged at Prady. Eli was old.

Ellie rubbed the leather strap. The metal slammed into the concrete. old man’s head
He flinched a little, then leaned to the side, curious. Walking back to
Find out, when the little mermaid screamed for joy and ran off. The old man stayed
by Ellie. Then turn around and walk back to the center of the square.

Genaro took a deep breath. "Jesus. Can we go?"

"No," Grant said. "But | I think we can do some work now."


In the dim light of the night fire, Grant looked around.
At the entrance, look at the first chest. dirt and grass.
It’s a basket shape. He counted forty fingers. Of course, it didn’t work
The marriages themselves are distant and somehow broken and broken
But he counted the number of the fields in the dirt. Thus, sellers have
They build nests before they lay eggs, and their eggs leave a permanent mark in the soil. fluent
It is also a sign that one has been damaged. He counted thirty animals.


The second leg was broken in half. But Grant thought he had nine drinks. that
The third branch has fifteen rows;

"What does it all mean?" said January.

"Thirty-four people died," Grant said. "And how

Do you see anyone else?”

Grant shook his head. Animals were running all over the bottom of the cave, barking
In and out of light.

"I'm looking," Ellie said, shining her flashlight at the book. "You can go
Pictures to be sure, but not all baby teeth are the same. My question is thirty-three.

What about the children?

“Twenty-two. But God - have you seen anything wrong with them?”

"Like what?" Grant said.

"How do they behave over time? Do they fall into a pattern or
Homework."

Grant sighed. "It's so dark," he said.

"No, look. Find it. Look at the children. When they're playing games, they fall and run
All the way. But instead, when the kids wake up, watch how they react.
Their bodies. They look at this wall and the wall opposite. That’s how they’re going to do it.

"| I don't know, Ellis. Do you think there's an island? Like honey?"

"No, not really," she said. "Well, better. Just a theory."

"And the children do?"

"No. Everybody does it. Adults do it. Look at them. I'm telling you they're going to do it."

Grant sighed. It was like he was moving fast. Animals do all kinds of behaviors but
During breaks, the times they watch and relax, do their
In a very important way, it’s like there’s no limit to the world.

"It threw me," Grant said. "The air is nice..."

"| I don't know, God."

What do they do? A type of social relationship called a physical relationship?

"That doesn't make sense," he said. "Because everyone does."

Genaro turned on his watch. "I know this thing will come in handy one day." below:
The face of a watch is a compass;

Grant said, "How many votes do you have in the court?"

"I don't." Genaro shook his head. "My wife gave it to me," he explained, "for my birthday." fluent
He looked at the compass. "Well," he said, "they don't mind going anywhere... | guess
They were in the northeast - northwest, something like that."

"They might be hearing something," Ellie said, "They're trying not to hear anything . . ."

Grant sighed.

“Or maybe it’s just a ritual,” he said, “where animals are used to
They were together. But maybe it doesn't matter much." Ellie sighed. "Or maybe
They’re good. Dinosaurs could be a problem. Or maybe it’s a form of communication.

Grant thinks the same. Bees were able to communicate with their environment with
dance. You can do the same with dinosaurs.

Gennaro looked at them and said, "Why don't you leave the house?"

"Those are the problems,"

"Yeah, but they're hiding."

Grant raised his hand. At this point the children started shouting and jumping for joy. that
The adults watched with interest for a while. And, with his voice and his voice speaking in the darkness
In the corner, all the dinosaurs rode on wheels and went around, crashing into the sides of the cave and into the
After dark.


Hammond


John Hammond sat on the ground at the foot of the hill and tried to catch his breath.
For God's sake, it burned, he recalled. Fire and fire. It’s breathing.


Sponge.


He looked down at the river, forty feet away. It lasted a few hours afterwards.
The water boiled and began to move up the mountain. Her throat tightened and she turned red. fluent
I can’t give an explanation for it. He was forced to climb the mountain with one leg, which is now
She burns with pain and fear.

There is a flower. Before he got out of the river, he had gotten drunk, though
He knew this was wrong. Now he’s mad and the world revolves around him again. End
It affects his health. But he knew he had to climb the mountain and get back on track
above. Hammond thought he had heard footsteps on the street many times in the past
He was always screaming for help. But somehow the sound did not go far;
He didn't save her. Then, as the morning wore on, he realized he would
You have to climb the mountain, barefoot or not. And that was what was happening now.

Children are dangerous.

Hammond shook his head and sighed—he had been walking for an hour and
He only went to the third floor of the mountain. And he was as tired as an old dog. your
He stomped his foot. His head shook. Of course, he knew there was nothing wrong with that: he was
He was almost back to his roots, thank God - but he had to admit, he was tired. sit
At the top of the mountain, she realized she didn’t want to go.

And why would he not tire? He thought. He was seventy-six years old. Not the year
Look at the gates of the climbing mountain. Although Hammond was in good shape for the season.
In his lifetime, he hopes to reach a hundred. It’s really about taking care of yourself.
We see things as they come. Now he had more reason to live. Other parks have
ride. More surprises to come-

He heard a cry and some birds flying.
tree is very tall. She had been listening to the pups all morning. There were all kinds of descendants.
Here: animal, paper, snake.

Noise levels are growing, and small towns are moving to the mountains more and more. something
is coming. Then he saw a black beast flying up the hill behind him—and another.
And another.

Compys, he thought hotly.

The cloth manufacturers.

Comics suck. They are like sheep, and they wander
And walk with a little confidence like an animal. But he knew it was poison. Their products
It contained a mildly active poison that they used to kill insects.

He thought of the mischievous animals and frowned.

The first group was sitting on the hillside, watching. Stay about five feet away.
He didn't, and just watched. Others came to a halt shortly after, standing on top of each other.
protect. They were screaming and waving and fighting.

"Sabo! Get out!" he said, throwing a stone.

The comics followed, but were only a foot or two away. They were not afraid. It was like they knew.
He could do them no harm.

Hammoud angrily cut down a tree branch and threw them with it. Committees are dissolving;
She licked her lips and cried with joy. It was like he was walking a joke.

Again he thinks of poison. He remembered that there was a catcher.
It was interrupted by a signal in the house. The officer said the poison was similar to a heroin drug.
Meat. There is no pain.

You just want to sleep.

The hell with that, she thought. Hammond grabbed a ferret, turned it around and shot it.
he pulls a comy slap over his shoulder. The little animal screams in fear and screams.
Next, squeeze the butt. The other animals quickly followed suit.

improve.

Hammond was shocked and started down the hill again. hands held in both hands
With his hands, he rubbed at his left knee, feeling the pain in his thigh. It was less than eleven.
As he jumped, someone shot him in the shoulder. He reached out and pulled the animal.
But he left his house and threw himself to the bottom of the mountain. When formed, Company II.
He leaned forward and took a small piece in his hand. He looked on in horror, as he saw the blood flowing
on her breasts. He sighed and started back up the hill.


There was another lump in his throat and he felt a slight pain in his chest.
he screamed and threw the stick at the animal. He threw himself on the animals, breathing heavily.
They stood around, jumping and hollering, raising their heads to look at him. from
He felt burning in his neck and chest.

He lay on his back at the top of the mountain, beginning to grow, somehow, in himself.
But he realized that nothing was wrong. There was no problem. Malcolm was confused.
Your question. Hammond snuggled like a child in the cradle enjoying the peace.
When another commit arrived and hit him in the foot, he made an attempt to
clingy. The little animals are coming closer. Soon they were talking all around, cheering.
The birds. He shook his head as another landed on his shoulder, and the creature flinched.
and the neck. Hammond felt very little pain, very little pain, when the company closed and he broke his neck.


Beach;


Chasing dinosaurs, dodging cliffs and concrete mountains, Grant suddenly jumped
He crosses a pier and finds himself standing on the beach, looking out over the Pacific Ocean
ocean. All around him, young Velociraptors strutted and clawed at the edges. but,
One by one, the animals scattered across the shade of palm trees near the car door.
mangrove swamp, and they stood, backing up, looking out to sea.
They were looking east.

"|Not his father," Janrod said.

"|So do you," Grant said, but they didn't like the weather. The sun doesn’t shine bright enough
a sea; A light mist rolled in and the sea was choppy. Also, why have they failed in their performance in the field?
What brings all the warriors to the beach?

Genaro turned to his watch and saw the dogs waking up.
"Northeast-Southwest. Same as before."

On the other side of the beach, deep in the woods, they heard the sound of the cruise ship. “But we
You know how it comes out,” Ellis said.

Then they heard the hiss of gas at sea, and through the fog they saw a ship coming out.
in the west. It was a large cargo ship, sailing slowly in the west.

"Is that why they left?" said January.

Grant shook his head. "They should know it's coming,"

As the cargo ship passed, all the animals watched, except a few times they spoke.
meaning or meaning. Grant was impressed by their quality, efficiency, and
Do it as a team. But maybe not so secret. In his opinion, a
The rest of the events take place in the tomb.

At first, the children were shocked. So, celebrities are watching. And finally, all the animals
They went to the water. This results in smaller and more powerful animals
Apparently, he had found the ship first. The old men took the soldiers to the beach. And as a
Grant looked around, and saw that the group now numbered thousands. There is a genetic relationship
along the coast, and when the animals left, it didn’t move and move as quickly as it should
was inside. But he was still working hard, improving. Adults are considered a
Within a yard or so, each adult walked among the children. The children stopped.
Among adults and for her alone.

But Grant also sees that not all seniors are the same. There was a very beautiful woman.
hat on his head, and he was in the middle of the group as far as the sea.
She remained center stage, too. It felt like some
Monkey armies, pastoral orders are organized around women, and this
The blue cat is the alpha female of the island. men, he has given their names.
Defensively around the club.

But unlike feathers, which are easily replicated, the dinosaurs destroyed
rigid arrange- just like a military unit. But, too, he had a problem
oriented northeast-southwest. Grant followed. But on the other hand, a
It’s not a surprise. Paleontologists have been digging for bones for so long they’ve forgotten how
Very little information can be obtained for some clades. The bones tell you something.
The overall weight of the animal, including size and weight. They can tell you something about how


connected nerves but something about the structure of the animal in life.
They may be the answer to certain diseases that have affected their bones. But the scenes are bad.
It’s one thing, of course, how we can recycle the entire structure of a site.

Because bones were human, archaeologists used bones. Like other
paleontologists, Grant had become an expert in handwork. and in some places
Somehow, he had begun to feel the untestable — that dinosaurs could be real
Different animals to interact and survive with each other according to their
A sign for future generations, though, because the dinosaur
birds;

"Oh my god," Grant said.

He saw the raptors standing in front of him on the shore, watching
ship. And he knew what he was looking at.

“These animals,” Gennard shook his head, “love to escape
here."

"No," Grant said. "They don't want to leave."

"Don't they know?"

"No," Grant said. "They want to go."


Approaching the darkness.


"go!" Ellie said. "It's beautiful!"

"Yeah," Grant said. He was laughing.

Where do you think they want to go? Ellis said.

"|I don't know," Grant said, as thousands of helicopters circled the area, creating a storm as well.
There are many weapons in the world. People are scattered.
As soon as the alarm went off, one of the helicopters turned back around, circled the runway, and flew back.
to the river. A door opened and soldiers in riot gear approached.
they. Grant heard some words in Spanish and saw that Muddy
On the boat with the kids. “Please come with us,” one soldier said in English.
No time here.

Grant looked out to sea where the retorts were, but they were gone. All this
The animals were lost. It was like they had never seen him before. The soldiers were beating him and
He let her get under the knives and hang over the door.
Muldoon freaked out and yelled in Grant's ear, "We need to get out of here now. We're goin
Do it now!

The soldiers pull Grant, Ellie, and Genord into their seats and help them into it.
Hernias. Tim and Lex shook hands with him and he was surprised at how close they were and
exhausted. Lex rubbed his girlfriend's shoulder.

An officer approached Grant and yelled, "Sexur: Are you the captain?"

"No," Grant said. "I'm not the boss."

Who’s in charge, anyway?

"|I don't know."

The king went to Janrod, and asked him a question: Are you the chief?

"No," Gennard said.

The officer looked at Ellis, but said nothing. The door was opened like a helicopter.
After climbing out of the pool, Grant was anxious to see if he could repeat
raptors, but by then the helicopter was above the palm trees, flying south over the mountains.

Grant leaned over Mildred and shouted, "What about the others?"

Muldoon shouted that they had already taken out Harding and some of the staff.
accident. He found her on the hill near her home. It must fall.

"Is that good?" Grant said.

"No. the comics found them."

"What about Malcolm?" Grant said.

Mildred shook her head.

Grant was too nervous to reveal much. He sighed and looked back at the door. fluent
It’s getting dark now.


He looked outside and saw the helicopter and screamed.
As it had happened.

Somewhere beyond they heard thunder and saw another helicopter
As he walked through the snow to the loading dock, a short time later, the building suddenly collapsed
It flashes orange, and Lex starts crying, and Ellie puts her arms around him, trying to comfort him
protect.

Grant looked down and saw the hypsolophotodonts again.
They moved about like gazelles, moments before another fire exploded beneath their heads.
Their helicopter flipped and crashed into the sea.

Grant sat back in his chair. He thought of the dinosaurs standing on the beach.
He wondered where he would go if they took him away, and realized he didn’t know and
I was shocked and comforted at the same time.

The officer came to him again and looked him straight in the eye. Are you the boss?

"No," Grant said.

"You know, Sixer, who's in charge?"

"No one," Grant said.

The helicopter lost air as it neared the ground. Now it’s winter and
The soldiers closed the door. When they did, Grant looked up again and saw the island.
Against the blue of the sky and the sea, a huge cloud lay on white pearls
It happened quickly, one after another, and the whole island flashed and fell into place.
The place glowed in the darkness of the night.


initial:


San Jose


The days passed. They were met by the officers, and taken to a fancy hotel in San Jose,… The
They had the freedom to come and go and call whoever they wanted. But they were not allowed.
department. Every day a young man from the US embassy comes to them and ask
If they need anything, and tell them that Washington is doing everything to meet
Let them go. But the reality is that many people have died in one world.
Costa Rica. The truth is that the climate crisis could have been avoided. that
The Costa Rican government believes he was deceived and manipulated by John Hammond and his
of the group. At the time, the government refused to evacuate the survivors.
urgent. They didn’t want to bury Hammond and Lane Malcolm. They just put them through.

Every day Grant travels from one government office to another where he
asked another government expert. They let him go home.
Words, time and time again. That’s how Grant met John Hammond. Here’s what Grant knows about the business.
how Grant received a fax from New York. Why Grant went to the island. is
It happened on the island.

The news, again, is daily. Same word.

For a long time Grant thought they had to believe they were talking about them and that.
It’s something they want you to say, but you don’t know what. Therefore,
It was as they expected.

Finally, sitting by the hotel pool one evening, watching Tim and
Lex splash, when an American walked into the cake.

"We've never seen it before," said the American. "My name is Marty Gutierrez. I'm an intern here
Bell Station.

"You're the first example of a Prochomygotes," Grant said.

It is, of course." Gutierrez sat down next to her. "You should go home.”

"Yeah," Grant said. "|You only have a few days until winter starts. In Montana, you
You know, the first batch is coming in August.

Gutierrez said, "Is that why the Hammond Foundation supports South Goose? Because it does."
Would it be possible to reintroduce untouched genetic material from dinosaurs to colder climates?

"That's what | spiritually, it is."


Gutierrez shook his head. "Hammond is a smart guy."

Grant said nothing. Gutierrez sat on a pool table.

“The managers don’t tell you,” Gutierrez said finally. “Because they are afraid, and maybe .
I am angry with you for what you have done. But something is happening.
field to field."

"Did you send the child?"

"No, thankfully, he's gone. Except for the other thing. Right now, at Isma'aloya's house."
In the wild, animals unknowingly eat the plants in an unhealthy way. they
It is carried daily in a straight line - straight as an arrow - from the beach
mountain in the woods."

Grant sat upright.

“It’s like a road,” Gutierrez said. "Forbidden?"

Which field? Grant said.

"No, it's great. They just eat agave leaves and soybeans, and sometimes chicken eggs."

Grant said, "The food is rich in lysine. What happened to these animals?"

"Well," Gutierrez said, "we went into the woods. Anyway, we didn't
find. Of course, they will be hard to find in the wild. A team of researchers was able to
For years on Mount Ismail, nothing showed up.

"And we're trapped here because . . ."

Gutierrez raised his hand. "The government is scared. Maybe there are more animals. More
resentment. They think about them.

Do you think there are too many animals? Grant said.

"|I can't tell you. Can you tell me?"

"No," Grant said. "I can't say."

"But you think?"

Grant shook his head. "Okay. Yes."

"| That's good."

Gutierrez rose from the floor. He waved at Tim and Lex as they swam. "bridge
They send the kids home.
glasses. "Please come with us, Dr. Grant. It's a nice community here."

Are you telling me we’re not going anywhere? Grant said.

“None of us are going anywhere, Dr. Grant,” Gutierrez said, laughing. And he was shocked and
He walked back to the hotel door.



   
